 Telecredit Inc., Los Angeles, said it obtained a five-year contract to continue providing credit card services to IBAA Bancard Inc., the credit card subsidiary of Independent Bankers Association of America of Washington, D.C.  The contract is an expansion of a contract signed in 1985, when the IBAA Bancard program began its service of providing Visa and MasterCards designed for independent banks.  A wider array of services are contained in the agreement, and the program has grown to include 700 member banks.  The value of the contract wasn't disclosed, but Lee A. Kennedy, president of Telecredit's credit card unit, said the pact would generate more than $10 million the first year, escalating each year.  Hollywood Park Realty Enterprises Inc. said it agreed to sell Los Alamitos Race Course and adjacent property to a group of four Sacramento, Calif., investors for about $71 million.  The prospective buyers are Lloyd Arnold, Christo D. Bardis, Frank Ramos and Buzz Oates.  Mr. Arnold and Mr. Bardis, an attorney, are involved in harness racing; Messrs.  Ramos and Oates are real estate developers.  In an interview, Mr. Ramos said the group plans to spin off the track to Messrs.  Arnold and Bardis, who would operate it.  Then the group would begin working to develop the adjacent property, 160 acres in Cypress, Calif.  According to the agreement, the property would be sold on an "as is" basis.  Early this year, a Newport Beach, Calif., concern agreed to buy the package for $96 million, but contingent on a favorable vote by Cypress citizens to rezone the adjacent land from public to mixed-use business park.  Voters defeated the rezoning plan, so the transaction was derailed.  Mr. Ramos said his group would take its chances.  "We'll try to work with the city," he said.  Another group associated with quarterhorse racing, which also takes place at the racetrack, was the other final bidder for the property.  After a congressional ban on polygraph testing by employers last year many companies turned to psychological tests to screen applicants for sensitive positions.  Now that mechanism is coming under fire.  Last week, Target Stores, a discount department-store chain, was targeted with a class-action lawsuit in Alameda County, Calif., superior court, challenging its psychological-testing practices for potential employees.  The suit, believed to be the first such filing in the state and one of perhaps a handful nationally, alleges that the test violates privacy protections guaranteed in the California constitution, among other laws.  To critics, "personality inventory tests," as they are called by personnel professionals, pose an unwarranted threat to worker rights, and offer little insight into future job performance.  Target's 700-question test, for instance, contains such queries as "I believe in the second coming of Christ" and "I have had no difficulty starting or holding my urine."  But a spokesman for Target, a division of Minneapolis-based Dayton Hudson Corp., defended the tests, used for employees in sensitive posts, mainly security guards.  "We want to make sure people in very difficult jobs can conduct their jobs with respect and courtesy," he said, adding that psychologists generally evaluate such tests based on an applicant's overall pattern of responses rather than an answer to a particular question.  Some labor experts said the chances of such a suit succeeding in California were aided because the state's courts tend to construe the privacy clause broadly.  But Victor Schachter, a San Francisco labor lawyer, says the state's supreme court hasn't definitively decided the key question of to what extent, if at all, such protections extend to the private sector. ---  FEDERAL MARSHALS have found nearly 60,000 concealed weapons at courthouses in the past four years.  The U.S. Marshals Service says increased security at federal courthouses nationwide has uncovered everything from homemade knives and hatchets to handguns and detonating devices.  "We are getting a more violent type of criminal through the courts than we have in the past," says U.S. Marshal Tom Rapone, in Philadelphia, where courthouse security guards have confiscated 5,643 weapons in the past four years.  The reason, says Mr. Rapone, is drugs.  According to the marshals service, threats against the "judicial family" are at an all time high.  Of the 213 threats recorded last year nationwide, federal judges received the most (69%), followed by assistant federal prosecutors (15%), federal magistrates (9%) and U.S. attorneys, (3%).  Nearly half of the threats come through the mail.  Only 1% of the threats were physical, according to the Marshals Service.  In Philadelphia, security guards have found detonating devices, pipe bombs, hatchets, motorcycle chains with leather handles and guns, including a .22-caliber, two-shot Derringer disguised as a beeper.  The most unusual weapon?  A crucifix worn as a medallion that flipped open into a stiletto with a five-inch blade.  ---  "L.A.  LAW" legal adviser fights off scripts that distort reality.  Nonetheless, in the interest of drama and excitement, reality often ends up on the cutting-room floor.  One show, for example, included gunfire in a law firm conference room.  In another, there was a smoke bomb thrown into the middle of a deposition taking.  "In over 1,000 depositions, I've never seen a smoke bomb," says the show's legal adviser Charles Rosenberg, a Los Angeles lawyer.  Mr. Rosenberg discussed his unusual job last week at the Judicial Conference of the Second Circuit, held in Bolton Landing, N.Y.  Mr. Rosenberg did have some victories to note.  For example, when the show wanted to put a defense attorney into a scene in which a client was testifying before a grand jury, Mr. Rosenberg objected.  Lawyers aren't allowed in the grand jury room, so the scene was scratched.  Still, Mr. Rosenberg conceded, "We do glamorize the legal world.  If you showed what it's really like, people wouldn't watch the show. . . .  After all, a typical trial is like a stretch of interstate highway in Kansas."  For the purists among the viewers, Mr. Rosenberg said, a scene that stretches credulity will often be preceded by the one character saying, "I know it's pretty unusual but what we're going to do is . . . ."   ---  SOVIET LAWYERS ARRIVE: Seventeen lawyers from the Soviet Union have come to the U.S. to gain some hands-on experience in the U.S. legal system as part of a new work-study program sponsored by the American Bar Association.  The just-arrived Soviet group includes an entertainment lawyer interested in learning how to negotiate recording contracts for Soviet rock musicians, several legal scholars and a local prosecutor.  Most of the 17 Soviet lawyers will spend time working at various U.S. law firms, including New York's White & Case, Haight, Gardner, Poor & Havens and Cleary, Gottlieb, Steen & Hamilton; and Washington's Arnold & Porter.  Others will spend time at U.S. law schools and government offices.  A spokesman for the ABA says the program "marks a furtherance of the good will generated by glasnost and the warming of relations between the Soviet Union and the United States."  ---  ONE PORN PLAZA: All the furniture hadn't yet been moved into Cravath, Swaine & Moore's new offices at Manhattan's Worldwide Plaza before the jokes began.  "One Porn Plaza," occupants quickly dubbed the block-long complex of business offices, stores, townhouses and movie theaters between 49th and 50th streets on Eighth Avenue.  Cravath's 300 lawyers and more than 900 support staffers took most of last month to move into 13 floors of their new 49-story office tower -- double the space of their old Wall Street-area digs.  The law firm has its own entrance on Eighth Avenue, an emergency day-care center and wooden and marble walls.  "It's a really fabulous space," chirped managing partner John W. White.  Although the building is located several blocks from the Times Square's porno district, the large marquee of a pornographic-movie house, the Adonis Theatre, looms prominently one block north.  By year end, however, the theater will be bought and demolished as part of the lease agreement with Cravath, says landlord and developer William Zeckendorf.  Cravath's top partners hope that Worldwide Plaza's unsavory nickname will fall with it.  Cable News Network, the 24-hour all-news cable network, is preparing to launch an evening newscast next month, the first time it has scheduled a news program in competition with the three broadcast networks, according to people at CNN.  And in an unorthodox move, the Turner Broadcasting System Inc. unit said it hired Catherine Crier, a state district judge from Dallas with no television or journalistic experience, to be a correspondent and anchor.  Although CNN didn't specify which program she would be assigned to, the CNN sources said she may co-anchor the new broadcast.  CNN, which is expected to undergo some top management changes shortly, declined to comment on the new nightly news program.  But the CNN sources, who requested anonymity, said the newscast will be one hour long and has the working title "The World Today."  They said it is scheduled to premiere Oct. 16 at 6 p.m. EDT. Bernard Shaw, an anchor on CNN news programs, will be co-anchor, the sources said.  CNN currently airs an entertainment news show, "Show Biz Today," at 6:30 p.m. when the three networks broadcast the first "feed" of their newscasts.  Each network said that a majority of their affiliates air the broadcasts at 6:30 p.m., instead of 7 p.m., when there is an updated second "feed."  In the new tentative lineup, CNN would move its entertainment show to 5:30 p.m. and have a half-hour newscast, "Newswatch." at 5 p.m. CNN declined to comment on plans for "The World Today."  A nightly news program that competes with the three broadcast networks is a departure from CNN's original strategy.  Turner officials said when the cable news channel made its debut in June 1980 that CNN didn't need a traditional evening newscast because it airs news around the clock.  The network started out in only 1.7 million households; today it is available in more than 51 million cable homes.  "We're equal in stature now to the networks, and we ought to go where the news viewing public is," said one CNN official.  Bill Wheatley, executive producer of "NBC Nightly News with Tom Brokaw," said: "I'm intrigued by a one-hour newscast.  And as you have more competition, there is always the risk that some of your viewers may leave you.  But I want to wait to see what they do."  National Broadcasting Co. is a unit of General Electric Co.  NBC is investing in news programming on cable through its new Consumer News and Business Channel, which it owns jointly with Cablevision Systems Corp.  CNN's ratings are far lower than the networks'.  According to figures compiled by A.C. Nielsen Co., CNN has an average rating of 0.8.  In comparision, "ABC World News Tonight with Peter Jennings" last week had a 9.1 rating.  A ratings point represents 904,000 television households.  CBS Inc. news officials declined to comment; officials of the ABC news unit of Capital Cities/ABC Inc. couldn't be reached for comment.  CNN's latest moves come at a time when Turner Chairman R.E. "Ted" Turner is considering who will succeed 68-year-old Burt Reinhardt, who has served as president of CNN since 1982.  Mr. Reinhardt is said to have signed a three-year contract with Turner Broadcasting earlier this year with the understanding that a search for a successor would begin soon.  Among the people being considered are Paul Amos, executive vice president for programming; Lou Dobbs, vice president and managing editor of CNN Business News; Jon Petrovich, executive vice president of Headline News; and Ed Turner (no relation to Ted Turner), executive vice president for news gathering.  Meanwhile, CNN officials defended their decision to hire Ms. Crier.  "As a judge, trial lawyer and district attorney, Judge Crier has amply demonstrated the kind of critical thinking, knowledge and ability to express herself that are the very core of great journalism," said Mr. Reinhardt in a statement.  "We've never hired a judge before, and I don't know if any other TV news organization has either, but Judge Crier is a natural and is going to be a great news anchor for CNN."  Ms. Crier, 34, was the youngest woman to be elected to the bench in Texas history in 1984, and was re-elected in 1988.  The Dallas judge resigned her elective post effective Sept. 30.  "I've always done a lot of speeches," she said in an interview from her Dallas office, "and the agent who books my appearances recently began talking to me about pursuing this as a career.  I told him I was very interested and he brought my tape to CNN."  ---  Glenn Ruffenach contributed to this article.  The Federal Aviation Administration proposed extensive repairs to ensure the safety of aging McDonnell Douglas Corp. jetliners.  The proposals, scheduled to be released this week and outlined at a joint industry-FAA news conference, are similar to modifications ordered earlier this year for older Boeing Co. aircraft.  Both cases mark a striking change in the government's longtime practice of relying almost exclusively on inspections to detect potential safety problems.  Applying a new philosophy, the U.S. now is requiring specific, pre-set repairs on geriatric jets.  The proposals for the McDonnell Douglas planes, which are expected to become final rules in three or four months, call for 52 repairs to older DC-8s, 52 to DC-9s, 22 to MD-80s and 33 to DC-10s.  Each plane's number of flights would determine whether repairs were needed.  For example, most changes on DC-9s would be required on planes with more than 100,000 flights.  The Air Transport Association, the airline industry trade group, estimated that the modifications will cost an average of about $290,000 a plane.  It said that 1,900 aircraft throughout the world would be affected, at a total cost of $563 million over the next two decades.  Foreign civil-aviation officials are expected to adopt the FAA rules.  According to the FAA, U.S. airlines own 1,153 McDonnell Douglas aircraft, consisting of 218 DC-8s, 568 DC-9s, 173 MD-80s, and 194 DC-10s.  All of these planes will be modified eventually.  The 100 or so oldest planes will have to be repaired over a four-year period at a cost of $53 million to domestic airlines, the agency said.  The rest will be repaired as they age.  Changes will range from minor bolt replacements to the overhaul of DC-9 landing gears.  Clyde Kizer, vice president of engineering and maintenance for the Air Transport Association, said the planes targeted for changes are currently safe.  "What we are doing is trying to prevent problems in the future," he said.  "None of these problems exist today."  But he and other officials acknowledged that the new philosophy of predesignated repairs is an implicit admission that repetitive inspections alone can't guarantee the safety of planes being used much longer than their designers ever expected.  Public concern about the safety of older airliners surged in the wake of a bizarre accident in April 1988 in which a part of a 19-year-old Aloha Airlines Boeing 737 ripped off over Hawaii, killing a flight attendant.  At the urging of the FAA, the industry convened experts to review the potential hazards posed by the aging of the fleet.  Later this year, the group will recommend repairs to planes made by Lockheed Corp., Airbus Industrie, Fokker Aircraft B.V. and British Aerospace PLC.  UGI Corp. said its gas utility division asked Pennsylvania regulators for permission to recover about $48 million in contract-settlement charges over the next five years.  The charges, which could reach a total of about $57 million, stem from settlement of various interstate-pipeline liabilities to natural gas producers who had contracts with the UGI unit.  The Valley Forge, Pa., natural gas concern proposes to absorb about $9 million of the liabilities and pass on the remainder to customers in the form of a rate increase, beginning Nov. 5.  The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission recently adopted a policy that permits timely recovery of such settlement charges through a rate increase if the company itself agrees to absorb a reasonable portion of the charges.  James A. Sutton, UGI's chairman and chief executive, said the effect of the settlement charges on the company's earnings in 1989 and later years will depend on how regulators treat the request.  EAST GERMANS FLOODED into West Germany in a mass exodus from Hungary.  Thousands of refugees traveled through Austria and into Bavaria after Budapest defied East German demands and opened its frontiers.  It was the largest mass migration from East Germany since the Berlin Wall was built in 1961, and marked the first time that a Warsaw Pact country aided the departure of refugees from an allied nation.  News reports said the number of refugees could exceed 10,000.  East Berlin accused Hungary of "smuggling" human beings.  About 100 Romanians who have fled their Communist homeland gathered at a U.N. office in Belgrade, Yugoslavia, applying for resettlement in the West.  ---  BUSH SAID the U.S. isn't planning an anti-drug combat role in Latin America.  In an attempt to dispel concern about the use of military forces to suppress narcotics trafficking, the president said there was "no contemplation" of combat roles for U.S. servicemen sent to Colombia or elsewhere.  About 30 American servicemen have been sent to Colombia to help train that nation's soldiers.  In Medellin, gunmen assassinated a former mayor who had tried to oust drug cartels from the city, Colombia's cocaine center.  The five or six attackers escaped.  Colombian suspect Eduardo Martinez Romero pleaded innocent in federal court in Atlanta to charges of laundering millions of dollars of drug money.  ---  Yeltsin said the Soviet Union could be enveloped in strikes unless Gorbachev resolves the country's economic and nationalist problems.  The maverick Soviet politician, on a two-week tour of the U.S., told ABC-TV that the Kremlin leader has about six months to a year to achieve domestic progress or face possible "revolution" and ouster.  ---  Voters in Norway dealt the governing Labor Party its worst election setback since World War II, according to partial returns from nationwide balloting.  Prime Minister Gro Harlem Brundtland indicated she would fight to stay on, which could prompt the opposition to try to oust her in a parliamentary no-confidence vote next month.  ---  College-entrance test scores fell and the number of test takers declined last school year, the College Board reported.  It was the fourth consecutive year in which students failed to improve on the Scholastic Aptitude Test, adding to concern that educational changes and spending increases are failing to revive schools.  ---  As many as 161 people perished when a Romanian pleasure boat collided with a Bulgarian barge on the Danube River, Yugoslavia's state news agency reported from Bucharest.  At least 18 people reportedly survived the accident, which occurred Sunday about 125 miles northeast of Bucharest.  ---  Poland's Parliament concluded four days of hearings on nominees for a Solidarity-led coalition.  As the legislature prepared to vote today to install the first non-Communist cabinet in Poland in 40 years, President Jaruzelski expressed his "greatest approval" of the government-formation efforts.  ---  Tank and artillery battles ignited forest fires in the hills around Beirut, trapping thousands of people.  At least 12 people were killed in the latest fighting, authorities said.  In the waters off the Christian sector north of Beirut, Syrian gunboats seized a ship carrying supplies to the Christians and escorted the vessel to the port of Tripoli, Lebanon.  ---  Israeli Finance Minister Peres expressed support for a proposal by Egyptian President Mubarak, saying the plan could be the basis for opening Israeli-Egyptian talks on Mideast peace.  Premier Shamir opposes the plan, which calls for trading land for peace in a bid to win Palestinian backing for elections in the occupied territories.  ---  Archbishop Tutu met in Cape Town with diplomats from the U.S. and 14 other countries, and urged them to "condemn the brutalities" of South Africa's security forces.  Apartheid foes claim as many as 29 people were killed by police during elections last week.  The police, meanwhile, said they would cease using whips on protesters.  ---  Leftist rebels in El Salvador agreed to observe an 11-day truce in an attempt to create a favorable climate for talks with the government aimed at ending a 10-year-old civil war.  The negotiations, the first between the guerrillas and President Cristiani's government, are expected to begin this week.  ---  South Korea's President Roh proposed new steps toward reunification of the divided peninsula, and expressed hope that a charter could be signed by next August.  The proposal calls for a summit between interim governmental bodies equally divided between the two sides.  There wasn't any immediate response from Pyongyang.  ---  Chile's Pinochet marked the 16th anniversary of the coup he led, delivering his last state of the nation address.  The military president, 73, who is to surrender power to an elected civilian government in March, said in his 88-minute speech that he is prepared to take power again if necessary.  ---  Jury selection began in the bribery-extortion trial of Rep. Garcia and his wife.  The case against the New York Democrat is the latest involving Wedtech Corp.  The Garcias are accused of obtaining $185,000 from officials of the defense contractor.  ---  Typhoon Sarah struck eastern Taiwan, triggering landslides that left at least four people dead and two missing.  At least 16 people were killed by the storm in the Philippines over the weekend, officials said.  Food and Drug Administration officials reported finding manufacturing problems and record-keeping irregularities at all but two of the first 12 companies to be investigated in the burgeoning generic-drug scandal.  The FDA investigators detailed several cases of doctored data and other misrepresentations as five current and former executives of Par Pharmaceutical Inc. and its Quad Pharmaceutical Inc. subsidiary invoked their Fifth Amendment rights against self-incrimination at a hearing yesterday before the House Energy and Commerce Committee's investigative panel.  Both companies have pleaded guilty to paying illegal gratuities to a FDA new-drug reviewer to gain preferential treatment.  Paul Vogel, deputy director of the FDA's generic-drug compliance staff, testified that some manufacturers have passed off brand-name drugs as their own in tests designed to show that their generic products performed the same way as the brand-name drugs being mimicked.  Mr. Vogel's testimony prompted several lawmakers to conclude that the FDA's so-called honor system -- accepting test results on faith, among other things -- must be abandoned.  "These inspections raise very serious questions about whether the industry can be trusted to supply accurate information to the FDA in their {new-drug applications} and whether that information remains accurate for those generic drugs which have been approved for sale to American consumers," said Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), subcommittee chairman.  Sidmak Laboratories Inc. of East Hanover, N.J., was one of the companies found to have significant problems, according to Mr. Vogel.  The company recently had to recall a multivitamin product because it contained 50 times more vitamin D than the declared strength on the product label.  "That represents a serious health hazard," Mr. Vogel said.  Sidmak relied on an outside laboratory that fabricated the test results on the stength of the product's active ingredients, he told lawmakers.  The company failed to audit the test results, as required.  "We're cooperating fully with the FDA," said Edward John Allera, a Washington-based attorney for Sidmak.  "It shouldn't have been a Class 1 recall.  We killed the product."  Mr. Vogel also recounted the compliance problems of Chicago-based Pharmaceutical Basics Inc. and the company it acquired last year, My-K Laboratories Inc.  In March 1988, he said, the agency took legal action to shut down the My-K plant in Morton Grove, Ill., after it mislabeled a hypnotic drug, haloperidol, as an antihistamine syrup for children.  The mixup resulted in only one known injury -- a North Carolina boy who recovered after being hospitalized, according to Mr. Vogel.  The FDA official told lawmakers that Pharmaceutical Basics' Denver plant had to recall 50 million tablets of carbamazepine, an anti-seizure drug for epileptics, because the drug didn't dissolve properly in the bloodstream.  This could result in "a subtherapeutic drug level" in the body, leading to potential dangerous seizures, Mr. Vogel said.  In Chicago, Daryl Johnson, Pharmaceutical Basics' vice president of marketing, said that the carbamazepine problem didn't cause any "known" injuries.  Mr. Johnson confirmed that Drug Enforcement Agency agents earlier this year seized the company's supply of so-called controlled substances, including codeine and hydrocodone bitartrate, after finding irregularities in its records of orders and shipments.  It was standing-room only in the hearing room as Mr. Vogel reported on the results of the first round of inspections at the 12 generic-drug makers.  Only Able Laboratories Inc. of South Plainfield, N.J., and Zenith Laboratories Inc. of Ramsey, N.J., were found to have no significant problems.  In addition, the agency has expanded its investigation to the nation's 20 leading generic companies, while it continues to test the potency and stability of the 30 top-selling generic products on the market.  Within three months, FDA Commissioner Frank Young hopes to have a complete profile of the multibillion-dollar generic industry.  Because of misrepresentations on the part of some companies, Rep. Dingell said yesterday that the consumer no longer can be sure that generic drugs are safe or effective.  "This is not to say that any generic-drug manufacturers are selling poison or placebos," he emphasized.  "They are obviously selling medications which resemble the innovator drugs.  For those drugs with broad therapeutic ranges, there is probably little danger to the consumer."  Rep. Ronald Wyden (D., Ore.) read at length from an "off-the-record" composition book kept by a Par Pharmaceutical quality-assurance employee that listed numerous production irregularities at the Spring Valley, N.Y., company.  The dogeared book was turned over to the subcommittee staff by a Par executive in July.  One entry in the book recorded the addition of unauthorized ingredients to a production batch for a Par cancer drug.  Another entry told of starch being improperly added to a heart-disease drug to adjust the product's dissolution rate in the blood.  Among the five subpoenaed executives who invoked their Fifth Amendment privilege yesterday were Ashok Patel, former senior vice president of Par, and Dilip Shah, former president of Indianapolis-based Quad.  Messrs.  Patel and Shah have pleaded guilty to paying gratuities to a former FDA new-drug reviewer.  A sixth executive, Jeffrey Levine, Par's executive vice president, failed to appear yesterday because of illness.  Of all the companies, Bolar Pharmaceutical Co. came under sharpest attack yesterday.  The Copiague, N.Y., company, the giant of the generic industry, clearly had antagonized Democratic and Republican lawmakers alike by taking out newspaper ads to denounce the subcommittee's investigation of Bolar and other companies.  One lawmaker held aloft blown-up photographs of two tablets to prove that Bolar had submitted a brand-name drug as its own for laboratory testing in 1982.  One tablet was Sandoz Corp.'s anti-psychotic drug, Mellaril; the other was a sample of Bolar's generic version of Mellaril that was tested at a Baltimore laboratory.  "You can see in varying degrees the triangle and S {for Sandoz} logo in Bolar's product," Mr. Vogel said.  FDA chemists also detected the Sandoz logo on tablets in five of six lots purported to be Bolar's product, he told lawmakers.  The generic tablets were found to be "generally less shiny" and "slightly smaller," reflecting an "effort to remove the logo," Mr. Vogel said.  As reported, Bolar President Robert Shulman has acknowledged that the company "made a mistake seven years ago."  The company is also under investigation for substituting SmithKline Beecham PLC's Dyazide to win FDA clearance to market a generic copy of the blood-pressure drug.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Par shares closed at $5.875, down $1.125.  On the American Stock Exchange, Bolar shares closed at $18.875, down 87.5 cents.  The federal investigation of possible collegiate tuition and financial-aid price fixing appears to be widening.  Spokepersons for three more schools -- Bryn Mawr College, Dartmouth College and the University of Pennsylvania -- acknowledged that they received civil-investigative demands for financial data from the Justice Department.  The demands, received by the schools yesterday, asked them to deliver information and documents about tuition and salary setting, and financial-aid practices.  None of the schools were among 13 colleges that acknowledge receiving requests from the Justice Department last month.  The department said then that it had already sent out demands to about 20 schools, but didn't release their names.  Department spokesmen couldn't be reached for comment late yesterday.  People familiar with the inquiry have said the department is interested in a broad range of schools, and was considering expanding its list of demands to schools beyond the original 20.  The demands don't imply that recipients have done anything unlawful.  The government is attempting to learn whether elite colleges conspire to keep their prices high by exchanging tuition-setting plans ahead of time.  Also under investigation is a financial-aid "overlap" practice of 23 private Northeastern schools that results in identical out-of-pocket costs for students accepted at more than one university.  All three of the schools that received demands yesterday are part of the financial-aid overlap practice.  Mitsubishi Bank Ltd. announced the relocation of its New York and North American headquarters to the World Financial Center from the World Trade Center, a few hundred feet away.  Mitsubishi, one of the world's largest banks, moved its New York office to Two World Financial Center effective yesterday, and will move its North American headquarters effective next Monday.  Mitsubishi had moved its North American headquarters to the World Trade Center in July, becoming the first Japanese bank to move a major operating headquarters out of Tokyo.  The North American office is led by Takeshi Yano, who sits on Mitsubishi's board of directors.  The New York and North American offices have about 300 employees and will have 150 trading desks.  Chairman Robert Byrd of the Senate Appropriations Committee proposed an expanded anti-drug program, doubling the spending increases sought by President Bush in fiscal 1990 and cutting across-the-board from military and domestic accounts to finance the revised package.  Federal appropriations for law enforcement and drug treatment programs would grow to nearly $10.1 billion under the West Virginia Democrat's proposal, which seeks to add $2.2 billion to what the administration has already requested for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  The distribution of funds would give more priority to drug education and treatment programs, and the net impact would be to ask the Pentagon to absorb -- through cuts in its budget -- a greater share of the costs than proposed by the president.  The drug strategy was outlined as Senate appropriators prepared to meet on the fiscal 1990 Pentagon budget today.  Major weapons systems cut by the House are expected to be restored, but in a blow to the Navy, the senators are considering eliminating all procurement funds for the D-5 submarine missile program.  The nearly $1.8 billion reduction from the administration's budget would still leave $286 million for an increased testing program.  The stated goal is to continue with the system but put a brake on new procurement until recent failures are addressed.  Mr. Byrd acted after consultations with his party leadership and senior Democrats on the appropriations panel, but the strategy is foremost in his own effort to recapture the drug issue and confront the budget dilemma facing his committee.  House-passed spending bills for the new fiscal year already provide more than $6 billion of what the administration has requested, and Mr. Byrd's assessment is that the Senate can only modestly increase this total to nearly $6.14 billion within current budget allocations.  Further increases would require significant cuts from other programs; Mr. Byrd's strategy calls for a single $3.9 billion drug amendment that would be offset by an across-the-board cut of about 0.5% from domestic and security accounts.  This approach shelters defense more than a potential across-the-board cut under the Gramm-Rudman deficit law, but the net effect would still to be to trim nearly $1.7 billion from the new Pentagon budget authority promised in the administration's April budget agreement with Congress.  Moreover, the House has already tapped defense accounts to pay for increased drug-interdiction efforts by the military and Coast Guard, and Senate appropriators are expected to go even further at a meeting today of the defense appropriations subcommittee.  Recommendations developed by Sen. Daniel Inouye (D., Hawaii), the subcommittee chairman, would allocate a total of $796 million for anti-drug activities in direct appropriations or transfers as well as $140 million of expenditures, such as for fuel, in support of Coast Guard operations.  By comparison, all of the $3.9 billion amendment outlined by Mr. Byrd would add anti-drug funds to domestic agencies, including $1.6 billion for the Education and the Health and Human Services Departments.  The chairman said he will present his plan as an amendment to a pending transportation bill scheduled to come before the Senate today.  But he risks being weakened by the confusion and rivalries fostered by the emotional issue.  For example, there are contradictions on how to account for $1 billion for federal prisons, and a Senate Appropriations subcommittee today will take up a more modest across-the-board cut to finance just $1.84 billion for law enforcement and corrections.  Separately, a senior official of the Federal Bureau of Investigation said U.S. law enforcement agencies lack the resources to prevent the Colombian drug cartels from carrying out terrorism in the U.S. Oliver "Buck" Revell, the bureau's associate deputy director, told a Senate hearing that the FBI would be able to react effectively, after terrorism occurred, but not to head it off.  Mr. Revell said he believes that, if the cartels decide to strike at the U.S., "the likelihood is" that they'd first attack Americans in Colombia."  Intel Corp., the big microprocessor-chip maker, will unveil today a significantly faster chip that can relay as many as 66 million instructions per second and perform dual tasks at the same time.  The 32-bit chip, expected to sell for $300, represents a breakthough for the industry and in particular for the Santa Clara, Calif., company, which invented the microprocessor.  The new i960CA chip is expected to have a big impact on a variety of systems, laser printers, telephone-switching systems and robot controllers.  The company declined to discuss the specifics of its new chip, which will be unveiled at a news conference.  It is the first commercial chip to use the so-called super-scalar design technology, which enables a chip to carry out dual instructions at once.  The federal prosecutor in charge of the case against Colombian Eduardo Martinez Romero showed up on the "Today" show last week to discuss the money-laundering case.  Some lawyers watching the show shook their heads at the comments made by U.S. Attorney Robert Barr Jr., whose office is prosecuting the case against Mr. Martinez, alleged money man for the Medellin cocaine cartel who was arraigned in Atlanta on two counts of laundering millions of dollars in the U.S.  Mr. Barr "made statements . . . on the case and the evidence that have prejudiced potential jurors beyond repair," says Ira London, who unsuccessfully represented Joel Steinberg in the much-publicized trial over the death of his adopted daughter earlier this year.  Within hours of the broadcast, federal Judge William O'Kelley issued an order prohibiting lawyers involved from talking about the Martinez case.  Mr. Barr won't comment on his TV appearance.  Judge O'Kelley might well be worried.  Even without any additional problems that may be caused by the prosecutor's comments, the judge will face a tough challenge conducting a fair trial in such an emotional and highly publicized case.  Mr. Martinez's arraignment, on the heels of his extradition from Colombia and President Bush's declaration of war on drugs last week, highlights a troublesome criminal-justice issue: Can a defendant in such a case get a fair trial?  The Sixth Amendment of the Constitution guarantees the right of defendants to a trial by unbiased people who judge the case only on the evidence produced.  But getting a fair trial in the age of TV, and in a period of public concern about drugs, is far trickier than it was when the framers of the Constitution put pen to paper.  "I'm not sure I can remember a case where there's been such a saturation of publicity nationally, and such prejudicial publicity," says Neal Sonnett, president of the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers and counsel to Gen. Manuel Noriega of Panama.  For Mr. Martinez, he says, getting a fair trial is going to be "damn difficult.  There's such a climate of near hysteria about drugs and crime in general that I think it's hard for juries to understand the presumption of innocence."  Not surprisingly, it is defense lawyers who express the most skepticism about prospects of an untainted trial for Mr. Martinez, who pleaded innocent to the charges and was ordered held without bail.  "I have real doubts that the Sixth Amendment promise of a fair trial can be accomplished for a Colombian accused of a major drug offense," says Edward Shohat, a Miami defense lawyer.  Mr. Shohat represented Carlos Lehder, a Medellin cartel leader now serving a life sentence.  He believes it is impossible to find prospective jurors who do not have strong feelings about drugs -- and drug defendants.  In the 1987 Lehder case, he adds, "Each and every seated juror had something that was objectionable."  Mr. Shohat is so embittered by his experience that he says Mr. Martinez should be sent home to Colombia if it becomes impossible to empanel an impartial jury.  Prosecutors and defense lawyers agree that the burden of preserving a defendant's Sixth Amendment rights falls largely on the judge.  It is the judge who sets the limits on voir dire -- the questioning and selection of jurors.  Professor Alan Dershowitz of Harvard Law School says the best kind of judge for such a case is one "who has guts or a judge who is very old."  Young and ambitious judges are the worst kind for sensitive cases, he says, because they cannot risk alienating public opinion.  Burton Roberts, the New York State Supreme Court justice who was the model for the abrasive judge in Tom Wolfe's "The Bonfire of the Vanities," says a good judge can put on a fair trial "by the force and dint of his personality."  In federal courts, jury selection is usually a brief affair, but judges can allow surveys of jurors and extensive questioning by the lawyers.  Even cynical defense lawyers think probing questions can winnow out prejudiced jurors.  William Weld, former head of the Justice Department's criminal division, says the way to compensate for prejudicial pretrial publicity is to gain a delay and, if necessary, move the trial to a new location.  But Mr. Martinez's lawyer, Edward Garland, said, "He will get as fair a trial {in Atlanta} as he can get anywhere in the country.  The question is: Can he get a fair trial, period?  And that will be one of the issues addressed in the trial."  Indeed, many defense lawyers say that if they were in the shoes of Mr. Garland, they would stall in the hope that the drug crisis fades in the public consciousness.  Whatever approach Mr. Garland takes, the Justice Department appears confident nothing will interfere with Mr. Martinez's right to a fair trial.  Mr. Barr insists he will be treated like any other defendant.  Imo Industries Inc., Lawrenceville, N.J., said it agreed to acquire the Optic-Electronic Corp. unit of United Scientific Holdings PLC for $65 million.  The unit, based in Garland, Texas, makes night-vision equipment and other electro-optical products.  Its sales for the fiscal year ended Sept. 30, 1988, were about $69 million, and its current backlog is about $92 million.  In addition, Imo said it completed its acquisition of a 70% stake in the Roltra group of companies, a closely held Italian producer of control devices, for $6 million in cash and assumption of about $15 million in Roltra debt.  Roltra, which makes manual and electric door locks and window assemblies for Fiat Auto S.p.A. and other auto makers, had revenue of about $117 million last year.  Imo, a provider of analytical instruments and controls, said it expects to finance the Optic-Electronic acquisition through a public offering of $150 million debentures that also would be used to repay revolving-credit debt.  Jaguar PLC, struggling to drive up profit, remains stuck in neutral by a protracted U.S. sales slump.  Analysts expect Britain's leading luxury-car maker tomorrow to report a 69% slide in pretax profit to #7 million ($10.8 million) for the first half.  The downturn, following a 51% plunge in all of 1988, makes Jaguar more vulnerable to a predator, such as Ford Motor Co. or General Motors Corp., when British restrictions on a takeover expire at the end of 1990.  But rather than giving up, Jaguar is taking a more aggressive tack in the U.S., its biggest market.  Today, the company will introduce a kind of "stripped down" version of its flagship XJ6 sedan in the U.S.  The model will sell for $39,700, compared with the XJ6's usual $44,000, Jaguar officials say.  The new car lacks a sun roof and a fancy suspension system, and the traditional walnut interior trim won't be so posh.  The step could endanger Jaguar's classy image -- but also help the Coventry, England, manufacturer repel new Japanese autos in the U.S.  "It's quite a bold move," says John Lawson, auto-industry analyst at Nomura Research Institute in London.  "I think it's possible you will see other lower-priced {versions}."  Shrinking U.S. sales beset most major European luxury-car makers, but so far nobody else has tried removing features from their leading models to compete better with the looming Japanese competition.  Nissan Motor Co. and Toyota Motor Corp. are introducing luxury models in the U.S. this fall for $35,000 to $40,000 each.  The prices for Nissan's Infiniti and Toyota's Lexus give the Japanese makers an edge over most European luxury cars, but still generally exceed the prices of Ford's Lincoln line and General Motors's Cadillac division.  With their new luxury models, Nissan and Toyota may capture as much as 25% of the U.S. market, Mr. Lawson says.  "It's not inconceivable that European luxurycar-makers' sales will be down 20% next year" as a result, he says.  U.S. sales of European luxury autos slipped about 10% in the first half, after skidding 17% last year and 10% in 1987.  Just yesterday, Daimler-Benz AG said its first-half group net income fell 1%, citing weaker personal car sales in West Germany and the U.S. Meanwhile, Jaguar's U.S. sales are off about 5.4% this year.  But Jaguar seeks to upstage Lincolns and Cadillacs rather than the Japanese newcomers, insists David Boole, a Jaguar official.  The average European luxury car sells for $15,000 more than the most lavish Lincolns and Cadillacs -- up from about $8,000 in the early 1980s, he noted.  With its new "entry level" car, Jaguar hopes "to get as close as possible to the top end of the domestic luxury-car {price} range," Mr. Boole says.  The Infiniti and Lexus "could be very fine cars, but we think they are insignificant compared with Cadillac and Lincoln."  Jaguar's stripped-down version is part of a broader U.S. plan to promote four different XJ6 sedans instead of the current two, Mr. Boole says.  The car maker will continue to sell the fancier Vanden Plas version for $48,000, but drop the $44,000 one.  Instead, it will offer a model for $43,000 and another pricier one for $53,000.  At the same time, Jaguar today unveils a four-liter engine for its entire XJ6 range at the Frankfurt Motor Show in West Germany.  The previous 3.6 liter engine stirred discontent among some U.S. customers, who thought the cars lacked power during initial acceleration.  The four-liter engine "will help, but it won't be the answer" for Jaguar's ailing U.S. sales, suggests Gavin Launder, an auto-industry analyst at British brokers Kleinwort Benson Securities, who is equally skeptical about prospects for a stripped-down version of the XJ6.  Jaguar's new U.S. aggressiveness contrasts sharply with its belated introduction of a discount program.  In mid-June, Jaguar became perhaps the last luxury-car maker to begin such a program, trying to sell 1,000 XJ6 sedans by July 10 through a temporary $5,000 price cut.  The rebate caught on only after Jaguar extended it to mid-August and offered it to another 14,000 U.S. Jaguar owners besides the initial 11,000.  As of Aug. 3l, more than 400 of the 1,000 cars remained unsold, a second Jaguar official said.  What Jaguar really needs, many industry analysts say, is to hasten development of a completely new car -- so it can compete not only against the Japanese and the Americans but against new European entries in the tough U.S. market.  But that won't happen while production costs soar and earnings slump.  The financial crunch may force Jaguar to form a friendly product-development link soon with a U.S. or European car maker.  "It would have to be someone with a lot of elbows whom nobody else wants to be associated with, such as Daimler-Benz or Volvo," suggested Nomura's Mr. Lawson.  Jaguar would benefit in another way, he added.  The tie-up would damp the enthusiasm of any would-be bidder.  @ ---  @ Jaguar's U.S. Slowdown  @ 1984 1985 1986 1987 1988 1989  @ World-wide  @ sales  @ (billions of  @ dollars)* 0.98 1.15 1.28 1.55 1.66 N.A.  @ World-wide  @ pretax profit 26.3-  @ (millions of  @ dollars)* 141.3 187.4 186.6 149.8 73.4 30.9@  @ U.S. auto  @ sales 18,044 20,528 24,464 22,919 20,727 12,400#  @ *Pounds converted at current rates  @  @Projections by stock analysts  @ #Through August  Nissan Motor Corp., in a bid to boost market share at the expense of Detroit's Big Three auto makers and other rivals in a sluggish sales environment, said it is cutting prices on an important compact car line.  Nissan said its cheapest 1990 Stanza model would have a base price 6% lower than that of its predecessor, even though the new car has a restyled exterior and a new engine that puts out 47% more power than the 1989 model.  A 1989 Stanza GXE with the air-conditioning option sells for $15,074, or $299 more than a 1990 GXE that will have air conditioning as standard equipment.  Nissan's move -- and similarly modest price increases planned by several other foreign auto makers -- will intensify the battle for market share among the Big Three and their overseas rivals.  In 1987 and 1988, the falling dollar helped to force up foreign car prices and shelter Detroit.  But the largest Japanese auto makers, as well as some European companies, are using the dollar's resurgence this year either to cut prices or keep price increases modest.  A higher dollar makes the cost of goods produced overseas cheaper for U.S. consumers and thus gives foreign manufacturers flexibility to cut prices or add new features, without raising prices significantly.  The price of the cheapest 1990 Stanza model will be $11,450, or $749 less than that of its less powerful predecessor.  Nissan's decision is the latest in a series of moves by foreign auto makers to cut prices on important car lines at a time when the Big Three U.S. auto makers are aggressively raising base prices on most of their 1990 models.  The domestic manufacturers are blaming airbags and other new safety equipment for forcing up their prices.  But foreign manufacturers, including Volkswagen AG, Honda Motor Co. and now Nissan, are holding down their prices in the face of the same requirements.  Volkswagen doesn't plan any price increases on its 1990 models, while Honda said last week it is freezing prices on most of its Acura Legend models.  Honda is raising prices on its Civic models, but only by 1% to 4%.  By contrast, the Big Three are boosting prices on most of their 1990 models by 3% to 9%.  General Motors Corp. did hold or cut base sticker prices on certain of its compact car models.  For example, the base price of the cheapest Chevrolet Corsica sedan dropped 4.9% for the 1990 model to $9,495.  However, GM also eliminated substantial discounts on optional equipment that had been offered in 1989 and raised individual option prices.  These moves, dealers say, will make the Corsica and other GM compacts more costly.  Nissan's decision also appears to be part of the company's strategy to regain its former prominence in the U.S. market.  The Stanza is designed to compete against the Toyota Camry and the Honda Accord.  But lately, the Stanza has been a distant also-ran in the compact sedan segment.  Stanza sales through Aug. 31 are down 5.4% to 30,822, compared with 32,575 a year earlier.  During the same period, Honda sold 239,405 Accords, and Toyota moved 175,524 Camrys.  A Nissan spokesman wouldn't release a sales projection for the 1990 Stanza, but said the new car is expected to sell much better than has its predecessor.  Marriott Corp., Bethesda, Md., said it formed a joint venture with a Japanese resort operator to acquire as many as nine hotels in Europe and the United Kingdom for about $400 million.  In addition, Marriott said it acquired Corporate Food Services, a private, New York-based concern with about 900 employees that manages executive dining rooms for about 50 large companies, banks and law firms.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Marriott, a lodging, restaurant and food-services concern, said it formed the European partnership with Adachi Enterprise Group, a private, Tokyo-based company founded by Kennosuke Adachi.  Mr. Adachi's company owns and operates ski resorts, golf courses, hotels and other leisure facilities in Japan.  The partnership, which already has purchased the 223-room London Marriott Hotel, expects to buy full-service and Courtyard by Marriott lodging properties that will be developed and managed by Marriott.  Copper futures prices fell, then recovered to finish higher as traders bought contracts on concern about supplies at a time when demand seasonally increases.  The December delivery gained three cents a pound to $1.2560; it had traded as low as $1.19.  The early softness was prompted by news that London Metal Exchange warehouse stocks of copper last week rose 4,800 tons to 87,675 tons, confounding traders' and analysts' expectations that those inventories would drop 2,000 to 4,000 tons.  However, stocks in warehouses of New York's Commodity Exchange did decline as expected, by 693 tons to 13,832 tons.  After the impact of the London stocks figure wore off, prices recovered sharply.  Some orders to sell December contracts were triggered when the price dipped below $1.20, one analyst said, but active demand from merchants developed and was the principal reason for the recovery.  Richard Hirsch, a metals broker at Sharps Pixely Inc., New York metals brokers, said the market's action was technically oriented and a "key reversal."  He explained that at $1.19 the December contract hit its lowest point in four months.  "Then the market sharply turned around and closed within 10 points (1/10th of a cent) of the high of the day.  That was a gain of some 6.6 cents, and it told traders that the market may have enough momentum to go higher still," Mr. Hirsch said.  Workers at the El Salvador mine in Chile voted narrowly to continue their two-week-old strike, according to an analyst.  "The nature of the vote indicates it isn't going to be a long, drawn-out affair," the analyst said.  In Papua New Guinea, a news service report tersely said that militant landowners on Bougainville Island had killed a "politician," but didn't elaborate, the analyst said.  The big Bougainville mine hasn't been operating since May 15 because of attacks from the native landowners.  Last week, there was an attempt to reopen the mine, but it was closed several hours later when buses carrying mine personnel were attacked.  In British Columbia, negotiations between officials of the Highland Valley mine and union are continuing with the aid of a mediator, the analyst said.  Bougainville and Highland Valley are two major suppliers to Japan, which also imports about 100,000 tons of copper from Chile annually.  This year it had been expected that Japan would buy even more copper than last year because of expanded needs.  Instead, it finds three of its major suppliers unable to meet commitments.  Fred Demler, metals economist for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., New York, pointed out added production problems.  The Cananea mine in Mexico, he said, which was recently declared bankrupt by the Mexican Government, is expected to be out of operation at least until November.  In Papua New Guinea, landslides over a week ago forced the closing of the Ok Tedi mine, a major producer which has been in operation about two years.  World-wide copper consumption has slowed somewhat but it's still higher than a year ago, according to Mr. Demler.  In the U.S., use is up 5.5% for the first seven months of this year, compared with the same period last year.  Globally, consumption for the first half of 1989 rose 1.1% over the year-ago period, "but in my opinion, that figure is going to be revised upward," he said.  In all of 1988, global use of copper was up 2.7% from 1987, Mr. Demler noted.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Petroleum futures were mixed, but crude oil made modest gains, despite growing concern among traders that a correction is overdue.  Although futures trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange was delayed one hour and 15 minutes by a waterpipe break in the computer room, activity was heavy.  A firm gasoline market helped push crude futures higher in early trading.  West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery reached a high of $19.92 a barrel, but then eased to $19.76, up only one cent for the day.  Crude contracts for other months were up between three cents and seven cents a barrel.  A report of a refinery fire, which later turned out to be minor, helped send gasoline prices sharply higher.  Unleaded gasoline for October delivery briefly topped 58 cents a gallon before falling back to settle fractionally higher at 57.07 cents.  Heating oil was down with the October contract ending at 56.01 cents a gallon, down 0.73 cent.  GRAINS and SOYBEANS: Futures prices closed lower in thin trading as many speculators appeared to stay on the sidelines ahead of today's crop yield forecasts from the U.S. Agriculture Department.  While the government estimates are expected to be trimmed somewhat from a month ago, they are expected to be near normal levels, compared with sharply lower yields last year as a result of the drought.  Prices gained ground yesterday in early trading on reports of below normal overnight temperatures across portions of the northern plains Sunday night, and predictions for more of the same last night.  But the brief rally fizzled, and bellwether contract month prices drifted lower for the rest of the session.  November contracts for soybeans closed down 3.5 cents at $5.91 a bushel on the Chicago Board of Trade, and Board of Trade corn futures for December delivery dipped one cent to close at $2.3825 a bushel.  SUGAR: Futures prices declined, reflecting quiet conditions in the world cash market.  The October contract ended with a loss of 0.15 cent at 13.43 cents a pound.  A dealer said traders were awaiting the reentry of India into the world market to buy physical sugar.  That nation recently rejected offers on 200,000 tons it was seeking to buy.  F.O. Licht, the West German statistical firm, said fairly heavy rains in the Soviet Union and in southern and southeastern Europe could reduce sugar content of the beets and delay harvests.  Conditions in West Europe were favorable for continued excellent development of the beet crop.  One analyst said that, on balance, Europe could have a better crop than last year.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Group said it will appoint Edwin Kantor chairman of its brokerage subsidiary, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., succeeding Robert E. Linton, who retired in April.  Several important divisions within Drexel, including its risk management, capital allocation and trading activities, will report to Mr. Kantor, currently vice chairman of the brokerage subsidiary, Drexel said.  But inside Drexel the new post is considered largely ceremonial, several Drexel officials said.  Mr. Kantor, who joined Drexel in 1955 and who is 57 years old, recently was the casualty of a management shakeup in which two proteges received major promotions and wound up with major segments of his old job.  As vice chairman, Mr. Kantor was responsible for all of Drexel's trading operations, including its highly profitable junk bond division in Beverly Hills, Calif.  The government's investigation of Drexel and its former chief of junk bonds, Michael Milken, left Mr. Kantor particularly vulnerable to criticism.  In March, Mr. Milken was indicted on 98 counts alleging racketeering and securities fraud.  Yesterday Drexel pleaded guilty to six felonies.  Mr. Linton was succeeded by John Shad as chairman of Drexel's parent company.  Mr. Linton's other post had been left vacant until Mr. Kantor's appointment.  ASK Computer Systems Inc., Mountain View, Calif., said it expects to report lower net income for the fiscal first quarter because of lower demand.  In the fiscal 1989 first quarter, the maker of management-information software systems had net income of $2.4 million, or 18 cents a share, on revenue of $39.3 million.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, ASK slumped $2.25 to close at $8.375.  The company said revenue for the first quarter ending Sept. 30 will remain level with last year's period.  ASK said its firstquarter projections are before the $19 million acquisition of Data 3 Systems Inc., a Santa Rosa, Calif., maker of manufacturing software systems.  ASK said the completion of the acquisition, expected sometime next week, may have a small, positive impact on first-quarter earnings.  Six more people were indicted in a continuing federal investigation of stock manipulation in two over-the-counter companies, Memory Metals Inc. and Memory Protection Devices Inc.  The three-year-old investigation already has resulted in the conviction of one investor and the indictment of another.  The first investor, Irwin Hyman, was sentenced last November to three years in prison after he pleaded guilty in April 1987 to conspiracy and wire fraud in manipulating the two companies' stocks.  The second investor, William Rodman, was indicted about the same time.  The status of his case was unavailable yesterday from the U.S. attorney's office in Manhattan.  The U.S. attorney's office said a grand jury indicted Pericles Constantinou, Joseph Tavormina, Larry Erber, Judith Fogel, Joseph Basile and Kalman Rosenberg, all of New York.  In a statement, the attorney's office said the indictment contains 67 counts of conspiring to manipulate both the initial public offerings and secondary market trading in the two companies.  The indictment, handed up yesterday, further charges that Mr. Constantinou acted as an undisclosed underwriter in the initial public offerings of the companies and "caused the shares of the companies to be distributed to controlled parties," said a statement from the U.S. attorney's office.  It alleges Mr. Constantinou and the other defendants engaged in various forms of prearranged trading to manipulate the secondary market in Memory Metals and Memory Protection after the initial offerings.  The U.S. attorney's office said Mr. Constantinou previously had been barred by court order from affiliating with any securities firm.  Mr. Rosenberg also is charged with obstruction of justice for allegedly lying to federal investigators about the stocks.  Alfred Pavlis, the assistant U.S. attorney handling the case, said the six defendants face a maximum sentence of five years in prison and a $250,000 fine on each count.  Arraignment is scheduled for Sept. 21.  None of the six defendants could be reached to comment yesterday.  In April 1987, Mr. Hyman admitted that he and others bought and sold stocks in the two companies through about 53 accounts at 18 brokerage firms.  The transactions were part of a scheme to "create the illusion of widespread ownership and interest" in the stocks, thus artificially boosting their prices, the government said.  That same month, Mr. Rodman was indicted on similar charges.  He also was charged with manipulating the stock of a third company.  Messrs.  Hyman and Rodman also previously had been barred from the securities industry -- Mr. Hyman by court order based on a previous fraud conviction, and Mr. Rodman by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Memory Metals, now Memry Corp., is a Stamford, Conn.-based maker of copper alloy devices.  Memory Protection, now Bogen Corp. in Farmingdale, N.Y., makes high-capacity battery holders, according to the U.S. attorney's office.  High Voltage Engineering Corp. said it dropped its $38-a-share hostile tender offer for Universal Foods Corp. of Milwaukee.  The company also withdrew its $42-a-share bid for a negotiated transaction.  Universal's stock closed at $34.125, down 62.5 cents, in composite New York Stock Exchange trading.  Clifford Press, High Voltage deputy chairman, said Universal's "rejection of our proposals, and its refusal even to meet with us . . . did not serve the interests of shareholders."  He said High Voltage concluded that the offer "cannot be consummated in light of the Wisconsin anti-takeover statute."  Under a Wisconsin law passed in 1987, even if most of the target company's shares have been tendered under an offer, a bidder must have board approval or wait three years to complete a merger.  The law is similar to those of a number of other states.  High Voltage has unsuccessfully challenged the law's constitutionality in lower courts, and has appealed the case to the U.S. Supreme Court.  Guy A. Osborn, Universal Foods president, said in a statement: "We are glad that the long, drawn out ordeal is finally concluded."  Chubb Corp. said it established an employee stock ownership plan representing about 5% of the insurance company's common shares outstanding.  The ESOP used a $150 million loan from Chubb to purchase about two million shares of newly issued common.  The new issue brings the number of total shares outstanding to about 42.6 million.  Chubb, based in Warren, N.J., also said it expects to buy back about two million shares of common on the open market or in private transactions.  The company said the cost of the new employee benefit plan will be partly offset by changes in Chubb's all-cash profit sharing plans.  A spokeswoman said the cash payout for the existing profit-sharing plan would be triggered at a higher level of profitability than before.  She said the 1989 awards wouldn't be affected by the new plan.  Chubb recently adopted a shareholder rights plan that would make a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Chubb shares closed at $78.875, unchanged.  Iraq expressed "surprise" at reports that Banca Nazionale del Lavoro's Atlanta branch wasn't authorized to grant the export credits at the center of an Italian banking scandal, saying it had signed agreements with the bank as long ago as 1982.  The Iraqi Embassy in Rome also said in an official statement that it intends to respect all the agreements it has undertaken with BNL, "in conformity with the law and with international protocol," and that it "hopes" BNL will do the same.  This apparently means that Iraq will continue to make interest payments on the loans, as long as BNL continues to grant new credits.  BNL officials declined to comment on the length of its banking relationship with Iraq and it is unclear how much of the bank's business with Iraq was authorized.  BNL sources said, however, that it appears that the vast majority of the transactions at the Atlanta branch occurred within the past few months.  BNL says that unauthorized credits totaling $2.64 billion were carried out largely by Christopher Drogoul, who was suspended as the manager of the Atlanta branch.  The bank has said that he had authority to grant loans of up to $500,000 without approval from managers in New York or at the bank's headquarters in Rome.  Iraq, for its part, asserted in its communique that its accords with BNL were "correct and legal" and that the funds were used for food, agricultural products as well as machines and equipment "purely for civil use."  This was a reference to growing speculation that the loans covered embargoed military equipment.  Iraq's comments followed reports over the weekend that Iraq might halt interest payments on its debt outstanding to BNL should BNL stop disbursing funds.  BNL's attorneys are looking at $920 million of export-credit guarantees made by the Atlanta branch to see whether they are binding, in hopes of avoiding increasing the bank's exposure to Iraq.  Iraq said that should the BNL Atlanta branch "show any kind of insolvency whatsoever" regarding the accords "the damages would be greater for the Italian companies and agencies" than for Iraq.  Iraqi officials couldn't be reached to comment further on the statement.  BNL declined to comment.  Iraq has been paying interest on the $1.7 billion so far disbursed by BNL, but sources close to the bank said principal payments aren't due to begin for one to two years.  The sources said Iraq, which already has a dispute with a group of Italian companies over payment for a 1980 militaryship contract that was frozen during its war with Iran, may seek to negotiate a solution to both problems through diplomatic channels.  In the ship dispute, Iraq paid for more than $1 billion of merchandise, much of which was never delivered because of the wartime embargo.  Some diplomatic contacts may have already taken place, Rome sources indicated.  Separately, Italy's export-credit insurance authority, the SACE, disclosed that its exposure to Iraq totaled 2.8 trillion lire ($1.96 billion) and that it was no longer insuring exports to Iraq.  SACE also told the news agency ANSA that it had paid indemnities to Italian exporters of about 500 billion lire due to non-payment by Iraq.  ---  Martha Brannigan in Atlanta contributed to this article.  Boeing Co. said the Spanish charter airline Viva Air ordered four 737-300 jetliners for about $130 million and took options to buy another four.  Deliveries of the Viva Air planes, which seat about 130 people each, are scheduled to begin in 1991, Boeing said.  The planes will be powered by CFM-56-3 engines built by CFM International, a venture of General Electric Co. and Snecma of France.  For year-old Viva, which now flies five leased Boeing 737-300s, the purchases are the first from the U.S. aerospace firm.  A state grand jury is investigating allegations that Carter Organization, one of Wall Street's leading proxy-solicitation firms, charged clients for expenses that the Carter firm didn't incur.  Reg Valin, chairman of Carter's parent, London-based VPI Group PLC, said yesterday in a telephone interview that New York state is investigating the Carter firm for alleged overbilling of expenses.  However, he said, "We're optimistic and hopeful that it will be very quickly resolved and crystal clear that there is nothing to answer and nothing to address, and our lawyers are of a similar opinion."  In addition to alleged overcharging by the firm, Mr. Valin said, the investigation concerns the personal tax situation of Donald C. Carter, who founded the firm in 1975 and sold it to VPI in July 1987.  Mr. Carter remains chairman of Carter Organization.  "I believe there is an aspect of the inquiry that relates to personal taxation" of Mr. Carter, Mr. Valin said.  He said the tax positions of Mr. Carter and of Carter Organization were closely intertwined because the organization had been a "subchapter S" corporation that wasn't subject to normal corporate income taxes.  Mr. Carter declined to comment on the state investigation.  Mr. Valin said the investigation has been under way for about seven months and that the grand jury has subpoenaed certain documents from the Carter firm, which it plans to provide.  The state investigation was reported yesterday in the New York Times.  A spokeswoman for New York Attorney General Robert Abrams declined to comment on whether the state is investigating Carter Organization or Mr. Carter.  Mr. Valin said the investigation apparently relates to billings that were made before VPI acquired Carter in July 1987.  He said he didn't know what prompted the state to begin its inquiry.  Largely through the efforts of Mr. Carter, Carter Organization built a reputation as an aggressive proxy solicitor that often worked for corporate raiders and charged relatively high fees.  Carter Organization also benefited from the merger boom of the 1980s, which has sharply increased the number of hostile takeover attempts and therefore boosted demand for the services of proxy solicitors.  The firms seek to gather proxies from shareholders to vote the holders' shares in favor of their clients' positions.  At the time of its sale to VPI, the Carter firm said it had pretax operating profit of $16 million in 1986 on revenue of $35.4 million.  The firm also said 45% of its 1986 revenue came from 20 clients, indicating an average fee for those clients of about $800,000 a year.  VPI, formerly known as Valin Pollen International, made an initial payment of $51 million for Carter Organization.  VPI could pay as much as $63.6 million more for Carter if the firm meets certain profit targets through next year.  Fireman's Fund Corp. said it holds a 13.2% stake in McFarland Energy Inc., but won't acquire more than 15% of the company's shares without McFarland's consent.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the Fireman's Fund said it owns 685,200 of McFarland's shares outstanding, including 10,700 shares purchased within the past 60 days.  The Fireman's Fund said it purchased the shares for investment purposes.  It also told McFarland Energy in a Sept. 1 letter that it will not acquire more than 15% of the company's shares as long as current management remains in charge.  McFarland is based in Santa Fe Springs, Calif., and Fireman's Fund is based in Greenwich, Conn.  Manufacturers Hanover Corp., badly in need of capital to shore itself up against its heavy load of troubled loans to developing countries, is near an agreement to sell a majority stake in its asset-based lending subsidiary, CIT Group Inc., to Japan's largest bank, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd.  Manufacturers, the nation's seventh-largest bank holding company, confirmed that "serious discussions" are under way with Dai-Ichi Kangyo.  A spokesman declined to say whether an agreement in principle has been reached.  Dai-Ichi executives in New York weren't available for comment.  Individuals close to the talks said they expect Dai-Ichi to pay about $1.2 billion for a majority stake.  The individuals said that would approximate the book value of the stake sold.  Manufacturers bought CIT from RCA Corp. for $1.51 billion in 1984.  By selling a majority instead of a minority stake in CIT, Manufacturers will remove CIT's $9 billion of assets from its balance, thereby improving many of its financial performance ratios.  But it will also continue to get income from its remaining stake in CIT.  Manufacturers entered talks with several Japanese banks earlier this year about possible asset sales or cash infusions.  The talks cooled during the spring, only to heat up again last month.  James J. McDermott Jr., research director of Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc., said of the possible sale, "It could be a real plus for them.  It's not totally surprising, given the fact that Manny Hanny is in the midst of a major recapitalization."  Among major U.S. banks, Manufacturers has greatest exposure to developing country debt.  Its loan loss reserve is about 22% of its medium and long-term exposure to those countries, and its tangible equity is less than half its portfolio of such loans.  Earlier this year, it indicated it was undertaking a major restructuring to bolster its reserves and its capital position and reorganize its lines of business.  Analysts expect the bank to make an offering of common shares later this year.  Mr. McDermott said the Dai-Ichi Kangyo transaction will eliminate about $300 million a year in goodwill expenses associated with the purchase of CIT in 1984.  He added that his one concern is how the bank will replace the lost income.  The impending sale of CIT closes a disappointing chapter for Manufacturers, which bought the unit in the expectation that its strong profits would help offset the drag on earnings of developing country debt.  Manufacturers badly misjudged the credit quality of CIT's portfolio, and basically spent the first three years overhauling the operation.  Moreover, CIT's informal culture clashed with the button-down style of the bank.  CIT had carved a niche for itself financing construction equipment and other smaller ticket items.  Under CIT Chairman Albert R. Gamper Jr.'s direction, Manufacturers restructured CIT and dropped those lines of business in favor of financing big-ticket items, like aircraft.  However, Manufacturers never consolidated CIT within the bank, partly because CIT has a better credit rating and can borrow more inexpensively than the bank.  Rumors circulated repeatedly that Manufacturers had CIT up for sale, and Manufacturers' executives repeatedly denied them.  But last year Manufacturers sold the consumer finance portion of CIT.  Last year, CIT earned $120 million, before amortization of good will.  That was well above the $40 million CIT earned in 1987 but still short of the $129 million reported the year the bank bought it.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Manufacturers shares closed at $42.50, up $2.875.  Precision Aerotech Inc. said its Micronics International Inc. subsidiary filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection.  The move came after the federal Defense Contract Administration Service imposed stringent requirements on the unit's production of missile safety devices that resulted in the shutdown of Micronics.  In addition to blaming the federal agency for its woes, Precision Aerotech said it will file a claim against the government seeking damages of more than $20 million "resulting from the forced closure" of Micronics.  A spokeswoman at the Defense Contract Administration Service office in El Segundo, Calif., said, "They haven't been building the fuses according to the specifications. . . .  They've been purchasing substandard parts and haven't been performing up to specifications.  We can't be sure we're getting what we're paying for."  Precision Aerotech last October disclosed that a Pentagon investigative agency had subpoenaed records regarding Micronics's production of the so-called "safe and arm" missile safety mechanisms, some of which had failed in Navy tests.  The company claims the designs for the safety devices provided to it by the Naval Air Systems Command were faulty.  Micronics said that on Aug. 28, the Defense Contract Administration Service imposed a so-called "Method D" for production, "which would have required Micronics to requalify or reprocure all of the parts and assemblies in its inventory."  The company added that the agency "suspended deliveries and imposed Method D on Micronics without reasonable cause and in contravention of Pentagon procurement rules, and knowingly forced Micronics to shut down."  The subsidiary in Brea, Calif., had 180 employees and $12 million in sales at its peak.  Since starting Trans World Music Corp. 17 years ago, Robert Higgins has pursued success with extraordinary grit.  He returned to work the day after jaw surgery and spoke at meetings through clenched teeth.  While such determination has served Mr. Higgins well -- his 68% stake in Trans World is worth $128 million and his annual pay exceeds $1 million -- he now needs as much grit as he can muster.  In five years, Trans World has grown from 64 stores, most of them in New York, to 437 outlets in 30 states.  Net income soared 11-fold, to $13.5 million, on a seven-fold increase in sales, to $268 million.  Few, if any, of its competitors have grown as fast.  But recently, Mr. Higgins's company has shown signs of excessive growth.  Industry watchers have also criticized the company, based in Albany, for paying too much to rent space and to buy companies and for failing to stock a broad enough selection of music.  More worrisome is Trans World's unprecedented drop in comparable-store sales, a key retailing indicator applied only to stores open for more than a year, in a crowded retail-music market.  "Digesting all that growth became pretty hectic," says John McRae, a securities analyst for Bear Stearns, an underwriter of Trans World's initial public stock offering in 1986.  Insists Mr. Higgins, 48 years old, of his company's recent travails, "We think it's a temporary condition."  Temporary or not, Trans World's troubles are a graphic illustration of what can happen when an entrepreneur takes the big step from regional to national player.  While many small companies aspire to build operations from coast to coast, pulling off such a feat often requires skills their founders haven't developed, such as managing remote outposts or sizing up faroff potential partners.  When Mr. Higgins, at age 18, took a $1-an-hour warehouse job for a record wholesaler in his hometown of Albany, he intended to work his way through college.  But he never even enrolled.  Instead, he ascended to the head of another record wholesaler's Eastern sales division, which had $50 million in annual sales.  Mr. Higgins formed Trans World in 1972, but the company didn't start its rapid growth until its founder noted a trend: consumers' growing demand for service and selection.  So in 1982, he sold Trans World's wholesale business and accelerated the opening or acquisition of retail music stores, most in shopping malls.  A few other chains -- The Musicland Group in Minneapolis and North Canton, Ohio-based Camelot Enterprises, among them -- also have rapidly added stores.  Yet even Trans World's investors weren't prepared for Mr. Higgins's pace.  In 1986, the company told prospective buyers of its stock it planned to expand by 20 stores annually.  In the following three years, it grew five times that fast.  But the good news was interrupted this year, beginning with the crippling of the company's strategy to open outlets inside other retail stores.  Trans World rented space in 41 stores owned by Crazy Eddie Inc., Edison, N.J., then a troubled consumer-electronics chain.  Mr. Higgins bet that Crazy Eddie would turn around.  Instead, the company filed for court protection from its creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  In March, 17 Crazy Eddie stores folded, taking the Trans World outlets with them.  Recently, Crazy Eddie announced that it will shut down another eight stores, damaging further Mr. Higgins's attempt, in one bold stroke, to firmly establish Trans World in the huge New York-New Jersey metropolitan market.  The rush to expand also is taking a toll on the music store chain's bottom line, analysts say.  In August, Trans World reported its net income, after growing at an average annual rate of 66% over five years, had plummeted 56% during the six months ended July 29, from $3 million on sales of $105.8 million to $1.3 million on sales of $127.5 million.  The most alarming news was Trans World's 6% drop during the second quarter in comparable-store sales.  Mr. Higgins blames the downturn on a recent combination of a dearth of hot-selling releases and a summer full of blockbuster movies that siphoned off business from music stores.  But analysts say problems digesting fast growth also contributed to the decline.  In addition, critics say the small, highly centralized buying staff Trans World has put in place to support its rapid growth has created "cookie-cutter" stores insensitive to regional differences in music tastes.  "They're just spread too thin," says Macey Lipman, head of the Los Angeles firm that bears his name and represents record companies and recording artists.  Trans World is faulted further for overpaying to lease space and buy stores.  "Some of the prices it was paying were higher than what anyone else was willing to pay," says Geoff Mayfield, associate director of retail research for Billboard magazine, a leading trade publication in the field.  Mr. Higgins counters he paid market rates.  Finally, there is the danger that Trans World and other fast-growing retailers will glut the market.  Last year, according to the Recording Industry Association of America, recorded-music sales increased 12%, to $6.25 billion.  According to a survey by Billboard, over a comparable period the number of music stores nationally grew at nearly twice that rate.  Despite his company's problems, Mr. Higgins is charging ahead.  "Music," he says, "is part of almost everyone's life."  BellSouth Corp. and LIN Broadcasting Inc. gained an advantage over McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. and the rest of the cellular telephone industry by agreeing to merge their properties into the nation's second-largest cellular concern.  The proposed merger may force McCaw, Kirkland, Wash., to raise its $110-a-share tender offer for the 90% of LIN it doesn't own.  The deal also shows that, to the surprise of Wall Street, the Baby Bells will aggressively participate in the consolidation of the infant industry, analysts and investors said.  "This is the cellular event of the year," said Frederick A. Moran, president of Moran Asset Management Inc., a money manager holding 500,000 LIN shares.  "The regional Bells have awoken."  But the announced structure of the BellSouth-LIN deal yesterday made it difficult for analysts to evaluate its worth.  Estimates ranged from $105 to $150 per LIN share, depending on the value placed on the 45.5 million potential customers the merged cellular company will have.  In addition to merging its cellular business with that of BellSouth, LIN would spin off its television broadcasting subsidiaries to LIN shareholders and pay them a special cash dividend of $20 a share.  The spinoff and merger will be tax-free.  BellSouth will own 50% of the new cellular company, with current LIN shareholders owning the remainder.  Thus, LIN shareholders would get some cash, new stock in a broadcasting company and hold on to their LIN shares as their stake in the new merged cellular company, analysts said.  The structure and range of values initially put on the LIN-BellSouth proposal illustrates once again the investment community's difficulty in valuing cellular companies.  One investment banker pointed out that publicly traded cellular companies currently are valued at between $55 and $200 per potential subscriber.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, LIN shares closed at $106.75, up $1.25, and McCaw Class A shares rose $1 to $39.50.  BellSouth shares closed at $51.25, up 75 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  One financial adviser involved in the pact said the combined cellular company could be worth about $10 billion (including $1.2 billion in new debt to cover the special cash dividend), with the cellular shares trading for about $90 each.  He pegged the TV-station business, which had $137 million in revenue last year and provided just over half of LIN's profits, at a range of $13 to $15 a share.  Adding those two items to the $20-a-share dividend, he comes up with an indicated total value of $125 for each current LIN share.  Dennis Leibowitz of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., one of the most influential cellular analysts, said he figured yesterday's announcement valued LIN shares at between $105 and $112 a share.  "If you are looking for a transaction that demonstrates cellular prices, you haven't got one," said Mr. Leibowitz.  "McCaw may claim their bid still is more attractive" because it offers cash to shareholders sooner than the BellSouth-LIN deal.  Most analysts, however, called the deal a suitable alternative to the McCaw offer, which LIN has been trying to repel since it was first made in June.  "Now McCaw has to respond," said analyst Peter Appert of C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. who valued the deal at between $108 to $112 per LIN share.  A McCaw spokesman said, "Since LIN and BellSouth have yet to file their application {documents necessary for a merger}, it would be inappropriate to review this merger proposal," the spokesman said.  But some shareholders balked at the latest LIN plan.  "We're disappointed they aren't taking steps to maximize shareholder value," said Richard Nye of Baker, Nye, an investment firm that holds more than 230,000 LIN shares for arbitrage purposes.  He said he would prefer to get a much larger sum of cash now instead of the $20 dividend plus the long-term ownership in the cellular and TV businesses.  But he said he hopes the latest pact "pressures McCaw into putting its best foot forward.  In fact, that may be the intention of {LIN Chairman Donald A.} Pels."  The BellSouth-LIN transaction is subject to regulatory approval, including that of federal Judge Harold Greene, who oversees the accord that broke up the Bell system in 1984.  At times, Judge Greene has taken over a year to approve Baby Bell transactions.  LIN said its shareholders will vote on the transaction within the next two months.  To execute the merger, LIN holders must approve a doubling of LIN's 54 million common shares outstanding.  Analysts said McCaw will probably watch the price of LIN shares in the next few weeks.  BellSouth's willingness to participate in such a transaction is likely to spark similar interest by the other Baby Bells.  Companies such as Southwestern Bell Corp. and Pacific Telesis, which have lots of cellular properties, are already beginning to see their shares valued at a higher level than the Bells that don't have much cellular business, analysts said.  The Bells are viewing the freewheeling cellular business as a growth vehicle to bolster revenues from their heavily regulated telephone operations.  The proposed cellular company would have the second-largest number of potential customers after McCaw, but with a total of 500,000 actual subscribers in more than 40 markets, it would have twice as many actual subscribers as any other major cellular player.  LIN's properties are particularly valuable because it has controlling stakes in cellular franchises in New York, Los Angeles, Houston, Dallas and Philadelphia, some of the nation's fastest-growing markets.  "It's a great deal for both companies," said Harvey R. Holding, BellSouth chief financial officer and executive vice president.  New York-based LIN holds off McCaw, and BellSouth, Atlanta, gains an interest in several important properties without having to pay outrageous prices.  "We have been unwilling to pay the prices that cellular companies are trading at today," Mr. Holding said.  LIN Chairman Pels will head the merged company as chairman and chief executive officer.  A BellSouth executive will become president and chief operating officer.  LIN also picks up BellSouth's cellular systems covering 28 million people.  That is significantly more than LIN's own population base of 18 million but in smaller and less lucrative markets, yet LIN gets to own half of the combined company.  For BellSouth, the pact lets it place a slimly profitable operation in the hands of a proven cellular company.  And BellSouth can do so without the earnings dilution that would result if it had to acquire LIN outright and take big write-offs for good will.  Mr. Pels said BellSouth first approached LIN about a year ago to propose some kind of business link.  Because a telephone company can't own a television station, a merger would require spinning off LIN's TV outlets.  The spinoff LIN announced in May wasn't related to the BellSouth talks, Mr. Pels said.  The two parties spent about two months negotiating, with Wasserstein Perella & Co. representing LIN and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. advising BellSouth.  Talks didn't intensify until last weekend.  "We didn't have any confidence that we'd be able to complete the deal until Saturday," said Mr. Holding.  The boards of both companies met separately Sunday to approve the deal, and lawyers finished the final details early Monday morning.  Had it not been for the McCaw offer, "We probably wouldn't have been creative enough to do this deal," Mr. Pels said.  LIN Vice President Michael Plouf, noting that LIN would be almost impervious to an unwanted takeover if the BellSouth transaction is completed, said the company is well aware of the risks if the pact doesn't go through.  "Any company that isn't protected by a founding family or by dual-class voting rights has to realize it's vulnerable," he said.  "That's simply the way the business world works today."  ---  @ New Cellular Powerhouse  Where the proposed BellSouth/Lin Broadcasting combination would rank among the top cellular companies based on population in service area (POPs)  @ Total  @ Net POPs Subscribers  @Company (In millions) (In thousands)  @McCaw Cellular 50 258  @BellSouth/Lin B'cast. 46 483  @PacTel Cellular 30 262  @Southwestern Bell 27 244  @GTE Mobilnet 22 127  @Bell Atlantic 19 100  @NYNEX 18 127  @Ameritech 17 146  @US West 15 83  @Centel 14 61  NOTE: Combination includes 28 million POPs and 255,000 subscribers for BellSouth and 18 million POPs and 228,000 subscribers for Lin Broadcasting  @Source: Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette  NCR Corp., Dayton, Ohio, introduced three desktop computers based on Intel Corp.'s 80286 and 80386sx microprocessors.  One of the new models uses International Business Machines Corp.'s Micro Channel data bus design, marking NCR's first use of the technology.  Separately, NCR unveiled a new member of its Tower 32 computer line, built around Motorola Inc.'s 68030 microprocessor.  Based on American Telephone & Telegraph Co.'s Unix operating system, the machine can accommodate up to 64 desktop computers operating in a local network.  The new Tower 32/700 model is priced at $33,245 for a basic system.  The three personal computers are priced from $1,995 to $6,345, depending on memory and data storage configurations, and are available immediately.  They offer standard features usually available only as options, NCR said.  After two abortive attempts at securing a foothold above the crucial 2.00 Deutsche mark level, the dollar sagged to finish softer.  And many foreign-exchange traders have become less sanguine about the dollar's ability to stage an enduring rally above the important psychological barrier.  Although the U.S. currency has enjoyed healthy gains in the past two weeks, based on an apparent rebound in U.S. economic activity, the dollar has met resistance to further progress.  Traders said the U.S. currency may be near the top of its current trading range, capped by uncertainty about the duration of the recovery and the anticipation of interest rate increases in Japan and Germany.  But the immediate focus of the market is a slew of U.S. economic indicators due at the end of the week that could herald the end of recent exuberance for the dollar, dealers cautioned.  Apprehension over the figures and the threat of central bank intervention should keep pressure on the dollar, making unlikely a convincing assault on the 2.00 mark barrier in the first part of the week, many traders said.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9866 marks, down from 1.9950 marks late Friday, and at 146.70 yen, down from 147.20 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5460, up from $1.5375.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 146.80 yen, down from Monday's Tokyo close of 147.77 yen.  After encountering heavy resistance around 2.00 marks and 148 yen in Asian trading Monday, the dollar fell back, hastened by reports of Bank of Japan intervention.  Another run at 2.00 marks was rebuffed in European trading, and the dollar slid to trade in a choppy range on either side of 1.99 marks and 147 yen through New York dealings.  Reports that the Fed sold dollars at least once, in the early New York morning, added to the jittery tone, dealers said.  Near the end of the day, a flurry of profit-taking pushed the dollar to its lows of 1.9845 marks and 146.65 yen.  Dealers said many participants were disappointed that the dollar didn't appear more resilient.  The U.S. currency bounced up briefly in the New York afternoon on comments from Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl, who said the economic situation in the U.S. and Europe is "very, very satisfying."  He added that with a tight U.S. monetary policy, "it's easy to explain why the dollar is strong."  Traders took the remarks to mean that the Bundesbank isn't overly concerned with the dollar's recent gains.  However, Baruch Deutsch, a trader at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., noted that Mr. Poehl's statement made no predictions for the dollar.  "I basically think that Poehl has summarized what has happened to now, but he didn't give us any clues for the future," Mr. Deutsch said.  Dealers warn that if U.S. economic activity again flags, foreign investment will slide, reducing the demand for dollars.  An equal problem, the dealers said, is that the U.S. Federal Reserve would then consider extending a summer series of interest rate cuts, reducing the attractiveness of dollar-denominated interest-bearing instruments.  Overseas, a good likelihood that Germany and Japan will raise their interest rates soon to restrain inflation pressures and defend their currencies will make the dollar seem even less desirable, traders said.  "We'll probably see {rate increases} in Japan in two months and Europe maybe sooner," said Garrett Glass, vice president of foreign exchange for First National Bank of Chicago.  Mr. Glass said that with the German economy growing at a brisk pace, the Bundesbank may not wait until signs of building inflation can be confirmed.  "These guys are practicing preventive medicine -- sort of the holistic approach to interest rate management," he said.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $359.20 an ounce, down 20 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 2.1 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $358.50 an ounce.  Michael Blair, president of Enfield Corp. said he resigned from the board of this financial and management concern at the request of Hees's leading shareholder, Peter Bronfman.  In a prepared statement, Mr. Blair, 44 years old, said "Since Mr. Bronfman effectively holds a controlling interest in Hees and wrote to me personally asking that I resign, I ultimately decided this was the appropriate course."  Mr. Bronfman wasn't available for comment.  Viratek Inc., Costa Mesa, Calif., said it asked the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to approve the distribution of its drug ribavirin, while it is being tested, to treat certain patients who are infected with the AIDS virus, but show no symptoms of the disease.  The "Treatment IND" request, if approved, wouldn't allow marketing of the drug, which the FDA approved last April for large-scale testing.  The pharmaceutical concern's current filing is intended to provide alternative therapy for patients afflicted with a life-threatening disease but aren't involved in the tests.  Ribavirin is approved in the U.S. to treat infants with a respiratory infection, but for no other uses.  It has been approved in other countries for a number of nonAIDS related uses.  Viratek is 74%-owned by ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc., also based in Costa Mesa.  Epic Healthcare Group Inc. of Dallas sued American Medical International Inc. in connection with American Medical's pending $3.35 billion acquisition by IMA Holdings Corp., an investment group.  The complaint, filed in district court in Dallas County, alleges that the acquisition would breach an indemnity agreement between Epic and American Medical.  Epic contends that the IMA acquisition will render American Medical's assets "beyond the reach" of any Epic claims by saddling the company with more than $2.4 billion in debt and other obligations.  Epic, a closely held hospital concern, was formed last year when it bought 36 of American Medical's hospitals for about $500 million in cash, $230 million in preferred stock and a note payable by the new company.  American Medical agreed to indemnify Epic against certain malpractice claims, Medicare claims, possible future tax liabilities and other claims, according to the suit.  In the suit, Epic seeks to place American Medical's stock and certain assets under a constructive trust.  If the IMA acquisition is completed, Epic seeks actual and punitive damages of at least $200 million.  IMA, an investor group that includes First Boston Corp. and the Pritzker family of Chicago, is in the midst of a $1.93 billion tender offer for as many as 68.8 million, or 94%, of American Medical's shares.  IMA also has agreed to assume $1.42 billion in debt, giving the acquisition a total indicated value of about $3.35 billion.  A spokeswoman for American Medical said the complaint is without merit and shouldn't affect the IMA transaction.  A spokeswoman for First Boston declined to comment on the suit.  Separately, American Medical International said it reached a definitive agreement to sell its 64% stake in Professional Healthcare Systems Inc. to PHS's employees through an employee stock ownership plan restructuring.  The restructuring will inject $15 million into PHS, including an investment by Epic.  Brokerage stocks are out of the doghouse.  But investors are still looking for hard evidence that the stocks won't bite.  Once-bitten investors remember 1987, when shares of major brokerage houses like Merrill Lynch, Shearson Lehman Hutton and PaineWebber declined 50%-60% between August and December.  But now, after two years in which they dared not speak each other's names, brokerage houses are once again recommending each other's stocks and raising estimates of one another's earnings.  "Close to 100%" of revisions on brokerage-house earnings have been upward lately, says John Zbesko, a vice president at Zacks Investment Research.  In the past three months, according to Zacks, the average estimate of this year's earnings has risen 31% for A.G. Edwards & Sons (to $2.32 a share), 25% for Morgan Stanley (to $9.65) and 16% for Salomon Brothers (to $2.56).  Proponents of brokerage stocks, like Kidder Peabody analyst Alison Deans, who rates all seven of the brokerage houses she follows as buys, say that investors are tired of clutching their certificates of deposit and Treasury bills now that interest rates have come down from the high levels of a few months ago.  Furthermore, the bulls say, many of the brokerage stocks are still reasonably valued, in relation to earnings or book value.  But skeptics note that some brokerage stocks have already had pretty good moves this year.  And they also note that the group lives or dies by the market's performance, which has looked rather shaky for the past week.  Brokerage houses may be "mighty firms," but they are "slaves of the market," says John Keefe, analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert.  "When prices rise, they make money.  When prices fall, they don't."  Moreover, brokerage stocks normally excel during "the first leg of a bull market," says Perrin Long, a veteran analyst with Lipper Analytical Services.  If you view the 1987 crash as a correction in a continuing bull market -- as Mr. Long does -- then it's late in the game to expect more than an average performance from most brokerage stocks.  Even so, Mr. Long likes some individual brokerage issues "for the long term," meaning the next four to five years.  His favorites include two stocks especially popular on Wall Street now -- A.G. Edwards & Sons and Bear Stearns -- plus Morgan Stanley.  One of the biggest admirers of brokerage stocks now is Kidder's Ms. Deans, though she gives her strongest buy rating only to Bear Stearns.  Ms. Deans rattles off several reasons that the brokerage group should continue do well for the rest of this year.  The main factor, she says, is declining short-term interest rates.  When rates are high, as they were a few months ago, investors stay away from the stock market.  When rates fall, then "cash equivalents," such as T-bills, start to look stodgy and stocks look better.  Ms. Deans thinks the brokers' post-crash strategy -- gritting their teeth and selling CDs and money funds -- is about to pay off.  Now this money is trickling into stocks, which generate higher commissions.  Because times have been tough, most brokerage firms "appear to have done pretty good cost cutting," Ms. Deans says.  Added pluses are a sympathetic administration (George Bush wants to cut capital-gains taxes) and the troubles of the savings and loan associations, which may give brokerage houses less competition in the future for consumers' dollars.  Admirers of St. Louis-based A.G. Edwards point to the firm's skill in keeping costs down.  "They don't ride in limos.  They're not flying first class," says Mr. Long.  In fact, he says, Edwards officials even pay for their own food in the executive dining room.  By keeping costs low, Edwards can be profitable even though most of its brokers aren't big producers.  The industry average is about $150,000 to $160,000 in commissions per broker, says Brenda McCoy, analyst at PaineWebber.  She guesses that the average Edwards broker brings in only 70 to 75% of that.  But the Edwards brokers do their job without a lot of support staff to type their letters and fetch their sandwiches.  "The ratio of support people, nonproducing people, to brokers is much lower at Edwards than it is at other firms," says Ms. McCoy.  "It is 1 to 1 or less," compared with 3 to 1 or more at some firms.  Edwards is also in a segment of the brokerage business -- serving the mass market of individual investors -- that is on the rebound.  At a pure retail house, such as Edwards, an increase in commission business makes a big difference in the bottom line, fast.  A retail brokerage house is like an airliner: It costs almost the same to fly whether the seats are empty or full.  When business picks up, most expenses stay about the same.  Adding brokers doesn't jack up fixed costs much because brokers are generally compensated on a percentage basis -- often about 40% of commission revenue.  Bear Stearns has a big following for a different reason: It dominates specialized niches, notably clearing stock transactions for some 750 other brokerage houses.  Rivals also say good things about Bear Stearns's leadership, particularly chief executive officer Alan C. "Ace" Greenberg.  Morgan Stanley has somewhat fewer admirers at the moment.  Those who recommend it invoke its outstanding reputation in investment banking, mergers and acquisitions.  A carriage-trade house, Morgan does little retail brokerage.  But it has done well in merchant banking, taking a stake in companies bought out by their managements with Morgan Stanley's help.  Dean Eberling, an analyst for Shearson, figures Morgan's interest in 40-45 such deals is worth $750 million, or $20 a share. (Morgan closed at 78 7/8 yesterday.)  The brokerage stock with the best gain in the past six months is Charles Schwab, which has jumped by two-thirds.  That's partly because Schwab was bashed down so badly after the crash, dropping from 17 in September 1987 to below 7 during parts of the next 15 months.  Schwab isn't widely followed by analysts, and, according to Zacks, isn't currently recommended by any.  One reason, Mr. Long says, is that Schwab "makes very little money from the discount brokerage" for which it is famous.  Much of Schwab's profit, Mr. Long says, comes from interest on funds customers leave on deposit.  Wall Street is split on Shearson.  According to Zacks, the stock is recommended by three of the seven analysts who follow it.  But the shares have underperformed the market in the past six months, and the average estimate of 1989 earnings dropped 9% to $1.62 a share between the end of May and the end of August, according to Zacks.  Some rivals say Shearson is still feeling indigestion as a result of the massive meals it ate in 1984 (Lehman Brothers) and 1988 (E.F.  Hutton).  Shearson's pretax profit margin was above 17% in both 1982 and 1983, observes Lipper's Mr. Long.  In 1984 its profit margin fell to 7.5% and now it is still lower, at about 3.2%.  Shearson has a sprawling structure and "too many employees across the board," says Mr. Long.  "I may be a six-beer man, you may be a seven-beer man, but we all have our limits."  ---  @ Brokerage Stocks:  @ Which Ones Are Hot?  @ Six-month price change through Sept. 8:  @ Charles Schwab 65.8%  @ A.G. Edwards 26.9  @ PaineWebber 26.4  @ Morgan Stanley 18.6  @ Merrill Lynch 18.4  @ Dow Jones Industrials 18.0  @ Bear Stearns 7.4  @ Shearson 1.1  @ Salomon 0.0  Sensor Control Corp. said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it lowered its stake in Newport Electronics Inc. to 18.87% and plans to continue reducing its position.  Sensor, a Sunnyvale, Calif., maker of pressure sensors and gauges, had agreed to acquire Newport, but Newport canceled the pact last month after another company, High Technology Holding Co., bid for 35% of the stock at a higher per-share price.  Sensor said it sold 25,266 shares as part of the tender offer to High Technology and an additional 20,000 shares on the open market.  Sensor now controls 211,235 shares, assuming the exercise of an option, and said in the filing that it would sell some or all of the remainder, depending on market conditions.  Bowne & Co., New York, said slimmer operating margins in the financial printing business led to a 35% drop in net income in the third-quarter ended July 31.  Sales edged up 2% to $48.7 million from $47.6 million.  Net was $1.96 million, or 11 cents a share, vs. $3.03 million, or 17 cents a share, a year earlier.  "Activity in the marketplace in the most recent quarter was relatively unchanged compared with the second quarter," said Richard H. Koontz, president and chief executive officer.  "Despite the pressure on margins caused by continued overcapacity within the industry and rampant price cutting, our operating income showed significant improvement over our second quarter."  Shares outstanding in the most recent quarter were 17.3 million compared with 18.2 million in 1988.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Bowne shares closed at $12.75, down 37.5 cents.  In the first nine months, net income was $4.63 million on sales of $139.5 million vs. $9.1 million on sales of $137.6 million a year earlier.  United Kingdom retail-sales volume grew a modest 0.4% in August, soothing fears that consumer demand was rebounding strongly after two slack months.  Separately, August producer-output prices, or those of manufactured goods, rose 0.3% from July, the U.K. government reported.  August input prices, or prices of raw materials and fuels bought by manufacturers, fell an unadjusted 0.3% from July.  Both sets of figures suggest moderate economic growth but little likelihood of any near-term easing in monetary policy, which aims to reduce Britain's inflation rate, now at 8.2%, based on retail prices.  Seagram Co.'s board cleared the big New York-based distiller to buy as much as 5% of its shares outstanding on the open market in the year beginning Sept. 25.  Seagram has "had a stock repurchase program for three or four years" and renews it a year at a time, a spokesman said, adding, "There's no particular reason.  It's a good investment."  Under the current buy-back, which expires Sept. 23, Seagram has bought nearly 2.5 million shares for an average US$71.50 each.  At Aug. 28, Seagram had more than 96 million shares outstanding.  The shares closed in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday at $81.125, up 25 cents.  For the six months ended July 31, profit climbed 20% to $394.9 million, or $4.07 a share.  Sales rose 16% to $2.53 billion.  Toronto Dominion Bank consented to a final judgment in a Securities and Exchange Commission case that charged the bank's New York office with illegally extending credit to investors.  The SEC recently had filed a lawsuit accusing two investors of a scheme to purchase millions of dollars of securities without sufficient funds to pay for them, and pocketing the profits when the securities rose in price.  Such a practice is called "free-riding."  The bank had improperly extended credit to the purchasers, the SEC said.  Without admitting or denying the charges, the bank agreed to establish internal compliance committees to monitor its U.S. securities clearance staff, activities and training programs.  In addition, Toronto Dominion promised to conduct all of its U.S. securities clearance activities through Toronto Dominion Bank Trust, a subsidiary of the bank, or through an SEC registered broker-dealer not affiliated with the bank.  At the time the case was filed, the bank said it was "an innocent bystander."  "This is the first case in which the SEC has sued a bank for {securities} clearance activities," said Martin A. Kuperberg, SEC associate regional administrator.  The judgment, in federal court in Manhattan, also bars Toronto Dominion from further securities-laws violations.  Arthur English, senior vice president for Toronto Dominion's U.S. division, said the agreement reflects the bank's desire "to put the matter behind us and continue our cooperation with the commission."  The settlement stems from a complaint filed by the SEC Aug. 2, that charged investors Jury Matt Hansen and Fergus M. Sloan Jr. with making securities purchases with insufficient funds through a network of 250 accounts at more than 100 brokerage firms, using 76 fictitious names.  The SEC alleged the men, through their firm Graycliff International, paid for the purchases the next day if they sold at a profit, and canceled the purchases if prices fell, leaving brokers with the losses.  They made an estimated $1 million from the scheme, the SEC said.  SEC charged that Toronto Dominion abetted the scheme by extending credit to Graycliff in an amount that exceeded the maximum loan value of the collateral securing the credit.  EXECUTIVE PAY RAISES next year will be little changed from 1989 boosts.  Companies budgeting merit increases for 1990 plan to lift executive salaries 5.8% from this year's level, the same as in 1989, consultant Mercer Meidinger Hansen finds.  Another consultant, Sibson & Co., puts the expected boost for executives and officers at 5.7%, off slightly from the 5.9% awarded this year.  By both surveys, however, executives will fare better than most workers.  For all employees, Mercer sees an increase of 5.5%, up from this year's 5.4%; Sibson comes up with an unchanged 5.4% boost.  Increasingly, though, more companies establish variable pay programs to reward top performers throughout corporate ranks.  Sibson says 46% of the companies it surveyed now award pay-for-performance increases to employees below the executive level; a further 7% plan to introduce such programs by the end of 1990.  With inflation near 5%, most workers face "yet another year of treading water," consultant Towers Perrin says.  THE SUREST ROUTE to the top seems no clearer now than it ever was.  Is finance, marketing, engineering or law the best path to the chief executive's chair?  Daryl Renschler, a physicist who is CEO of SL Industries, sees "the pendulum on the side of financial and legal expertise now."  But Mike Hawkins, a National Semiconductor Corp. vice president, says a technical company needs technical talent at the helm.  And Barbara Franklin, a director of several companies, says more firms look for executives who have "managed something that's not in the U.S."  Management Practice Inc., a consultant, says 23% of the CEOs appointed at major companies last year were technical specialists; finance people got only 14% of the jobs.  Companies, though, clearly look beyond resumes.  Cyprus Minerals Co. shifts several top managers to test their potential as CEOs.  The chief financial officer, for one, now heads coal and iron-ore operations.  "How well he handles that will be key to whether he is selected," says Kenneth Barr, who retires as CEO next year.  SUMMER'S END brings massive changing of the guard in temporary help.  September school bells signal the return to classes of high school and college students who took jobs this summer.  But the tolling bells also mean that parents of elementary school youngsters are free to resume work.  Manpower Inc., a temporary-help agency that counted 40,000 students among its 120,000 temps this summer, signs up 40,000 young parents to pick up where the students left off.  "It's the essence of job sharing," says Mitchell Fromstein, Manpower's president.  Aetna Life & Casualty says 200 of its 1,600 temporary employees in Hartford, Conn., were students who are being replaced mostly by mothers with young children.  But Frank Liguori, Olsten Corp. president, says parents are only part of the ever-changing inventory of available workers.  "There is a big pool out there," he says.  Another switch comes with the Christmas break when college kids seek jobs and parents want to stay home.  EXECUTIVE DENIAL: Fully 35% of the executives who flunked cardiac stress tests given this year by the Life Extension Institute haven't followed up with recommended visits to cardiologists or otherwise modified their behavior, the institute says.  ONE IN THREE companies rearranged working hours this summer to give workers longer weekends or other flexibility, the American Society for Personnel Administration finds.  Most did it to boost morale; 34% say it also increased productivity.  SUGGESTION BOX ideas from employees saved companies $2.2 billion last year, up 10% from 1987, the National Association of Suggestion Systems says.  For their inspiration, the workers won $160 million.  EMPLOYERS SHOULD be required to provide health insurance to all full-time employees, eight of 10 Americans believe, according to a Gallup poll for the Employee Benefit Research Institute.  WANDERING AROUND draws raves as a management tool.  But don't force it.  "You can't find out much sitting in an office," says Dresser Industries' CEO John Murphy.  Going into the field brings contact with lower-rung workers "more willing to tell it as it is," he says.  At Mattel Inc., "there's a creative synergy when I move around," says Diana Troup, a senior vice president.  William Donovan, Gillette Co.'s personnel director, says his traveling "isn't aimless, I'm not looking over shoulders."  Lynnette King, a senior vice president of CalFed Inc.'s California Federal Bank, says wandering taught her that it took computers at some branches excessively long to prepare a report.  She got the computers reprogrammed.  But Michael Conway, America West Airlines president, warns some managers "can wander and never accomplish a thing."  Workers, he says, see through executives who aren't sincere.  Consultant Peter Grazier says the wandering should include contact with customers as well as workers.  THE CHECKOFF: One-track minds: An investment banker off to visit his family in Washington state jests he plans a takeover offer for Mount Rainier and will spin off some trails to finance the deal. . . .  Why bother?  Nearly half the resumes sent to prospective employers receive less than a minute's attention, Transition Team, an outplacement firm, says.  France, as it prepares to restructure the country's chemical business, is moving to replace the chairman of its second largest oil company, Total-Cie.  Francaise des Petroles, with Serge Tchuruka, a 51-year-old chemical executive.  Officials say they intend to have Mr. Tchuruk named to Total's board tomorrow.  He isn't scheduled to take over the chairmanship until the current chairman, Francois-Xavier Ortoli, reaches the retirement age of 65 in February, they said.  Mr. Tchuruk has won praise from both the left and right in France for his success in turning around Orkem S.A., a mishmash of unprofitable chemical companies grouped into a single entity after the Socialists first gained power here in 1981.  By dint of heavy government subsidies and layoffs, Orkem turned a profit in 1987, after 20 years of losses by its various units.  Mr. Tchuruk's planned appointment sparked speculation that the government will simply merge Orkem with Total.  Officials say Orkem, despite its profits, must be merged with some other company because it remains too small to compete in the European Community after trade barriers are cut at the end of 1992.  But officials said Orkem's fate isn't decided.  France's main chemical companies, as well as its oil companies, are either owned outright by the government or include heavy government investment.  Hence, despite the trend toward a hands-off policy toward more industries, the government sees nothing wrong in imposing its reorganization plan on the chemical business.  Hospital Promotion  Rankles Prudential  SOME HOUSTON hospitals are trying to lure customers by offering to waive the patients' share of bills and collect only from insurance companies.  Not surprisingly, the promotional offer has angered at least one major insurer.  Prudential Insurance Co. protested the practice in a letter to hospitals, saying it undermines efforts to promote cost-effective use of health services by asking patients to bear some of their medical expenses.  It also threatens to siphon patients from a preferred provider network Prudential has set up.  The network of hospitals and doctors provides lower-cost service in return for getting a certain volume of patients; consumers pay a deductible and part of each bill.  Some doctors tell patients seeking treatment at network hospitals that other hospitals would accept the insurance share as full payment, says Vincent Contorno, a Prudential vice president.  Hospitals probably will try to recover the waived revenue with other charges, Mr. Contorno says, so the practice will "come back and hit all of us in {the form of} higher costs for people covered under benefit plans."  Prudential says it now investigates every non-network claim, usually interviewing the patient, to determine the actual bill, and then deducts the patient's "saving" from its claims payment.  Garrett Graham, president of the Greater Houston Hospital Council, said Prudential's response was "arbitrary" and that it should have worked through established industry committees to raise its concerns.  He sees no problem with the hospitals' marketing technique.  "This is a competitive world," he said.  "I don't think this is a monumental thing."  Company Ties Gifts  To Cost Cutting  FOR ITS MILLION dollar donation to Hartford Hospital in Connecticut, United Technologies Corp. got more than its name on a plaque.  It also won the hospital's pledge to reduce health-care costs.  The grant, announced yesterday, will be spread over five years, and half of each year's installment is contingent on the hospital's meeting cost-saving goals.  "We have challenged Hartford Hospital to identify cost-containment strategies that will earn all of us a return on this investment," said Robert F. Daniell, United Technologies' chief executive officer.  The hospital already passed the first test: More than 95% of patients undergoing routine cardiac catheterizations -- a diagnostic procedure for heart disease -- were treated as outpatients last year, saving $150,000 in overnight hospitalization charges.  Hartford Hospital's next challenge: to save $125,000 this year by switching hospitalized patients more quickly to oral medication from intravenous therapy.  United Technologies, a Hartford-based jet engine and industrial products concern, has used corporate philanthropy before as an incentive to trim health costs in communities where it is a major employer.  Since 1982, it has donated more than $2 million to 16 medical facilities in Connecticut, Ohio, Maine, Florida and New York.  To qualify for part of the donation, the facilities saved a total of $14 million.  The company and hospital administrators consult with medical staffs to develop cost-saving targets.  Thus far, all hospitals have met the targets, though the company says some have come close to missing their goals.  Insurance Review Leads  To Heart Disease Fight  AN EFFORT in Minnesota to find fat in health spending uncovered a serious health problem instead.  Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Minnesota combed its claims data for evidence that might suggest quality problems or excessive use of hospital services in some communities.  One figure that jumped out: Incidence of heart attacks among Itasca County residents was 82% higher than the average for members statewide.  When Blue Cross presented the data to local physicians and civic leaders, the rural community launched the Itasca Heart Project, a two-year, $300,000 public health campaign to encourage its 45,000 residents to change their habits and lessen their risk of heart disease.  Now nearing the end of its first year, the privately funded project includes free blood pressure and cholesterol screenings, an antismoking program and other health services.  Of the first 1,000 people screened, said Dale Hustedt, project director, 480 were judged at risk for heart disease and referred to doctors for further treatment.  In addition, about 100 people have quit smoking.  Local restaurants and grocery stores label foods that are "heart-healthy."  Vouchers help to ensure that the 2,800 residents of the area with little or no health insurance will see a doctor if they need one.  No one knows why the county has so much heart disease.  And while interest in the program is high, no one expects an immediate reduction in the heart attack rate.  "We're really hoping {to see results} about 10 years down the road," Mr. Hustedt says.  Odds and Ends  ABOUT 18% of companies offer health plans with incentives to purchase generic prescription drugs, according to a 1988 survey of more than 1,500 companies by benefit consultant A. Foster Higgins & Co.  Nineteen Blue Cross and Blue Shield plans offer similar incentives among 43 plans responding to a query from Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association. . . .  Pierce County (Wash.) Medical, a Blue Shield plan, reimburses deductibles to people who were wearing seat belts or helmets when injured in auto or motorcycle accidents.  Flight International Group Inc. yesterday became the apparent target of both a shareholder lawsuit and a management-led buy-out.  Douglas G. Matthews, chairman, president and chief executive officer of the aviation services company, said he received a letter from a merchant banking firm stating that it "is in the process of structuring a management-led buy-out" of Flight International.  The letter didn't disclose terms.  Mr. Matthews, who said he isn't a member of the group, declined to identify the bank or the executives involved in the potential offer.  Flight International's board is considering retaining an independent investment adviser.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, the company's stock closed at $9.75, up $1.625.  Earlier in the day, a group of dissident shareholders said it filed suit last week in U.S. District Court seeking a temporary restraining order to halt the company's annual meeting scheduled for Thursday.  A hearing on the suit is set for today before Judge Jack T. Camp, according to Paul S. Dopp, one of the shareholders.  The suit charges that proxy material sent out by Flight International's management Aug. 28 "is deficient and misleading in many important respects," including, among other things, a failure to include a $1.6 million first-quarter loss.  "Immediate and vigorous action is required in order to determine the condition of the company in view of (Mr.) Matthews's recent conflicting disclosures," Mr. Dopp said.  Flight International, which says it intends to "vigorously" contest the suit, has been under fire from some investment analysts for the past year because of its accounting practices.  Most have stopped covering the company, complaining of delays in providing financial information, failure to return phone calls and uncertainty surrounding the April departure of John W. Orange, chief financial officer.  Spartech Corp. said it agreed to sell as much as a 32% interest in the company to British Vita PLC for $23.6 million.  The Manchester, England, chemical company will buy 1.1 million Spartech common shares at $4.50 each, and $18.7 million of a new issue of 7% convertible preferred stock.  Spartech, a St. Louis maker of plastic products, had 2.8 million common shares outstanding prior to the agreement.  Although the agreement is subject to a shareholder vote scheduled for late October, Spartech has already sold 550,000 common shares, or half of the total, to British Vita, giving the company a 16% position on a primary basis.  The remaining 550,000 shares would increase that figure to 28%, and the preferred stock would give British Vita a 32% stake if it is converted into common.  Spartech and British Vita also agreed to explore ways for each company to distribute some of the other's products.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. lowered its ratings on about $1.4 billion of senior debt of this building products maker because of reduced earnings from its core gypsum wallboard business.  The ratings concern said it downgraded the company's senior secured debt to single-B-1 from Ba-3, senior subordinated debentures to single-B-2 from single-B-1, and junior subordinated debentures to single-B-3 from single-B-2.  Moody's said that "incremental capacity and slackening construction demand" in the gypsum wallboard market in 1989 has produced price declines.  It added that prices now seem to be stabilizing but are "likely to remain flat," given the current construction cycle downturn and the addition of new wallboard capacity.  USG had no immediate comment on the action.  The mere mention of cancer-causing asbestos often conjures up images of slow death.  But in this remote hamlet, home to one of the world's biggest asbestos mines, people aren't afraid to wallow in it.  In their homes, many local residents proudly display the lumpy green mineral on their mantels.  Asbestriens urge visitors to tour a local asbestos museum, where guides describe the mineral as "cute."  And they breathe air that has as much as 50 times more asbestos than in most major cities.  "I bet you Yankees think we're weird," says a smiling Andre Bachand, the town's mayor.  Weird as it may seem, this benign view toward asbestos is precisely the attitude the Canadian government promotes.  While many industrialized nations are phasing out asbestos, a fireproof mineral once widely used in building materials, Canada still produces more of it than any other country except the Soviet Union.  Now, Canada is stepping up its efforts to revive a product that in the U.S. alone is estimated to have killed 100,000 people.  Canada is spending heavily to prop up sagging asbestos companies.  It is threatening to sue the U.S. for recently ordering a ban on most asbestos.  And most controversial of all, Canada is exporting close to half its asbestos to the Third World, where many workers are still oblivious to its dangers.  Already, the effort is causing an asbestos renaissance in Canada.  Last year, the country's asbestos production -- in decline all decade and seemingly bound for extinction -- jumped 7%.  "It's a bloody disgrace," says Ray Sentes, a political science professor at the University of Regina in Saskatchewan, who has studied Canada's asbestos industry for 10 years.  "If this continues, the end result will surely be disease and death for thousands upon thousands of workers" who could develop cancer and other lung diseases after exposure to asbestos fibers and dust.  Canada argues that asbestos, which is less expensive than many substitute materials, is helping provide undeveloped countries with affordable shelter.  And it says the kind it produces -- white asbestos -- is less harmful than other forms.  A recent symposium conducted by Harvard University agreed that other types of asbestos "pose a much greater risk" than the white variety.  "We know it can be dangerous," says Wanda Hoskin, coordinator of asbestos issues for the Canadian government.  "We're just saying it can be used safely."  And it can be.  But it takes such costly and elaborate precautions to use asbestos safely that most experts believe the risks are too great.  Even Canada says it doesn't know just what the lethal level of asbestos exposure is: Some people have died from asbestos diseases without ever having recalled coming in contact with the subtance.  "There is no safe level of asbestos exposure," asserts Devra Davis, an occupational-health expert at the National Academy of Sciences.  "That's what makes it so deadly."  The industry Canada is trying to protect is actually a tiny one, with only 2,600 jobs and $300 million in annual revenues.  But it is still important in the politically powerful province of Quebec.  About 80% of Canada's asbestos is mined in the province and the industry accounts for one in every 10 mining jobs there.  For many Quebec residents, asbestos inspires all the pride of oil in Texas and diamonds in South Africa.  And no place is prouder than Asbestos, where folks are willing to endure plenty to keep this industry going.  The substance is mined from a mile-deep pit that looks like a decaying coliseum.  Over the years, hundreds of Asbestriens have been forced to abandon their homes as the pit has expanded.  And each day at 3:45 p.m. sharp comes a dynamite blast at the mine that rattles glass in nearby homes.  The risks of asbestos don't get much attention here.  Hundreds of Canadians come to the town each year -- for vacation.  A film at the asbestos and mineral museum touts the "miracles" of asbestos.  Town officials pass out pamphlets -- partly paid for by the federal government -- with perky cartoon characters dismissing the risks of asbestos.  And nobody seems concerned about the two-hundred foot piles of asbestos-laced waste that surround the town like a medieval forest.  "Everything has its hazards.  Electricity is dangerous, but you don't ban it," says Helen Gallup, cradling her 18-month-old grandson at the foot of her farm off Canadian Road.  A hundred yards away, a gray cloud of asbestos-laced dust, stirred by the wind, rises from one of the piles.  No government agency is monitoring the cancer rate here, despite evidence suggesting that even many residents who didn't work in the mine got cancer.  One U.S. researcher, interpreting data from 1966 to 1977, found the fatal lung-cancer rate for women was 70% higher in Asbestos and a nearby mining town than normally would be expected in a rural Quebec community.  "The death rate could still be terrible, but nobody's checking," says Daniel Green, president of SVP, an environmental group in Montreal.  The reason?  "There just hasn't been a lot of money for asbestos health issues," says Don Wigle, an epidemiologist at Canada's Department of Health and Welfare.  But Canada hasn't been stingy with aid to the asbestos industry.  In recent years, its federal and provincial governments have lent or given more than $40 million to asbestos companies.  Last year, a $5 million grant was awarded to help one company build a new asbestos processor in Newfoundland -- even though the company had defaulted on a $16 million federal loan in 1987.  And that is peanuts compared with Quebec's $500 million bailout of the industry 10 years ago -- when the province bought and began running two asbestos mines.  Such largess is only part of Canada's asbestos crusade.  Government and industry officials are considering suing or taking some other action against the U.S. for planning to ban most asbestos imports by 1997, says Raymond Savoie, Quebec's minister of mines.  The U.S. still imports 11% of Canada's asbestos, and other countries "may think they have to follow," says Mr. Savoie.  In 1986, Canada used diplomatic channels to persuade Reagan administration officials to stall adoption of the ban, the terms of which were finally set in July.  Canada is even more aggressive about promoting asbestos to the Third World.  Demand for the mineral has fallen 58% in Western Europe since 1980.  But the need for low-cost building materials overrides most health concerns in many developing nations."You're talking about giving shelter to the poor," says George McCammon, acting president of the Asbestos Institute, based in Montreal.  "It would be immoral to deny it to them."  To tap into this market, Canada's government has gone so far as to ship free asbestos samples to Third-World countries. (Bangladesh got 790 metric tons, worth $600,000 in 1984 to 1985.) The government promotes asbestos to less-developed countries through the Asbestos Institute, which gets an average of $3 million a year in federal and provincial funding.  Each year, the institute sends representatives to the Third World and issues reams of materials on its product; one promotional video beams that Canada's asbestos "serves the world safely because Canada cares."  The efforts seem to be a success.  Canadian exports of asbestos to South Korea, for example, increased to 44,000 tons last year from 5,000 tons in 1980; exports to Pakistan climbed to 6,000 tons from 300 tons in the same period.  Canada says it doesn't merely sell asbestos but also conducts seminars in Third World countries on using it safely.  But Ottawa steps in when countries consider steps it believes are too vigilant.  When Thailand wanted to label imported asbestos bags with a skull-and-crossbones in 1984, Canada quickly persuaded the Thais to drop the idea.  "We thought the warning was excessive," says a spokesman for Candada's External Affairs Department.  "It was putting asbestos in the category of a toxic poison."  And most Third-World countries don't have the money, the inclination or the expertise to police asbestos use strenuously.  Special ventilation systems are needed in asbestos factories.  The air must be constantly monitored.  Spacesuit-type garb is needed in asbestos removal work."Some of these countries use child labor.  Do you think they're going to start to worry about dust in the workplace?" asks Marcello Malentacchi, general secretary of the International Metal Workers Federation in Geneva.  He says he repeatedly get reports of asbestos abuses in Brazil, Thailand and Malaysia, to name a few.  In one South Korean village, researchers found asbestos dust from a textile factory coating the walls of nearby homes.  The plant's 300 workers, unaware of the risks, all had asbestos fibers in their phlegm.  When the town complained, the factory's operator erected a higher wall -- a futile barrier against clouds of dust.  It also dismissed reports of asbestos hazards as "merely commercial propaganda."  "This is an inhumane business," charges Jong Wha Park, director of the Christian Institute for Studies of Justice and Development, a public-interest group that sent the researchers last year.  "Why would Canada want to export something that kills people?"  Canada's claim that its asbestos isn't as dangerous as other forms ignores the main reason the U.S., Denmark, Sweden and other countries are banning or restricting asbestos use.  White asbestos "may be less potent, but there's no evidence it's safe," says Charles Elkins, an official for the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.  One major study of 17,800 asbestos workers found 40% of the group's deaths were from asbestos exposure.  Most victims mainly handled white asbestos, says a co-author of the study, Irving Selikoff of New York's Mount Sinai School of Medicine.  Even if a safe exposure level were known, most experts say it would be impossible to prevent construction and other workers from breathing higher doses.  To build its case, Canada often cites a litany of studies, without mentioning that most are industry-funded.  Critics also say Canadian officials misinterpret or outright distort scientific data.  One glossy brochure by the Canadian government proclaims that "systematic controlled use of asbestos is favored and has been endorsed by many international agencies, such as the World Health Organization."  "That's misleading to say that," says Thomas Ng, acting chief of the organization's worker health program.  WHO has only set guidelines for workers who must handle asbestos, he says.  "We don't encourage or endorse."  A Canadian government spokeswoman says that's nitpicking over "semantics."  But even Claude Messier, president of the miners union in Asbestos, concedes he isn't 100% certain that his industry is doing the right thing in promoting asbestos abroad.  "Maybe we're not right," he says.  But then his face brightens when he considers the mineral's fireproofing virtues: "If we die and are sent to hell, at least we won't burn."  Concluding its darkest period with a stroke of a pen, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. wrote certified checks to the government for more than $500 million as it formally pleaded guilty to six felony counts.  The guilty pleas and check-signing capped a long-delayed process that was set in motion in January, when Drexel agreed to plead guilty and to pay $300 million in fines and penalties and another $350 million in civil restitution.  The firm also agreed to allow a high level of control over its operations by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The government began investigating possible insider trading and securities fraud at Drexel in 1986, when former stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky began providing information to the government.  After repeatedly asserting its innocence and vowing to fight any charges, Drexel agreed to plead guilty to certain lesser offenses rather than face potentially crippling racketeering charges.  Yesterday afternoon, Drexel sent three checks totaling $300,196,770.97, which included interest that accrued since last January, to the U.S. Postal Service and federal marshals.  Most of that money could be used to help finance the Bush administration's ambitious plan -- unveiled last week -- to fight the nation's drug war, according to Acting U.S. Attorney Benito Romano.  Checks totaling another $200 million were placed into an escrow fund to be used to settle the dozens of civil claims that have been filed against Drexel in recent years.  Drexel will pay another $150 million into that fund over the next two years.  U.S. District Judge Kimba Wood accepted Drexel's guilty plea yesterday morning.  The plea was made by Drexel outside counsel Thomas Curnin of Cahill Gordon & Reindel.  No Drexel official participated, and Chief Executive Officer Frederick Joseph wasn't in the courtroom.  The plea had been delayed in part by Drexel's lengthy negotiations to reach a separate pact with the SEC.  The SEC agreement, which called for sweeping changes within Drexel, was approved in June.  Of the $300,196,770.97 in fines and restitution that Drexel paid, $78 million will be considered criminal penalties for Drexel's illegal gains from the crimes to which it pleaded guilty.  Another $16 million of that money is the civil penalty Drexel must pay under the Insider Trading Sanctions Act.  The remainder will be deposited into a forfeiture fund supervised by the Department of Justice.  Mr. Romano said yesterday that in the past the fund has been used largely to finance the construction of federal prisons.  But beginning Oct. 1, the fund will be turned over to Secretary William Bennett, the nation's drug czar.  Secretary Bennett, he said, will decide how the funds will be allocated.  In a news release issued yesterday, Drexel said that while its decision to plead guilty is "a highly sobering event, we are determined to make Drexel a model of how a securities firm ought to conduct its business in the nineties and to focus energies and resources on the opportunities which lie ahead of us."  Drexel pleaded guilty to the following acts of wrongdoing, which the government alleges occurred between 1984 and 1986: fraud in the sale of securities of Fischbach Corp. between April 1984 and March 1985; mail fraud in connection with Golden Nugget Inc.'s sale of MCA Inc. common stock; fraud in the sale of securities of Phillips Petroleum Co.; fraud in the sale of securities of Harris Graphics Corp. common shares; fraud in the sale of securities of Stone Container Corp. common stock; mail fraud in connection with trading in securities of C.O.M.B. Co.  As part of its deal with the government, Drexel agreed to cooperate with prosecutors in their continuing investigation of Michael Milken, Drexel's former chief of junk bond operations.  The government said that Mr. Milken was behind all of the crimes to which Drexel pleaded guilty.  In March, Mr. Milken was indicted on 98 counts of securities and tax fraud, racketeering and conspiracy.  He has repeatedly declared his innocence.  As soon as next month, prosecutors are expected to seek an expanded indictment against Mr. Milken.  The government also is continuing to investigate certain present and former Drexel employees and clients.  Others who have been notified that they are likely to be indicted soon include Warren Trepp, Drexel's chief junk bond trader, Roy Johnson, a Drexel bond salesman, Peter Gardiner, a former Drexel trader and Allen Rosenthal, a former senior vice president in Drexel's junk bond department.  Individuals familiar with the investigation say that Mr. Trepp has been offered, and has declined, immunity in exchange for his grand jury testimony.  Another Drexel salesman, David Sydorick, has accepted an immunity agreement from the U.S. attorney's office and is now negotiating a similar agreement with the SEC.  James Dahl, a Drexel salesman who was granted immunity last year, continued his report to prosecutors in Beverly Hills yesterday.  Although the greed-is-good approach to life has seemed to gain a growing following in recent years, a lot of investors have been taking a different path.  Guided by the belief that people aren't true owners of their earthly possessions but mere stewards of them, these investors have been turning to so-called Christian financial planners.  "My main philosophy is that my money is a loan from God," says Los Angeles Dodgers pitcher Orel Hershiser.  "I'm in charge of it.  I'm responsible for investing, giving, providing for my family and protecting it."  A large -- and apparently increasing -- number of planners are catering to people like Mr. Hershiser: sports stars, doctors, business owners and others for whom religion is a central part of life.  But although many of these planners are legitimate, sincerely trying to offer investment and money management advice based on biblical precepts, their recommendations are often little different from those of secular planners.  "They give you the idea that out here in the secular world, people are running as fast as they can, and that you will only get prudent planning when you go to them," says Mitchell Keil, a financial planner for IDS Financial Services, in Irvine, Calif.  "That's not true.  I defy them to show any significant difference between what they do and I do, and I'm an agnostic.  And if my client says I want to give money to my church, I'll do my damndest to allow them to do that."  People who describe themselves as Christian financial planners "are using an emotional hook to cater to clients," says Larry Biehl, a partner in the San Mateo, Calif., investment advisory firm Bailard, Biehl & Kaiser.  "It doesn't need to be called Christian, Jewish or Zen financial planning.  They are playing on people's guilt, and are saying that their Christian approach is more honest than other people.  It's just a marketing strategy."  The Christian financial planners disagree.  They maintain that they emphasize giving, becoming debt-free and training their clients' children to handle money -- three practices that many secular planners give lip service to but don't really follow.  "Secular planners say they do these things but most don't," says Russell D. Crosson, chief operating officer of Ronald Blue & Co., a Christian financial planning firm in Atlanta.  "They focus on yield and return."  Christian financial planners have been on the defensive recently because their rise has also spawned a legion of fakes.  State securities regulators report an "alarming increase" in complaints about self-proclaimed "born-again" financial planners who have swindled church-goers with bogus money-making schemes.  These con artists claim to be endorsed by local and national church officials and offer investment advice about coins, precious metals, real estate and oil and gas programs.  Legitimate Christian financial planners are scattered around the U.S., with the heaviest concentration in the South.  Some use the description, Christian financial planning, in their advertisements and brochures.  Others don't.  Some advertise on Christian radio and television stations.  Christian planners use the same investment vehicles as secular planners.  Like many conservative secular planners, they say they believe in buying and holding investments over a long time, diversifying and not trying to time the market.  And, as with secular planners, some are fee-based, and others get paid from commissions on the products they sell.  Ronald Blue, the Atlanta firm used by Mr. Hershiser and several other star athletes, is a fee-based planner that uses no-load mutual funds for its clients' investments.  The company's official purpose: "To help individuals apply God's principles of stewardship to free up financial resources for the fulfillment of the Great Commission."  "Our emphasis is on preservation of capital instead of achieving high yields," says Mr. Crosson.  "We are looking for steady performers, and we are not shooting for tops or bottoms in the market."  In most cases, Christian investment advisers don't suggest that their clients buy "sinless" stocks or bonds.  "There's no way to absolutely guarantee that your money won't be used in a way you don't like," says Mr. Crosson.  "You could put your money in a bank, and the bank might make a loan to an abortion clinic."  Christian financial planners place heavy reliance on the Bible.  "The Bible is a great money-management book," says Don A. Ward, a Christian financial planner in Fresno, Calif.  "More is said in the New Testament about money than about heaven and hell combined, and five times more is said about money than prayer," Mr. Ward says.  A more stringent view on debt is a key precept.  "The Bible says the debtor becomes the slave of the lender," says William Robertson, a Fort Worth, Texas, Christian financial planner.  "In the old Testament Hebrew, the word 'interest' meant the bite of the serpent," he says.  Ronald Blue's Mr. Crosson puts it in more worldly terms.  Some secular planners advise clients "to leverage everything to the hilt, take your equity out of your home and put into other investments," he says.  "Instead, we are likely to tell our clients to make a bigger down payment on their home, to accelerate paying off of their mortgage."  Still, so far as many secular planners are concerned, the differences asserted by Christian planners amount to little more than marketing strategy.  Christian financial planning is "just another effort at market segmentation," says Michael Stolper, a San Diego investment adviser.  "And frankly, I'm offended by it," he adds.  Mr. Keil, the California planner, says he sees some dangers to investors in the growing number of "cottage Christian financial planners" that are affiliated with churches or religious organizations.  In the populous Orange County area where he works, he says some of these planners are partially or inadequately trained.  But because they are Christians, their Christian clients won't challenge their recommendations.  Larry W. Carroll, a Charlotte, N.C., planner who is chairman emeritus of the International Association for Financial Planning, says that investors who want a Christian financial planner should first look for the top two or three planners in their area.  They should check the planners' references, track record and filings with regulatory bodies, such as the Securities and Exchange Commission.  They should call the National Association of Securities Dealers to see whether any complaints have been filed.  "Find the best planners first, and secondarily, find out if they are Christians," Mr. Carroll says.  Pembridge Investments Ltd. said it will make a cash bid for DRG PLC, triggering a negative response from the Bristol, England, paper and packaging company.  Pembridge said its bid would be "somewhat below" DRG's closing share price Friday in London of 604 pence.  Analysts estimate the total value of the bid around #600 million ($924 million).  DRG rejected any move by Pembridge, which holds a 25% DRG stake, for additional shares in the company.  Friday's share price was about 45% above levels quoted in January.  The share price has been pushed higher recently largely on speculation of a leveraged buyout.  In late trading yesterday on London's Stock Exchange, DRG was quoted at 590 pence, down 14 pence.  The Bermuda-registered investment company added that its offer is subject to finalizing financial arrangements.  DRG said it was "pleased that we have flushed" out the rumored bidder.  The company said it has rejected the possibility of a meeting with Pembridge.  Carolco Pictures Inc. said it formed a joint venture with an entertainment subsidiary of L'Oreal S.A. to buy, sell and lease television distribution rights for movies in markets outside the U.S.  Peter Hoffman, president and chief executive officer of Carolco, said he expects the venture with the French cosmetics company's Paravision International S.A. subsidiary to have annual revenue of $75 million to $100 million within three years.  He said Carolco's share could be half of that.  "Foreign television revenues are the biggest growth area in the business," said Mr. Hoffman.  "This will improve our profitability by a material amount."  The new venture is called Carolco Paravision Television International V.O.F.  Carolco finances, produces and leases motion pictures, including action pictures such as "Rambo III."  Paravision, which is 75%-owned by L'Oreal, controls TV and video rights for a library of 3,500 feature films -- one of the largest libraries in Europe.  Carolco will contribute the foreign distribution rights for 50 films to the joint venture, and each company will collect revenues on its own films.  The announcement comes at a tumultuous time for Carolco.  Some of the company's negotiations have been complicated by a slide in its stock price following the murders of Live Entertainment Inc.'s chairman and his wife last month.  Carolco owns 49% of the Van Nuys, Calif., distributor and retailer of video and audio equipment.  Live Entertainment's chairman, Jose E. Menendez, and his wife, Kitty, were found murdered in their Beverly Hills mansion on Aug. 20, and questions have been raised about a possible connection to organized crime.  Live Entertainment bought two companies from individuals identified by law enforcement officials as having alleged ties to organized crime.  Mr. Hoffman said the venture with Paravision brings "an added element of legitimacy at a time when we need it."  The fact that L'Oreal and Paravision "picked Carolco instead of some other company . . . affirms their commitment to us."  Carolco shares closed yesterday at $9.125, down 12.5 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  On the Friday before the murder, the stock closed at $10.25.  Separately, Live Entertainment has scheduled a meeting with analysts in New York tomorrow to discuss the company's prospects.  Live Entertainment closed yesterday at $16 a share, down 25 cents, in over-the-counter trading.  On the Friday before the murder, the stock closed at $21.  Mr. Hoffman said Carolco still expects to acquire the assets of De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc. for "a little" more than $33 million in cash and stock.  Carolco has been in a bidding war for the troubled entertainment group with Italian financier Giancarlo Parretti, but Mr. Hoffman said yesterday that Mr. Parretti has withdrawn from the bidding.  Mr. Parretti, who was understood to have made a bid valued at $39.5 million for the assets of De Laurentiis, couldn't be reached for comment.  Before the murders, Carolco was also negotiating the purchase of an unidentified company in a transaction that could have involved some Live Entertainment stock.  The status of that deal -- which hadn't been announced but "was extremely close" to completion -- is now "very unclear," Mr. Hoffman said.  "I don't know whether we would proceed.  We aren't prepared to distribute Live common stock at these prices to anyone."  Also before the murders, Andrew Vajna, Carolco's co-chairman, was negotiating the sale of his 36% stake in the company to Mario Kassar, the company's other co-chairman, in a transaction that had a market value of roughly $110 million.  Mr. Kassar also holds a 36% stake.  Mr. Hoffman said those negotiations are continuing but have been modified as a result of the drop in share prices.  He declined to provide any details.  Messrs.  Kassar and Vajna haven't been available for comment.  The Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency, set up in April 1988 to provide guarantees to private investors in developing countries, hasn't yet approved its first such contract.  But it has started making money.  In its first annual report, MIGA, a World Bank affiliate, reported that its income from investments totaled about $5.9 million in the year ended June 30; net income, after administrative expenses and other outlays, totaled $2.8 million.  MIGA, which has $702.5 million in capital subscribed by member countries, reported that in mid-1989 it had almost $67.3 million of investments in interest-bearing time deposits and other obligations with banks and other financial institutions.  In a footnote to the annual report, MIGA said it isn't disclosing where these assets are parked.  Technically, Barber Conable, president of the World Bank, also is president of MIGA, although MIGA's operating chief is Yoshio Terasawa, formerly an official of Nomura Securities Co., Tokyo, a major international investment and securities company.  In the report, MIGA said that during the past year, it has been setting up its staff and laying the groundwork for providing private investment guarantees for projects in Third World countries.  MIGA said it has received 69 preliminary applications for guarantees covering potential investments in 24 developing countries.  Once MIGA gets rolling with its investment guarantees, the insurance-type agreements will protect companies in industrial countries, for example, against expropriation, currency inconvertibility, wars, revolutions or "civil disturbances" and other non-commercial risks on their new investments in Third World nations that are signatories to the MIGA charter.  MIGA said its "multilateral" investment guarantees will supplement the national investment-guarantee programs of its member countries and political-risk insurance of insurers.  After spending six months and $2 million, an internal investigation of MiniScribe Corp. has concluded that senior management apparently "perpetrated a massive fraud on the company, its directors, its outside auditors and the investing public."  MiniScribe, a disk-drive manufacturer and onetime stock-market highflier based in Longmont, Colo., announced earlier this year that sales results for prior years had been overstated and that it couldn't produce reliable financial results for those years.  The company's chairman, Q.T. Wiles, abruptly resigned and several top officers were dismissed.  In an executive summary of their findings, an investigative committee of outside directors said they found fraudulent activities as far back as 1985, when Mr. Wiles, a noted turnaround specialist and then chairman of the investment firm of Hambrecht & Quist, took over as chief executive officer.  The investigators' summary does not specifically fault Mr. Wiles, adding, however, that the fraud "required the active participation of many company personnel" and was common knowledge within the company.  Indeed, company officials went to extraordinary lengths to create the illusion of unbounded growth.  In their report, investigators said, for instance, that senior company officials:  -- "apparently broke into locked trunks containing the auditors' workpapers" during the year-end 1986 audit and changed inventory figures, inflating inventory values by approximately $1 million. (MiniScribe's auditor is Coopers & Lybrand.)  -- packaged bricks and shipped them to distributors as disk drives in 1987, recording $4.3 million in sales.  When the shipments were returned, MiniScribe inflated its inventory by the purported cost of the bricks.  -- "accumulated scrap that had been written off" in 1988 and included it as inventory.  Obsolete parts and scrap from the 1987 inventory were also carried on the 1988 books and valued at approximately $3.5 million. -- packaged approximately 6,100 disk drives that had been contaminated, in order to inflate inventory during last year's fourth quarter.  Also during 1988, the summary notes, the company "dramatically" increased shipments to three warehouses, booking $56.4 million in sales and gross profit of $5.4 million.  According to the investigators, "none of these sales should have been recorded in 1988."  A copy of the committee's full report has been forwarded to the Securities and Exchange Commission, according to company officials, and is said to consist of more than 1,500 pages.  Copies of the report also are being delivered to plaintiffs' attorneys in 13 shareholder and bondholder lawsuits that have been filed in federal court in Denver.  Although the investigators' summary makes scant mention of the suits, it adds its weight to charges that MiniScribe officials defrauded shareholders, manipulated stock prices and benefited from insider trading.  The summary says, for example, that MiniScribe's public filings "were continually and materially incomplete and inaccurate" and offers the committee's opinion that "public investors were misled."  The summary also notes that "some MiniScribe officers sold significant amounts of company stock" while they were aware of "material undisclosed deficiencies" in the company's financial statements.  MiniScribe deceived public investors, for example, by announcing its 1986 earnings before Coopers & Lybrand made adjustments that reduced income, according to the summary.  Rather than report the lower earnings, MiniScribe "originated additional adjustments" to offset the auditors' findings.  But the committee also castigated the auditing firm, which is also named in the lawsuits, stating that MiniScribe's adjustments were "countenanced by its auditors."  Acknowledging that MiniScribe "perpetrated a series of frauds directly on the auditors," the investigators nevertheless concluded that Coopers & Lybrand "failed the company at a time when their services were most needed."  The failure, the summary says, "was one of judgment, one of failing to detect 'red flags,' one of allowing themselves to be pushed too hard and too far."  Jack Grace, managing partner of Coopers & Lybrand's Denver office, declined to respond directly to the committee's conclusions.  In a prepared statement, however, he said the investigative report made it clear that "Coopers & Lybrand, along with others, was victimized by a massive fraud."  Mr. Grace added that his firm was "pleased" that MiniScribe had retained Coopers & Lybrand as its auditors -- although the committee of outside directors has recommended that MiniScribe "carefully re-examine its relationship" with the firm.  Meanwhile, company officials said they hope to complete a restatement of financial results for 1986, 1987 and 1988 within six to eight weeks.  A July 2, 1989, balance sheet also is being completed and is expected to show "a very substantial negative net worth," according to Roger J. Mason, the company's new chief financial officer.  Coopers & Lybrand, which has reviewed some of the investigators' findings, has said it may be able to complete an audit if MiniScribe can restate prior years' financial results.  Those results, said Mr. Mason, "will be materially and adversely affected."  MiniScribe, which closed in national over-the-counter trading yesterday at $2.0625, down 18.75 cents, has been trading with an exception to listing requirements of the National Association of Securities Dealers.  The company must submit a report by Oct. 30 on its progress in meeting those requirements or risk being delisted.  Meggitt Holdings PLC, a U.K. engineering group, made a #120 million ($184.8 million) hostile bid for United Scientific Holdings PLC, a U.K. defense-equipment manufacturer.  Meggitt has made an all-share offer of 130 new Meggitt shares for every 100 USH shares.  The offer values each USH share at 165 pence.  There is also a partial cash alternative of #85 cash plus 65 new Meggitt shares for 100 USH shares, which values each USH share at 160 pence.  "The financial performance of USH has been lamentable and the management has been in disarray for five years," said Meggitt's Managing Director Ken Coates.  "Meggitt has the skills, experience and greater financial resources as well as the proven record to utilize USH's potential," he added.  Mr. Coates said the acquisition would help Meggitt expand into new product areas.  Daimler-Benz AG said its group net income slipped 1% in the first half of 1989 because of weaker personal-car sales in West Germany and the U.S.  The automobile and technology concern based in Stuttgart, West Germany, said group net declined to 830 million marks ($416.7 million) from 840 million marks a year earlier.  Total car production slid 5% because of lower sales in the U.S., where all European auto makers are struggling with weak demand, and a steep drop in the sales of diesel cars amid a debate in Germany about pollution problems.  The 1990 tax reform, under which the price discounts on new cars offered to the personnel of auto companies will be taxed as of next year, has also cut the number of cars sold to Daimler employees.  Separately, Daimler, as expected, accepted the conditions set by Economics Minister Helmut Haussmann on its planned takeover of aerospace and defense concern Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H.  MBB.  London share prices closed sharply lower as profit-taking had an exaggerated impact in thin trading conditions.  The retreat was partly a reaction to recent highs, as well as a response to a weak opening session on Wall Street.  Tokyo shares closed little changed in slower trading.  At London, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index, the broadest measure of the market, flirted with the psychologically important 2400-point level, closing at 2400.6, down 23.3, its session low.  The London market slipped sharply in the last quarter-hour of dealings, which some market watchers warned was a sign of increasing disenchantment over London's prospects for a rise to all-time highs in the very near term.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index closed at 1981.6, down 22.1.  Volume was modest at 464 million shares, down from 791.3 million Friday.  Dealers said London is still underpinned by reluctance to sell aggressively, particularly amid continued talk over possible takeovers and acquisitions in various sectors.  But they noted heightened concerns over the continued vitality of the market, given Wall Street's recent signs of weakness.  On top of concerns over declines in New York, dealers said that fears over softer dollar-related earnings from U.K. companies sparked some profit-taking.  The concerns were focused on worries that the major central banks will rein in the U.S. currency after last week's gains.  Dealers added that skittishness over dollar earners, such as Glaxo and Imperial Chemical, was reinforced ahead of major U.S. indicators later this week, including merchandise-trade figures for July and the August producer price index figure, both scheduled Friday.  "The market is just cautious," a dealer with a U.K. brokerage firm asserted.  "We're certainly not pushing clients to chase the market.  I think we have to wait to see what Wall Street decides to do."  Of the dollar earners, Glaxo fell 22 pence (34 cents) to #15.72 ($24.20), Fisons fell 7 to 343 and Wellcome, also hit by talk of unfavorable news reports over its anti-AIDS drug AZT, closed at 687, down 18.  Imperial Chemical slipped 15 to 12.84.  Dealers said the market was also very cautious ahead of a busy week of interim company earnings reports.  Among companies reporting this week are: BTR, down 8 at 473; Lasmo, off 2 at 539; Ratners, down 3 at 279; and United Biscuit, at 397, down 4.  In Tokyo, stocks briefly fell below the 34000 level halfway through the afternoon session before rebounding to close little changed on last-minute index-linked arbitrage buying.  The market's mood soured as participants concerned with the yen's persistent weakness, lower bond prices and higher domestic long-term interest rates turned bearish, traders said.  The U.S. currency momentarily surged to the 148-yen level in Tokyo Monday afternoon and remained at the 147 level the rest of the day.  Traders said investors avoided commitments, reflecting caution ahead of the announcement of the U.S. economic indicators later this week.  With such a combination of negative trading factors, overall volume became progressively smaller toward the end of the day, traders said.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues edged down 2.15 points to 34113.66.  The index lost 36.75 points Friday.  In early trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index rose 103.89 points to 34217.55.  Monday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 400 million shares, down from 791 million Friday  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues, 529 to 393, while 196 issues remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 10.27 points Friday, was down 4.36 points, or 0.17%, at 2578.76.  The Second Section index, which lost 11.15 points Friday, was down 27.40 points, or 0.80%, to close at 3381.61.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 14 million shares, down from 25 million Friday.  In Australia, shares closed little changed as some early gains were erased by market nervousness over the fate of Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd.  Bond's shares plunged after a private report by brokerage firm Baring Securities (Australia) Ltd., which suggested that Bond has negative net assets of 1.59 Australian dollars (US$1.22) a share, was leaked to local media Sunday.  The stock slumped 12 cents to an intraday low of 27 cents Monday, before recovering a bit to close at 31 cents.  The shares traded as high as A$1.80 at the beginning of the year.  In reply to a query from the Australian Stock Exchange, Bond blamed Monday's share price fall on "adverse speculative media comment relating to the group's financial position.  "The company believes that this speculation has largely been fueled by groups associated with Lonrho PLC," Bond said in a statement.  Bond has previously accused Lonrho's chief, R.W. Rowland, of conducting a publicity campaign against the Australian company to try to pre-empt any takeover bid by Bond for the British conglomerate.  Bond Corp., a brewing, resources property and media concern, won't disclose its borrowings, but analysts estimate its total debt at A$6 billion.  Australia's corporate regulators last Thursday launched a formal investigation into some of Bond Corp.'s business activities.  In other Asian and Pacific markets, stocks closed lower in Singapore, Seoul, Taipei, Manila Hong Kong, were higher in Wellington, and mixed in Hong Kong.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Brussels, Copenhagen, Madrid, Milan and Paris, and lower in Amsterdam, Frankfurt, Helsinki, Oslo, and Stockholm.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Zurich markets were closed for a holiday.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 8 Sep 7 Year  @ U.S. ............ ....... 320.8 320.5 + 25.3  @ Britain ................. 726.3 724.1 + 33.0  @ Canada ...................431.3 431.2 + 17.5  @ Japan....................1511.7 1518.0 + 6.4  @ France....................550.7 550.9 + 24.4  @ Germany.................. 262.0 259.7 + 24.0  @ Hong Kong................1971.5 1935.8 - 2.9  @ Switzerland...............235.7 236.3 + 36.3  @ Australia................ 350.9 349.6 + 20.9  @ World index............. 528.4 527.2 + 6.9  @ ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  @ Last week's and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE %CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @ Polly Peck International (Britain) 4.14 + 31.4  @ Northern Star Holding (Australia) 0.58 + 26.1  @ Tasek Cement (Singapore) 2.96 + 24.9  @ Reininhaus (Australia) 2200.00 + 23.6  @ Asea Brown Boy Deut Ake (Swiss) 648.00 + 21.3  @ Inageva (Japan) 4060.0 + 20.8  @ Berjuntai Tin (Singapore) 3.60 + 20.8  @ Groupe Victoire (France) 2180.00 + 19.9  @ Mondadori Priv (Italy) 26100.00 + 19.7  @ Isetan (Japan) 4500.00 + 18.7  @ LOSING ISSUES  @ Western Union (U.S.) 0.875 - 22.2  @ Imperial (U.S.) 3.50 - 20.0  @ Westfield Capital (Australia) 0.42 - 17.6  @ Chase (N.  Zealand) 0.05 - 16.7  @ Fki (Babcock) (Britain) 1.06 - 15.9  @ Korsnas B (Sweden) 140.00 - 13.6  @ Kern (Australia) 1.45 - 12.1  @ Hufyudstaden B Fria (Sweden) 120.00 - 11.8  @ Newmont (Australia) 0.90 - 11.8  @ Thomson-Csf (France) 191.00 - 11.4  @ Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  A WAR-ON-POVERTY BILL WAS SIGNED by President Johnson on Aug. 20, 1964, setting off a $947.5 million burst in first-year spending in a U.S. economy already heated by the Vietnam war.  Although the measure had his LBJ brand, it was largely a congressional reaction to the memory of what the assassinated President Kennedy may have wanted for social change.  It was also America's rediscovery of poverty, responding to the 1962 book "The Other America: Poverty in the United States" by the late Michael Harrington, a socialist.  The anti-poverty act created an Office of Economic Opportunity, run by Sargent Shriver, Kennedy's brother-in-law.  It offered federal funds for such programs as Job Corps training for dropouts.  Head Start for disadvantaged preschoolers, Neighborhood Youth Corps, community action programs, Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps.  But there was misbehavior in some Job Corps centers (which spent $1.8 billion from 1965 to 1973) and discord within community action programs as militant poor groups fought with city officials for power. congress has amended the program many times over the years.  The Office of Economic Opportunity, although located in the executive office, was never more than a murky overseer of a loose mass of ever-shifting programs.  After the agency was killed on Jan. 4, 1975, some remaining programs were transferred to many other agencies.  Currently, the U.S. is near the end of its seventh consecutive year of good times -- its longest peacetime economic expansion -- but it never has won its war on poverty.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  POLITICIANS LOVE "SIN TAXES," levies laid on human frailties like the use of tobacco and alcohol.  In 1964, they ventured back to raising revenues from one of the oldest sins -- gambling.  That year, a New Hampshire legislator named Larry Pickett, who had campaigned for 10 years to get a lottery for the Granite State, finally succeeded when he proposed earmarking the profits for education.  With a worthy cause behind it, legal lottery gambling was reborn.  Last year, 32 states and the District of Columbia raked in more than $15 billion from such games.  Since New Hampshire, states have collected almost $80 billion and have spent close to $19 billion for education.  To add to the fun, Bally, the casino and slot machine company, in 1974 designed scratch-off "instant" lotteries.  In 1988, these accounted for almost $4 billion.  Despite thundering from the pulpits, lotteries are an American tradition.  The first English colony at Jamestown, Va., was financed by one.  Benjamin Franklin, along with everything else, was a lottery organizer.  Ivy League colleges used lotteries to build their campuses and Congress tried one to finance the new capital in Washington.  Private operators ran most state-backed lotteries, however, and greed usually eclipsed the needs of the commonweal.  The crunch came with the post-Civil War Louisiana lottery, which even a Confederate hero like Gen. P.G.T. Beauregard, who headed it, couldn't save.  The cheating grew so blatant that in 1895 an exasperated Congress outlawed all interstate lotteries, a ban that still stands.  The new lotteries, computer-run and with prized of immense proportion, have by and large been free of scandal.  New York has given away as much as $40 million; Pennsylvania and Florida have had pots exceeding $50 million.  California didn't get into the act until 1986, but by last year it had more than $2.1 billion in ticket sales.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  DIRECTORS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA and New York Central railroads on Jan. 12, 1962, approved the most heralded merger in the industry's history.  It became the sorriest.  Its $7 billion, 19,600-mile system blanketed the populous, industrial Northeast U.S.  Eighteen unions fought it to win expensive job-protection pacts.  It finally cleared the musty Interstate Commerce Commission in April 1966, but that was far from the end of the line.  Nine other railroads sued to delay, seeking to be included or to gain special protections.  Bondholders sued.  By November 1966 Stuart T. Saunders, Pennsy's chairman, warned that the merger "is going to collapse" with further delays, But delays continued as cases went many times to the Supreme Court, which in January 1968 said the merger could be Feb. 1 of that year.  Then came chaos.  Feuding between "red hats," former Pennsy, and "green hats," former New York Central executives, was rampant from the top down.  Both Saunders and Alfred E. Perlman, former New York Central president, had hot tempers.  Computer systems and other equipment were incompatible.  Not helping was the 1969-1970 winter, the worst in a century.  Cash was squeezed; debt was due; a cry for federal succor failed.  The board ousted Saunders and Perlman in mid-June 1970.  On June 21, 1970, Penn Central Transportation filed for reorganization.  The aftermath?  The former Penn Central railroad, and five other broken roads, became part of Consolidated Rail Corp., which with heavy federal aid became a viable private railroad.  Amtrak, a 1971 congressional creature, assumed running the red-ink long-haul passenger service; local governments picked up the communter rail burden.  And Penn Central Corp., a diversified Cincinnati-based company, is the highly profitable heir of some of the early non-railroad Pennsy and New York Central assets.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  NOVELIST UPTON SINCLAIR'S "THE JUNGLE," horrifying expose of Chicago's meatpacking industry, produced the first Pure Food and Drug Act in 1906.  The "elixir of sulfanilamide" scandal that resulted in 107 deaths, mostly children, spurred tougher drug laws in 1938.  And the thalidomide tragedy of the 1960s, though Americans were spared its worst effects, produced the still-stronger drug-testing laws of 1962.  Thalidomide, developed in Germany, had been hailed as the greatest sleeping pill in history.  After it became a bestseller in Germany, Britain and Canada, the century-old William Merrell Co. asked the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in September 1960 for approval to sell it in the U.S.  The application, backed by four telephone-book-sized volumes of data, was assigned to Frances Kelsey, a Canadian-born physician and pharmacologist who had just joined the FDA.  Dr. Kelsey thought thalidomide looked "peculiar."  For one thing, the sleeping pill didn't make test animals sleepy.  Despite constant -- and angry -- pressure from Merrell, she blocked approval, asking Merrell for more and more data.  Meanwhile, German and other European doctors were puzzling over an epidemic of phocomedlia, children born with flipper-like appendages instead of proper arms and legs.  In November 1961, Widikind Lenz, a Hamburg pediatrician, discovered the link: Mothers of the deformed babies had been using thalidomide.  The drug was withdrawn that month and Merrell dropped its application for FDA approval.  When the thalidomide story hit the U.S., it caused shudders that had seismic effects in Congress.  Sen. Estes Kefauver, whose tough drug-regulating bill had been gutted on Capital Hill, now saw it revived, strengthened and sped on its way to President Kennedy's desk.  He signed it into law in October 1962, two months after he had awarded Dr. Kelsey the Distinguished Federal Civilian Service Award.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  MUTUAL FUNDS AND OTHER investment giants were moving into the stock market in 1962, but there was still room for the individual to play -- and lose.  A prime example was Edward M. Gilbert, a well-heeled wunderkind with delusions of grandeur.  Eddie Gilbert's indulgent father ran a small but successful lumber company in New York City.  When his star-athlete son came aboard, wheeling and dealing began.  After a few false starts, Gilbert scored when he persuaded father, family and friends to buy up a far bigger hardwood flooring company, E.L. Bruce & Co.  This made Gilbert paper-rich and established him in Cafe Society, a group he had courted with the aid of such worthies as party-giver Elsa Maxwell and columnist-for-hire Igor Cassini.  The Bruce coup meant Gilbert had arrived -- beautiful wife, art-filled apartment, homes in Palm Beach and on the Riviera, entree on Wall Street.  He set his sights on Celotex Corp., a far bigger, Chicago-based building supply company.  By March 1962, Gilbert had 10% of Celotex.  Then luck ran out.  JFK's bare-knuckles brawl with the steel industry over price increases ended the "Kennedy boom."  Gilbert had chosen this moment to get a Nevada divorce, trapping him three hours from Wall Street.  As Bruce stock kept skidding, he expropriated $2 million from the company's till.  When that failed, he flew to Brazil.  After five months, he returned to face fraud charges, IRS liens for $3 million and a grand larceny rap for stealing from Bruce.  After denials and delays for four years, hinting at the big names he could involve, Gilbert was packed off to a cell.  But even two years in prison couldn't dispel his dreams of glory.  In 1981, he was in another cell, this time for rigging the price of an electronics stock.  That brought him four years in jail and five years probation.  This year, at age 66, he's been back in federal court, pleading innocent to charges that he violated his probation by selling securities.  As the musicians' strike in Las Vegas, Nev., continues through the summer, the sound of music clashes with a chorus of angry voices accusing five major resorts of "corporate musicide."  The musicians union's dispute with the resorts -- the Tropicana, Bally's Las Vegas, Caesars Palace, Flamingo Hilton and Las Vegas Hilton -- hasn't put an end to live music in this gambling and convention mecca.  But it has caused several celebrities to cancel appearances and forced a few showrooms to go sporadically "dark" since the first pickets appeared at the Tropicana June 3.  Two major issues divide Local 369 of the American Federation of Musicians and the big resorts.  The first is the use of taped music in "production" shows, such as the traditional showgirl-filled revues.  The other is whether musicians will be guaranteed a certain amount of work in showrooms that feature star performers who frequently bring their own bands with them.  So far, 45 musicians have been fired or replaced by taped music in three production shows.  But a total of about 150 freelance musicians and house band members also have been idled by the strike, a union spokeswoman said.  The union has about 650 "core" members and a total membership of about 1,400.  Meetings between management and the union in recent weeks have quickly broken off.  Another meeting is scheduled for today.  Mark Tully Massagli, the union local's president, argues that taped music is contrary to the nature of the live production shows.  Resort officials say the union is implying that the casinos want to do away with live music, a charge they vehemently deny.  "The musicians union wants the hotels to pay 25 musicians full year's salaries to do absolutely nothing," John Giovenco, president of Hilton Hotels Corp.'s Nevada operations, said of the union's demands regarding the star showrooms.  "No other union asks that for its members."  Management insists that taped music doesn't detract from the production shows; often, they say, the audience can't even see the band when there is one.  Resort executives also say that guaranteeing the musicians work in the star showrooms would cost the resorts hundreds of thousands of dollars annually, especially when celebrities don't use the house bands.  Most star performers would be unaffected by the taped-music issue, but celebrities such as Dean Martin, Rodney Dangerfield, Burt Bachrach and Dionne Warwick have canceled recent appearances either in sympathy with striking musicians or because their own bands have refused to cross picket lines.  Others, including singer Randy Travis, have performed as scheduled.  Regardless of the labor dispute's outcome, canned music doesn't appear likely to commandeer all Las Vegas stages soon.  "We'd never think of making Frank Sinatra sing to a recording," a Bally's spokesman said.  Consumer borrowing in July declined for the first time since January 1987, dropping $280 million, or at an annual rate of 0.5%, the Federal Reserve reported.  Auto loans led the decline, skidding $1.46 billion, or at a 6% annual rate, while credit card purchases increased a relatively small $1.27 billion, or at an 8% annual rate.  In June, auto loans had fallen $549 million, while credit card lending rose $3.12 billion.  Total credit outstanding rose $2.72 billion in June.  The figures are adjusted for seasonal changes.  Many analysts say they don't put much weight on the new numbers, however, and don't expect the decline to continue.  "I rarely jump to judgments on a month's worth of numbers," said Joel Popkin, an economic consultant here, adding that he didn't take the decline seriously because auto sales increased in July and August.  Samuel Kahan, chief financial officer for Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc. of Chicago, stressed that the numbers don't indicate any drop in sales.  "The consumer credit numbers measure how we are financing, not how we are spending," he said.  "I'm looking at consumer spending to keep chugging along at 2% to 2.5%."  The total credit outstanding for July was $699.24 billion, which was up 9.6% from July 1988.  Mobile home credit fell $60 million, or 3% at an annual rate, and the miscellaneous category, which includes cash loans and certain retail financial contracts, declined $26 million, or at a 0.2% annual rate.  Latin American countries posted record export earnings last year, but high international interest rates and continuing debt problems largely offset their trade gains, according to the Inter-American Development Bank.  In its annual report on economic and social progress in Latin America, the 44-nation agency noted that countries of that region eked out a mere 0.6% rise in economic output last year, even though export earnings from the region reached a record $102.6 billion.  Moreover, because of continued rapid population growth in those countries -- to more than 414 million in 1988 from 405.8 million in 1987 -- the international agency noted that per-capita output by the countries of the region declined 1.5%.  For the region as a whole, the report said, per-capita output is 7% below what it was in 1980.  Only five countries -- the Bahamas, Barbados, Chile, Colombia and the Dominican Republic -- posted gains in per-capita output over 1980.  IADB President Enrique Iglesias said at a news conference that there may be a "healthy" increase in Latin America's exports during calendar 1989.  However, he added: "I'm afraid that this year will be a little worse in terms of economic growth."  The region's imports increased last year to about $78.2 billion, the highest level since 1982, "but their value was still $25 billion less than their peak year of 1981, when they topped $103 billion," the report said.  The IADB said Latin American countries achieved an overall trade surplus of more than $24 billion in 1988, an increase of about $4 billion from 1987.  But Brazil accounted for $19 billion of the surplus, and 14 of the 25 countries in the region had trade deficits, the report said.  The IADB expressed concern over what it called a sharp increase of about three percentage points in international interest rates between the first quarter of 1988 and the first quarter of 1989.  If sustained, the report said, the higher rates would add roughly $10 billion to the annual debt-service burden of Latin American countries.  "The recent evolution of interest rates has thus added to the broad recognition that debt relief is urgent, and should be managed in an orderly, negotiated fashion, so that the countries can begin to devote a larger proportion of their foreign exchange availability and of their internal savings to higher imports and higher savings," the IADB said.  Generally, the IADB said the strong export performance of Latin American countries -- particularly Brazil and Mexico -- was one of the few "bright spots in an otherwise bleak economic picture" for developing countries in the region in 1988.  The international agency said a "spectacular increase" in the region's exports of manufactured goods offset a decline in the value of its exports of oil and natural gas.  While the volume of petroleum exports last year was about the same as in 1981, declining prices halved their value and helped cut their share of overall Latin American exports to 28% from 76% as recently as 1982.  At the same time, industrial exports, which had accounted for about 17% of all exports in the 1981-1982 period, reached 60% in 1988, the report said.  The biggest gains came in exports of machinery and transport equipment.  Brazil, Mexico, Venezuela and Argentina have long been Latin America's major exporting countries.  But the IADB report showed that the relative importance of Brazil and Mexico has increased, while Venezuela's and Argentina's share of total Latin American exports has been slipping.  The Greek government's economy minister predicted Friday that inflation in 1989 will reach 14.7%, while wage increases will be 16.4%.  He said that based on the inflation forecast, the government has set its automatic wage indexation at 9.2% for the final four months of 1989.  Canada's unemployment rate fell to 7.4% of the work force in August from 7.5% in July, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  Employment rose 73,000 to a seasonally adjusted 12,561,000.  Canadian steel ingot production totaled 287,669 metric tons in the week ended Sept. 2, up 0.5% from 286,110 tons a week earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The week's total was up 21.7% from 236,305 tons a year earlier.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  The cumulative total so far in 1989 is 10,662,112 tons, up 8.5% from 9,827,000 tons in the year-earlier period.  American Airlines, a unit of AMR Corp., said its August traffic rose 18%, to 7.38 billion revenue passenger miles from the previous year's 6.25 billion.  August load factor, or the percentage of seats filled, rose to 72.3% from 69.4%.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  For the first eight months of the year, American's traffic increased 16.1% to 49.70 billion revenue passenger miles from 42.81 billion for the same period of 1988.  Load factor for the eight months rose to 65.2% from 64.9%.  Biogen Inc. said its licensee, SmithKline Beecham Corp., received approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to market Biogen's recombinant hepatitis B vaccine in the U.S.  The vaccine is already sold internationally by SmithKline.  Comair Holdings Inc. said August traffic of its Comair unit rose 25% to 26.5 million revenue passenger miles from 21.1 million revenue passenger miles a year earlier.  For the first eight months of 1989, the regional carrier's traffic increased 26%, to 184.7 million revenue passenger miles, from 146.1 million revenue passenger miles a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is a paying passenger flown one mile.  Smith Laboratories Inc. said it named Timothy J. Wollaeger, 46 years old, president and chief executive officer, succeeding James B. Glavin, 53, who continues as chairman.  Smith also said an agreement to sell its Sutter Corp. unit to Rehabilitation Technologies Inc. for $12.5 million was ended.  Mr. Wollaeger also was named president and chief executive of Sutter, a maker of orthopaedic devices and the company's main operating unit.  Mr. Glavin has been chairman, acting president and acting chief executive of Smith since October 1985 when Henry Kuehn resigned from the top three posts.  Mr. Glavin is also president and chief executive of Immune Response Corp., a private biotechnology company.  "The growth of Immune Response warranted his full attention," says Mr. Wollaeger.  Mr. Glavin couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Wollaeger is a former senior vice president of Hybritech Inc., a maker of monoclonal antibodies for use in therapeutic and diagnostic applications.  He resigned to form Biovest Partners, a venture capital company, three years ago after Hybritech was acquired by Eli Lilly & Co., a pharmaceutical company, in March 1986.  Mr. Wollaeger formed Biovest with Howard E. Greene Jr., the founder of Hybritech.  Biovest has since formed five biotechnology companies but has recently been "in a less active mode," Mr. Wollaeger said.  He said he considered forming another venture capital fund for biotechnology companies but decided against it.  Mr. Wollaeger said he will continue as a partner in Biovest Partners.  Hubco Inc. named a new top operating officer, who immediately signaled that the one-bank holding company isn't satisfied holding one bank.  "We're interested in taking advantage of any {takeover} situations that might present themselves since the new thrift legislation" became law, said 41-year-old Kenneth T. Neilson.  Mr. Neilson, who was named to the post of president, said he hopes to complete an acquisition of a commercial bank or a thrift within a year.  He declined to say whether Hubco currently is talking with any targets.  Mr. Neilson was named to succeed John T. Clark, 62, president since 1977, who will remain a director.  The president's job is the top operating post at Hubco, which doesn't have a chief executive officer.  The chairman, James C. McClave, 63, still is "active at the bank" and hasn't outlined any specific retirement plans, Mr. Neilson said.  Hubco is the parent of Hudson United Bank, which has about $521 million of assets.  The bank has 15 branches in the northern New Jersey counties of Bergen, Hudson and Middlesex.  The new federal thrift legislation allows banks to buy healthy thrifts, and Mr. Neilson said any purchase would be in the Northeast.  Mr. Neilson, who joined the bank in 1983, was first senior vice president and senior lending officer and recently was named assistant to Mr. Clark.  Hubco's earnings were flat in 1988 at $5.2 million.  Interest income rose to $44.7 million from $40.6 million.  Separately, Joseph Barry, chief executive of real estate concern Applied Cos., was elected a director of Hubco, expanding the board to 14 members.  USG Corp. said its USG Interiors Inc. unit will build a new ceiling-tile plant in Aubange, Belgium.  Cost of the new plant, which is expected to begin production in late 1990, wasn't disclosed.  The building-materials concern began exporting its mineral fiber ceiling tiles to the European market in 1987.  IMC Fertilizer Group Inc. said that a combination of factors could make it "difficult if not impossible" to match year-earlier first-quarter results.  In the year-ago quarter, the fertilizer concern earned $31.5 million, or $1.26 a share, on sales of $268.6 million.  The company said in the first quarter, which typically has weak domestic volume, prices for key products fell.  But IMC said the price it receives for its phosphate rock continues strong despite a slight downturn in volume, while phosphate chemical prices "appear to have bottomed out."  In addition, potash prices remain fairly steady, the company said.  IMC said the most potential for improvement in its market lies in its projection that farmers, who cut their fertilizer use because of last year's drought, will return to more normal fertilizer application rates.  "Good moisture this summer will help alleviate fertilizer carry-over concerns and lessen drought fears," IMC said.  Mapco Coal Inc., a subsidiary of Mapco Inc., said it signed letters of intent to acquire substantially all the assets of Baltimore-based Jno.  McCall Coal Co. for an undisclosed amount of cash and the assumption of McCall's long-term debt.  Included in the proposed transaction are four McCall coal mines and 56 million tons of reserves of steam and metallurgical coal.  McCall's Spring Ridge mining complex is excluded, Mapco Coal said.  The Mapco unit estimated combined 1989 sales volume for the two firms at about 17 million tons of coal, with McCall contributing about 5.8 million tons of that.  About 11.5 million tons of the combined volume would be domestic sales, it said.  Mapco Coal currently has six mines.  It said the combined operation will be one of the four largest coal exporters on the East Coast.  The Mapco unit said it expects to close the transaction about Sept. 29.  The Department of Trade and Industry referred Britain's first proposed merger of local water companies to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission for review.  The referral, required by regulations governing the industry, will provide an early test of the government's position on competition and foreign shareholdings in the water industry.  The merger involves Colne Valley Water Co., Lee Valley Water Co. and Rickmansworth Water Co., three of the five companies supplying water to the Thames Water Authority.  Colne Valley and Rickmansworth are largely controlled by French water concerns Compagnie Generale des Eaux SA and Societe d'Amenagement Urbain et Rural SA. Companie Generale des Eaux also owns nearly 99% of Lee Valley Water.  The British government is scheduled to sell Thames and nine other water authorities in November in a share offering valued at about #7 billion ($10.9 billion).  The authorities will join 29 water companies already in the private sector.  The Department of Trade and Industry didn't indicate if the monopolies panel's three-month review would have any substantive bearing on the outcome of the proposed merger.  Analysts, however, said the commission isn't likely to find fault with the merger.  WCRS Group PLC appears close to completing a transaction that would give 50% or possibly a majority of its world-wide advertising unit to Eurocom.  Executives close to both companies said a sale is expected to be completed within about the next two weeks.  The sale would allow WCRS to concentrate on its other, more profitable business, media buying.  On Friday, WCRS said it was in discussions with a "major European communication group" regarding WCRS reducing its stake in its advertising unit.  WCRS, parent of Della Femina McNamee WCRS, declined to elaborate.  But industry executives identified the European firm as Eurocom, a big French agency that already holds 20% of the unit.  The executives said the discussions, which first were disclosed several months ago, include the possibility of Eurocom increasing its stake to half or more of the unit.  Meanwhile, WCRS said it is negotiating to raise its stake to a majority of its 50%-owned Carat Holding S.A., one of Europe's biggest media buying companies.  The agency said in a statement it wanted to increase its stake to effect "a greater degree of integration" between WCRS and Carat "so that the two partners can exploit the full potential of the European market."  If both transactions are completed, WCRS would be transformed from primarily an ad agency holding company to a concern dominated by its media buying business.  Securities analysts on both sides of the Atlantic said such a strategy could make sense.  Despite its best efforts, WCRS has never quite cracked the big leagues of advertising.  At the same time, it is saddled with #74 million ($115 million) in debt, and hasn't had enough cash for the advertising acquisitions it needs.  And London analysts estimate that Carat is already contributing more than half of WCRS's pretax profit.  In a June memo to employees, WCRS said it was in discussions with Eurocom about accelerating its advertising growth in order to crack the top 10 world-wide agencies; it currently is in the top 20.  Executives close to WCRS said proceeds from the sale of a stake in the advertising unit would go toward other ad agency acquisitions, especially in Europe.  "In the last 12 months, WCRS hasn't necessarily had those resources" to make acquisitions, said one executive close to the firm.  Selling the stake "will create the kind of financial resources to enable the advertising business to accelerate its expansion."  In its announcement, WCRS said that its negotiations were geared in part to expanding the advertising business.  But some analysts doubt that WCRS can make the leap into the top 10.  "It's pretty clear they don't have a realistic shot at being a leader in the advertising business," says James Dougherty, an analyst with County NatWest Securities.  "However, in the media buying area, that's a realistic objective.  They could be a leader there."  WCRS's Della Femina unit in the U.S. is well-known for creating pathological liar Joe Isuzu, and for its flamboyant chairman, Jerry Della Femina.  The London holding company also owns 49% of French ad agency Belier; Eurocom owns the remainder.  But WCRS isn't a strong presence in other European countries, such as Germany.  While the discussions with Eurocom have dragged on, Mr. Della Femina has gotten four offers from U.S. and British concerns interested in backing him in a new agency, industry executives said.  Mr. Della Femina turned the offers down, they said.  If Eurocom does gain control of WCRS's advertising business, however, the advertising executive probably will be compensated for his loyalty, some industry executives said.  Mr. Della Femina declined to comment.  WCRS's announcement follows months of speculation about the agency's talks with Eurocom, along with scattered bursts of takeover speculation.  In its statement Friday, WCRS said it hadn't been approached by any possible bidders, and that it isn't aware "of any stake-building exercise."  ---  Schalk to Leave BBDO  BBDO Worldwide said Willi Schalk, president and chief operating officer, will leave the agency at the end of the year.  The Omnicom Group unit said Mr. Schalk is leaving to pursue other interests in West Germany, which people close to him said would likely be a job in the media business.  Mr. Schalk, 49 years old, said: "I have throughout my career put the needs of the company above personal considerations, including my family and my health.  I have known for some time that I must change those priorities. . . ."  Mr. Schalk was the subject of an Advertising Age cover story in April, in which he talked about how he became seriously ill because of stress.  Mr. Schalk is responsible for international operations at BBDO. BBDO said Mr. Schalk won't be replaced, and that Allen Rosenshine, the agency's chairman, would assume his responsibilities. ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Sun Microsystems Inc., Mountain View, Calif., awarded its $10 million account to WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson unit, San Francisco.  The account had been handled by Melmon Tawa & Partners, Palo Alto, Calif. . . .  Deere & Co., Moline, Ill., awarded its $10 million account to Hal Riney & Partners, Chicago.  The account had previously been handled by N W Ayer, Chicago.  ACCEPTING ADS: Congressional Quarterly, the Washington weekly magazine, will accept advertising for the first time beginning in January 1990.  CQ, published by Times Publishing Co., has been ad-free since its introduction in 1945.  WHO'S NEWS: Len Sugarman, 49, formerly chairman of Foote, Cone & Belding's U.K. operations, said he opened his own agency.  The shop, called Sugarman Hedley-Noble Inc., is to be based in Miami.  FIBER-OPTIC SPOTS: US Sprint breaks a $40 million campaign today for its fax, data transfer and video teleconferencing network.  One spot shows its fiber-optic network being used to transmit medical documents to a hospital where an injured man has been rushed.  The campaign, with the tagline "It's a New World," was created by J. Walter Thompson, San Francisco.  Cambridge Analytical Associates Inc. holders approved its previously announced acquisition for $9.9 million, or $3.48 a share, and the transaction was completed.  The hazardous waste analysis company was acquired by National Environmental Testing Inc., a Cherry Hill, N.J., unit of Ocean Trading & Transport Ltd. of London.  National Environmental Testing operates 12 testing laboratories in the U.S., including the newly acquired one.  Ocean Trading is a freight-forwarding, warehousing and environmental concern.  First Chicago Corp. said Ravenswood Financial Corp. shareholders at a special meeting approved the banking concern's previously announced $55.1 million cash-and-stock buy-out bid.  Under the First Chicago offer, which remains subject to regulatory approval but is expected to close in the fourth period, Ravenswood stockholders will receive for each of their shares $11 in cash and $33 worth of First Chicago common stock.  Closely held Ravenswood is a bank holding company, also based in Chicago.  MHP Machines Inc. said it agreed in principle to sell "substantially all" its assets for $1.2 million of cash and notes and distribute most of the proceeds to shareholders.  MHP produces computer-controlled machining centers and other machine tools.  It has annual sales of $16 million.  The buyer agreed to assume most of MHP's about $4 million of debt and to pay some of MHP's expenses related to the transaction, MHP said.  If all conditions are met, the transaction is expected to be completed in four to six months, the company said.  The company has 1,084,000 shares outstanding.  Carrefour SA posted a 36% rise in first-half group profit to 467 million francs ($69.8 million) from 343 million francs a year earlier.  Revenue climbed 17% to 34.43 billion francs from 29.36 billion.  The distribution group said it expects profit for the full year to be up more than 20% from 1988's 911 million francs.  The company forecast a 15% increase in revenue from 1988's 64.83 billion francs.  Sony USA Inc., a unit of Japan's Sony Corp., said the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust act ended for its $14-a-share, or $60 million, offer to acquire Materials Research Corp.  Materials Research, based in Orangeburg, N.Y., makes semiconductor-coating and etching equipment, high-purity metals and ceramics.  The offer expires Sept. 18.  The nation's inflation rate hit a 10-year low in August, with consumer prices rising 1% from the previous month, the Bank of Mexico said.  The central bank said the inflation rate for the first eight months of 1989 now stands at 11.5%.  Sweden's foreign currency reserves rose 1.26 billion kronor ($188.5 million) to 68.94 billion kronor in the week ended Thursday, compared with an increase of three billion kroner registered in the previous week, according to Riksbank, Sweden's central bank.  The crisis over terrorist threats to kill American hostages in Lebanon has evaporated for the moment, and the U.S. government has settled back to await the next development.  It may be a long wait.  Whether the next step is a cowardly murder of a hostage or a quiet negotiation that finally leads to the captives' release, most of the analysts in and out of the government believe things are on hold for the moment and may stay that way for the foreseeable future.  All hasten to add that too little is known about the inner workings of Hezbollah -- the Lebanese organization linked to the kidnappings -- and its exact ties to Iran, to be sure what will happen next.  But several factors seem to foreshadow a continuing stalemate, in which the kidnappers probably won't kill more hostages for fear of losing leverage, but Iran's new government and Hezbollah's leaders will drag out any bargaining with contradictory signals and impossible demands -- at least for a while.  "There are no talks or anything like that going on," says a top State Department official involved with the problem.  "If there was a moment at which somebody might have pressed the right button, that moment is gone."  For now, he says, "we have to try and influence those who influence the terrorists.  The solution lies in Iran and Syria."  Hopes soared that Iran might have a new attitude toward the hostages when Hezbollah lifted its threat to kill hostage Joseph Cicippio last month and hinted that requests from Tehran played a part.  Then, in Iran, President Hashemi Rafsanjani ousted from his cabinet some of the most aggressive proponents of terrorism, especially Ali Akbar Mohtashemi, who personally had encouraged Hezbollah to go after Americans.  But hopes for an end to the hostage crisis have yet to be borne out, and frustrated U.S. officials admit they can't be sure why the murder was called off or what President Rafsanjani intends.  "I don't think they ever intended to kill Cicippio and the others," ventures a top French expert on Hezbollah who writes under the pen name of Xavier Raufer.  "Hostages for them are more than dollars, they are life insurance."  As for hints from the kidnappers about Iran's supposed beneficient intervention, he says "they probably wanted the Americans to believe that."  That doesn't mean that the kidnappers can't be induced to give up the captives, if their state patrons insist they do so.  Besides Iran, which is ruled by religious leaders to whom the terrorists swear loyalty, the hostage-taking gangs look to Syria, which controls the territory in Lebanon where they operate.  But the attitudes of Iran and Syria aren't clear.  Iran experts were cheered by the exit of Mr. Mohtashemi, but many believe he still exercises hard-line influence.  And his successor as Iran's interior minister, Abdollah Nouri, may also have been involved in sanctioning terrorism.  He was a top figure in the radical Revolutionary Guards, which is closely tied to Hezbollah.  And some investigators even believe he may have played a role in arranging the bombing of Pan Am flight 103 over Lockerbie, Scotland, last December.  Syrian President Hafez Assad seems unlikely to put much pressure on Hezbollah to give up the hostages right now, when he is seeking Hezbollah's support for his war against Lebanon's Christians.  The U.S. has quietly challenged the Soviet Union to prove it opposes terrorism by leaning on its Syrian clients to help free the hostages, but there has been no response so far.  Mr. Raufer believes Tehran holds the key to resolving the problem.  "The direction comes from Iran, and it will probably take a religious order to free the hostages," he says.  "Somebody in Tehran will have to let Hezbollah know that they're not interested in the hostages anymore.  Last year, France won the release of three hostages in an apparent -- but officially denied -- trade for restoring diplomatic relations with Iran and releasing funds Tehran was owed.  At the time, the French pact was widely attacked as a thinly veiled ransom.  But something like that is much talked about now as a way of releasing the U.S. hostages.  The Bush administration has hinted that, if Iran shapes up, the U.S. might consider freeing Tehran's funds here.  It would probably take a long time for Presidents Bush and Rafsanjani to reach such an agreement.  In the bazaars of the Middle East, bargains seem to be everywhere, but sealing a real accord, one that you can talk about with pride later, takes patience and guile.  American politicians aren't known for either.  Capital Holding Corp. said shareholders of Southlife Holding Co., Nashville, Tenn., approved the acquisition of Southlife by Capital Holding in a transaction valued at more than $80 million.  Capital Holding will exchange 0.2108 share of Capital Holding common stock and $2.10 of cash for each of the 5.4 million outstanding common shares of Southlife.  Capital Holding already purchased 96% of Southlife's two million shares of 12.5% cumulative Class A Preferred stock through a tender offer.  Remaining preferred shares are to be purchased at $11 a share.  Both concerns are financial-holding companies involved in life insurance and other financial services.  Pan Am Corp. said August traffic at its Pan American World Airways unit slipped 1.6% to 3.14 billion revenue passenger miles from 3.2 billion in the year-ago month.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Pan American's August load factor, or percentage of seats filled, edged downward to 76.1% from 76.4% a year ago.  Domestic traffic climbed 11% but was offset by a 7% downturn in trans-Atlantic revenue passenger miles.  For the year to date, traffic fell 2.6% to 19.46 billion revenue passenger miles from 19.99 billion.  Year-to-date load factor was 64.7%, off from 65.3%.  PhoneMate Inc. said its shareholders approved a $7.50-a-share offer by Asahi Corp. to acquire the maker of phone-answering machines.  Asahi, a Japanese electronics and optical concern, offered last November to acquire the 50.5% of PhoneMate stock it didn't already own for about $7.1 million.  PhoneMate, a maker of phone-answering machines, said it expects the acquisition will become effective today, and that letters of transmittal will be mailed to shareholders tomorrow.  Stone Container Corp. said it boosted its stake in Seminole Kraft Corp., a Jacksonville, Fla., paper mill, to 60% from 49%.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The mill had 1988 sales, all to Stone, of $153 million and profit of $9 million, Stone said.  Seminole will become a consolidated subsidiary of Stone, which said it has no plans to increase its stake further.  Barry K. Davis, the founder of Traders & Investors Alert, a telephone stock-tip line, is expected to disassociate himself from the service within a few weeks.  George J. Kundrat, a lawyer representing Mr. Davis, confirmed that New Jersey regulators are seeking Mr. Davis's departure from Traders & Investors Alert as a condition of allowing the service to continue operating in the state.  However, Mr. Kundrat says Mr. Davis isn't an owner of the service.  He described Traders & Investors as being owned by a corporate umbrella; but he said he couldn't provide the corporation's name, identify the owners or say where the corporation is incorporated because the corporate files weren't immediately available.  According to public records filed in Bergen County, N.J., Traders & Investors Alert is a registered trade name owned by Mr. Davis.  Mr. Kundrat says the trade name was filed by Mr. Davis on behalf of his employers.  But where the filing form requests "the true, real or full name or names, post office address and residence of all persons interested or members of such firm, partnership or business," only Mr. Davis's name and Cresskill, N.J., address appear.  "Obviously the form was not filed properly," the attorney says.  Mr. Davis has declined on several occasions to identify the owners of Fort Lee-based Traders & Investors but has said he isn't one of them.  He has called himself the "spiritual guide" of the service and said he draws a salary as an employee.  The Securities and Exchange Commission permanently barred Mr. Davis from the securities industry in 1971.  The ban means he can't associate with investment advisers or provide personal investment advice.  However, several Traders & Investors subscribers have told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that Mr. Davis and other employees have given them direct investment advice.  The Professional Investor Report reported last month that the New Jersey Bureau of Securities has been investigating Traders & Investors to determine whether the service acts as an unregistered investment adviser by dispensing stock tips to individuals.  No one at the service is registered with the state to provide investment advice, according to regulators.  Mr. Kundrat says he expects to receive copies of a draft agreement from New Jersey regulators today.  The agreement, which would require Mr. Davis's departure from Traders & Investors, apparently would enable the concern to continue to operate in the state.  New Jersey regulators declined to comment on the matter.  Reached by telephone at Traders & Investors, Mr. Davis declined to confirm or deny that he is leaving the company, but his voice has been heard less frequently on recent reports on the call-in service.  "I'm giving you no comment forever," Mr. Davis said.  Farr Co. approved the establishment of two employee stock ownership plans, which will operate in conjunction with the company's two profit-sharing plans.  "The company believes that the ESOPs will enable and encourage employees to become significant stockholders in the company on a pretax basis," said Allan B. Foy, Farr's chairman and president.  Farr, which makes filters, said it hasn't set any specific timetable for the purchase of its common stock.  As of March 17, according to proxy material, the company had 2.9 million shares outstanding.  Mesa Airlines said its August traffic rose 31%, to 6.6 million revenue passenger miles from five million the year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  The August load factor, or percentage of seats filled, declined to 46% from 51% last year.  For the year to date, Mesa reported an 18% increase in traffic, to 45.2 million revenue passenger miles from 38.4 million the year before.  Load factor for the year to date rose to 47% from 46%.  A Boston lawyer filed two class-action lawsuits on behalf of certain Wang Laboratories Inc. shareholders, charging that Wang and its two top officers violated securities laws by forecasting a corporate turnaround that failed to occur.  The suits name Wang, based in Lowell, Mass.; An Wang, its chairman and chief executive officer; and his son, Frederick Wang, who was president of the company until he resigned last month in the wake of huge losses.  The suits, filed by Thomas Shapiro, seek to represent people who bought Wang shares between Sept. 23, 1988, and Aug. 16, 1989.  Damages weren't specified.  MedChem Products Inc. said that the U.S. District Court in Boston scheduled for Sept. 25 a hearing on a 1984 patent suit by Pharmacia Inc. against MedChem that had been stayed.  The hearing will determine the validity of a patent held by Upsala, Sweden-based Pharmacia for hyaluronic acid-based products.  Pharmacia is the world-wide market leader in selling the product, which is used to lubricate the eye during surgery.  Pharmacia alleges that MedChem's Amvisc product infringes on a U.S. patent assigned to Pharmacia and is seeking to enjoin MedChem from selling Amvisc.  The suit had been stayed by mutual agreement after a challenge to the patent by another company caused the patent to be invalidated.  MedChem said the August 1986 decision of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office to reject the Pharmacia patent was reversed in a re-examination proceeding by the Patent and Trademark Office's Board of Appeals last month.  As a result, the lawsuit was resumed.  "We continue to believe that Pharmacia's patent is not valid and, in any event, that MedChem does not infringe," said Dr. David A. Swann, MedChem's chairman and chief executive officer.  Peter Main, director of marketing for Nintendo of America Inc., says that by mid-1990, Nintendo hopes to introduce in the U.S. a nationwide network capable of joining games players from coast to coast in such video ventures as nationwide golf tournaments.  As previously reported, Mr. Main said the company has had discussions with American Telephone & Telegraph Co. about providing the telephone lines needed to link the Nintendo users.  Last week, he said Nintendo also has approached parties other than AT&T, but declined to identify them.  Mr. Main spoke with Dow Jones Professional Investors Report following a presentation at a Bear, Stearns & Co. toy conference in Boston.  "It's not a done deal," Mr. Main cautioned, but added that the company hopes to introduce the system by the middle of next year.  The system would allow Nintendo users to communicate with each other using modems.  A modem is a device that converts information to a form that can be transmitted, as by telephone, to data-processing equipment, where a similar device reconverts it.  Mr. Main conceded that the U.S. market for a Nintendo network of computers "unquestionably starts with games," but adds that other uses such as banking services and brokerage information could be developed later.  The company's Japanese parent, Nintendo Co., already provides such services to Nintendo owners in Japan.  Mr. Main also said it is unlikely Nintendo would consider acquiring a major U.S. toy company.  As he told the toy conference, Mr. Main said Nintendo's strategy is to acquire companies that would complement the video game computer and software maker's technology.  "We're not interested in acquisitions of businesses just for the sake of growth," Mr. Main said.  Mr. Main said any potential acquisitions wouldn't include large toy companies such as Tonka Corp. or Hasbro Inc.  While sales volumes of such companies could add to Nintendo's existing business, they wouldn't bring any new technological dimensions to the company, he said.  The stocks of several toy companies have risen in the past on rumors that the Japanese-based company is a likely suitor.  Mr. Main cautioned that he "can never say 'never,'" but said at this point such an acquisition doesn't fall into the company's strategy.  Mr. Main said that the company's outlook is "excellent," despite analysts' predictions of an industrywide decline in video game sales.  Nintendo of America says it commands 80% of the estimated $2.4 billion retail video game market in the U.S.  Both Bear Stearns analyst Steven Eisenberg and Sean McGowan, a New York-based analyst at the conference, told PIR that they expect industrywide video game sales to fall next year as much as 5% to 15%, particularly as sales by Atari and Sega fall off sharply.  Mr. McGowan estimates industrywide sales this year will rise only 5% to 10% to about $2.6 billion or $2.7 billion, with Nintendo increasing its ever-widening market share.  Mr. Main, on the other hand, told the conference that his company sees 1989 industrywide sales of $3.4 billion, compared with $2.3 billion in 1988.  Nintendo expects its sales to rise to $2.6 billion, up from $1.7 billion a year earlier.  The two analysts expect gains from Nintendo this year, but Mr. McGowan says he thinks the company could show a sales decline next year, while Mr. Eisenberg says it's too early to tell.  The U.S. and European Community said talks on agricultural issues, including a long-running dispute over hormones in meat, have gone well despite signs that serious differences are likely to emerge in the next few months.  U.S. Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter said discussions with EC officials had left him "mildly encouraged" about the future of negotiations within the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade aimed at curbing farm subsidies.  Mr. Yeutter and his EC counterpart, Agriculture Commissioner Raymond MacSharry, also indicated that the two sides have managed to shelve, at least for now, a disagreement over the controversial new hormone bovine somatotropin, or BST, which increases milk production in cows.  In addition, Mr. MacSharry said there has been progress in efforts to resolve an EC-U.S. dispute over the community's ban on hormones in beef, predicting that Washington soon may scale back further its trade sanctions against the EC. Mr. Yeutter, however, was more cautious on this issue, saying that progress would depend on whether there is an increase in U.S. shipments to the EC of hormone-free meat.  But both Messrs.  Yeutter and MacSharry, who met for several hours last week in Brussels, indicated that the EC and U.S. remain far apart on several key aspects of the GATT farm talks, now heading into their final phase.  Mr. MacSharry said the community will resist a U.S. plan to change all forms of agricultural protection into tariffs.  EC officials said such a move would hit at the heart of the EC's Common Agricultural Policy, which cushions EC farmers against developments on world markets.  Mr. Yeutter, meanwhile, said the U.S. is "vigorously opposed" to the EC's call for a "rebalancing" of tariffs on farm products.  In exchange for accepting some tariff reductions, the community wants to be allowed to impose tariffs on products that currently enter the EC duty-free.  These include major U.S. exports to the EC such as soybeans and corn gluten.  Both sides are expected to put forward position papers on these issues in the next few months.  Concerning BST, the U.S. appeared to back away from earlier criticism of the EC's plan to hold off regulatory approval of the hormone until 1990.  The hormone, developed by U.S. drug companies, is expected to be cleared for use in the U.S. soon.  But the commission, fearing a backlash from consumers and some farmers, wants to wait for more scientific evidence before allowing use of the hormone, which can increase milk production by 25%.  Aided by huge trade surpluses, high savings rates and low costs of capital, Japan now has, by most measures, all 10 of the world's largest banks.  Will they soon dominate global banking?  Perhaps.  Noting that "the financial-service industry is now experiencing the same movement toward globalization which occurred in many goods-producing industries during the 1950s and 1960s," David D. Hale, the chief economist at Kemper Financial Services Inc., sees the Japanese banks charging ahead with powerful advantages.  He cites their concentration: Japan has only 158 commercial banks; the U.S., more than 14,000.  He also says that, aided by "cooperative leveraging," the booming Tokyo stock market "has recently become a major source of funds," and the market capitalization of the 13 largest Japanese banks now totals some $500 billion.  "Because of their access to cheap equity," Mr. Hale adds, "Japanese financial institutions are poised to dominate the world financial system during the 1990s while American banks will be constrained by low share-price multiples and a stock-market capitalization of only $95 billion for the nation's 50 largest institutions."  Another advantage enjoyed by Japanese banks, says Edward J. Kane, a professor of economics and finance at Ohio State University, is the fact that "they are holding strong assets, while U.S. and British banks have had hidden losses, on Third World loans, farm loans and bad mortgages."  So, Mr. Hale sees dangers ahead.  "If the U.S. maintains an open-market policy in financial services," he says, "it is easy to imagine how the foreign share of the domestic banking marketplace could expand dramatically during the 1990s.  Once barriers to American interstate banking come down next year, the Japanese could use their strong California base to expand into retail banking throughout the Western United States. . . .  Because of their highly competitive pricing, some Japanese officials believe that Japanese banks could increase their share of the U.S. commercial-banking market to 25% by the mid-1990s."  In California, according to Gary C. Zimmerman, an economist at the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, Japanese-owned banks "held one-quarter of the banking assets and over 30% of all business loans" at the end of 1988.  However, he says their "expansion has not occurred at the expense of domestic banks' market share. . . .  Japanese banks essentially have replaced other foreign banks as the dominant foreign banking power," mostly by following longtime customers into the state.  And so far, he finds little evidence that Japanese banks in California are relying heavily on low-cost funds supplied by their parent companies.  In any event, a Japanese conquest of U.S. banking isn't a sure thing.  Noting that Japan's big securities firms have flopped on Wall Street, Jeremy Siegel, a professor of finance at the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School, comments: "Competition in banking is much like competition in any other area.  Largeness doesn't always mean more efficiency.  You can become top-heavy and fail to find niches.  And, unlike automobiles, quality doesn't enter into it; money is money."  He adds:  "I don't know if they know the American market, how to judge the risk of a loan or what they know about the bankruptcy law.  Getting the flavor of the legal as well as the financial structure isn't easy."  And American banks benefit from some competitive edges of their own.  Prof.  Siegel observes that the U.S., unlike Japan, has a deposit-insurance system that gives them "a very cheap source of deposits."  In addition, "we still have the most liquid market in the world for short-term securities."  Moreover, trends within Japan may reduce Japanese banks' advantages.  "As more savings flow offshore," Mr. Hale says, "the cost of capital in Japan should rise."  He also expects Japan's rapidly aging population "to start consuming the financial surpluses now being accumulated" in retirement nest eggs.  And he suspects that Japanese of all ages, tired of economizing, might switch to a freer-spending life style.  If Japan keeps expanding its economic power here at a politically unacceptable pace, Mr. Hale expects the U.S. to respond "by pursuing managed-trade policies in both financial services and manufactured goods.  Despite his free-trade rhetoric, Ronald Reagan was the most protectionist U.S. president since the early 1930s, and the odds are high that the Bush administration will edge further away from free trade."  Mr. Hale also suggests Japan's central bank will eventually act to ease the tension with the U.S. by restraining its banks.  But what if Japan's banks do keep growing -- and take full advantage of their power?  Mr. Hale asks disturbing questions:  "If Japan controls the world's largest supply of long-term capital, will Japan be able to buy technology in the U.S. and Europe which it is not capable of developing at home?  Are there national-security risks in letting U.S. entrepreneurs become heavily dependent on foreign institutions for financing research and development?  "If Japanese banks have large cross-shareholdings with Japanese industrial companies, can they be considered autonomous players in the way they handle classified information from U.S. customers in sectors potentially vulnerable to Japanese competition?  If Japanese banks use their capital advantage and pricing power to dominate the wholesale lending market for high-quality corporations, will American banks be forced to go down market in terms of credit quality and thus become de facto repositories for 'junk' loans?"  the mindless brawl that its detractors depict, but it undeniably demands the kind of physical aggression that under other circumstances would land its practitioners in the clink.  Considered thusly, it's perhaps a wonder that most outstanding pugilists have been upstanding citizens as well.  That Mike Tyson, the planet's current heavyweight champion, has yet to pull off this trick is one source of the public's fascination with him.  In the ring, the stocky 23-year-old possesses the most potent combination of hand speed and punching power that many of us have seen.  Out of it, he has been a threat mostly to himself, his private life a mishmash of auto wrecks, street brawls, brushes with the law, contractual disputes and a marriage made in tabloid heaven.  Mike's meanderings make for interesting reading and not a little puzzlement.  Three new books on Tyson are on the market, and while all provide some of the former, they reduce little of the latter.  The problem, I guess, lies more with the subject than the authors.  Nobody seems to have much of a line on what the guy will do next, or why.  Two of the books are reportorial jobs.  "Bad Intentions: The Mike Tyson Story" (NAL Books, 378 pages, $18.95) is by Peter Heller, a sports producer for ABC-TV.  Its title derives from the advice given to young Mike by Cus D'Amato, his late mentor and guardian, on the most effective motive power behind a boxer's punches.  "Blood Season: Tyson and the World of Boxing" (Morrow, 318 pages, $18.95) is by Phil Berger, who covers the sport for the New York Times.  The third, and so far most ballyhooed, work is "Fire & Fear: The Inside Story of Mike Tyson" (Warner Books, 242 pages, $16.95).  It's by ex-fighter Jose Torres, who has functioned variously as Tyson's counselor and pal, and head of the New York State Athletic Commission.  Tyson seems to have read it, because he has denounced Torres as a traitor, and drummed him out of his camp.  Among Torres's juiciest tidbits are a conversational confession by the champ that he enjoys hurting women during sex, and the revelation that one or more of his playmates had retaliated surreptitiously: Tyson fought both Trevor Berbick and James "Bonecrusher" Smith while full of antibiotics he took to combat gonorrhea.  Torres also quotes Tyson to the effect that his best punch ever was landed on (now ex-) wife Robin Givens, but the fact that the slightly built actress survived such a blow from the man who stopped 220-pound Carl Williams with a single left hook puts that story in doubt.  Of the three authors, Heller gets the highest grade for research.  He took the hardest look at the background of the shadowy D'Amato, who once played ball with underworld types to advance his fighters' careers.  D'Amato made Tyson his adopted son as much to protect his boxing interest in the youth as for reasons of sentiment, Heller writes.  If nothing else, "Bad Intentions" is worth reading for its lengthy record of the perfidy of the electric-haired Don King, who has made himself the fighter's de facto manager as well as promoter.  Berger takes a broader look at boxing in the 1980s and also gives brief biographical attention to such Tyson contemporaries as the Spinks brothers and Gerry Cooney, a hard case if there ever was one.  Berger is intrigued by money trails, and looks into the backroom dealings that go into Fight Nite USA.  His best stuff on the Tyson lifestyle is similarly financial.  He obtained an accountant's record of Iron Mike's expenditures for 1987 that show the boxer paying $219,819 for jewelry, $178,314 for clothes and $55 for food.  One can assume only that someone else paid for the guy's meals.  Torres's book is hampered by a slapdash writing style and overreliance on profanity-ridden Tyson quotes.  A handful of the "f" and "s" words would have served to characterize Tyson's speech as well as the bucketful Torres includes.  His research, moreover, is sloppy.  For instance, he passes along without comment the line that Jim Jacobs, the fighter's late co-manager, was born wealthy.  Berger and Heller take pains to document the curious fact that Jacobs was self-made but wouldn't admit it, and to relate that to other contradictions about this unusual man.  As an ex-pug and earlier D'Amato protege, though, Torres has been places the journalists haven't, and he enjoyed superior access to his subject.  And despite the jumble of his narrative, he may have gotten closer to the real Tyson than his fellow authors.  He passes on, as they do, the basic outline of Tyson's life -- his ghetto upbringing, transformation by the monklike Cus from juvenile punk to ring destroyer, and his present profligacy -- but writes with seemingly greater insight.  And it's just possible that Tyson has more than a clue about what he's up to.  Torres quotes him as saying that most people have it wrong about his being deprived as a youngster; his fists gave him what he wanted on the streets and then the doting D'Amato and now his boxing millions did the same.  "I can understand a spoiled kid from a rich family or a poor one," says the champ.  "I was spoiled in both."  Felice N. Schwartz recently had to face an unpleasant fact: "To a great many women in the country, I was . . . their enemy."  Ms. Magazine portrayed the longtime champion of women's rights as a traitor to feminists, the Harvard Business Review ran pages of letters castigating her and she faced the wrath of talk-show callers coast to coast.  Such notoriety for the president of Catalyst, a New York research and consulting group, was one of her rewards for advocating rerouting some career women onto the so-called Mommy Track.  Ms. Schwartz herself never used the term, and strongly disavows it.  But it was her article in the Harvard Business Review earlier this year that forced the issue to the fore by suggesting that women who are committed more to family than career should be given greater flexibility -- but eased off the fast track.  The article "crystalized . . . anger and frustration" women already felt toward bosses that do precisely what Ms. Schwartz advised -- allow them to be active parents only at the expense of their careers, says Fran Rodgers, president of Work Family Directions, Watertown, Mass.  The latest issue of New York Woman labels it "the grateful-dead syndrome."  Today, Ms. Schwartz, as well as some of her critics, feels the uproar has only raised consciousness in corporate America and done nothing to undermine Catalyst's clout.  Her fall calendar is full of lecture engagements, launched with a talk last week to Wall Street managers.  Says Ms. Schwartz: "I have a lot of credibility and a lot of access and I am using it to do things for women."  In October, Catalyst will release the first part of a 50-company study on alternative work schedules.  But the heat of emotion she aroused shows the deep split over issues of work and family that remain nearly two decades after women began pouring into the work force.  At the heart of the matter remains an as-yet-unanswered question: Should corporate culture or women's ambitions bend more to accommodate family life?  Ms. Schwartz's answers reflect in part a strategic shift in the organization that began by championing women's entry into the work place.  One of Catalyst's first projects back in 1964 was to get the Boston welfare office to advertise -- reluctantly -- for 50 part-timers to fill 25 full-time jobs that had gone begging; 1,600 applicants responded.  In those days, she says, Catalyst's constituency was "the returning woman" -- the affluent, educated class of '45 who'd been home raising the baby boom and was now looking for more lucrative work.  Today, she says, "our constituency is no longer women, our constituency is business."  The relationship is clear enough in Catalyst's sleek annual report, which lists contributions up to $30,000 from companies such as International Business Machines Corp., Exxon Corp. and General Motors Corp.  So Ms. Schwartz wrote her piece, she says, thinking "what can {I say} that will be real" to the white male chief executive officers who run most companies.  Many of them got there, she says, by sacrificing relationships with their families, and aren't ready to hear that those who succeed them should go to all the Little League games that they missed.  But her pitch wasn't only strategic; while she urges companies to adjust, Ms. Schwartz herself doesn't expect to see corporate life transformed.  "You can't be a CEO and be a primary player in your children's lives," she declares, adding that the "18-hour day" is not going to disappear.  Critics fault her for so readily accepting the classic corporate equation that advancement means single-minded devotion to work.  The article's biggest fault, says Ms. Rodgers, who also consults to Fortune 500 companies, was its "lack of challenge to basic corporate culture."  Others argue that some companies have already gone beyond Ms. Schwartz's suggestions.  Mobil Corp. recently said that it was one of the unnamed companies in Ms. Schwartz's article that had determined that women cost companies more than men, largely because of turnover.  But Mobil says it isn't tracking employees; it is restructuring the corporation -- by making relocations less frequent, for example.  For Ms. Schwartz, the article was a dose of reality, and that's why it rankled.  "It hit a nerve in women that made them look at their own anxieties; their fear of being shunted" aside.  Ms. Schwartz will continue to talk in a language she thinks rings true in the corner offices.  "The years for pushing {corporations to act} are over," she says.  She believes that top-level response to her article is proof positive.  "I come out of {corporate} meetings lately just euphoric, knowing that they really recognize that {flexibility for women} is something that makes business sense."  A top executive at Eaton Corp., she says, told her recently his personal goal was to put "his thumb print" on a program of changes for women.  Westcoast Energy Inc. said it expects a planned 500 million Canadian dollar (US$421.5 million) natural gas pipeline and distribution system linking this province's mainland with Vancouver Island to spur industrial development along its 330-mile route.  "Where gas goes, industrial development tends to follow, whether the gas is used for processing or for fuel," Westcoast's president and chief executive officer, Michael Phelps, said in an interview.  Westcoast and Alberta Energy Co., based in Calgary, jointly own Pacific Coast Energy Co., which will operate the pipeline.  Critics contend that the long-proposed project, which won British Columbia government clearance last week and is heavily subsidized by the provincial and federal governments, isn't economically viable.  Mr. Phelps said Pacific Coast Energy expects to reach long-term supply agreements with seven pulp mills along the pipeline's route in the next few weeks.  Construction of the line is expected to begin next month, pending federal approvals, and initial gas deliveries are scheduled for late 1990, he said.  The pipeline and distribution network are expected to add about 5% to Westcoast's utility rate base, which a company official said should reach about C$800 million next year.  The figures don't include Westcoast's pending C$462 million acquisition of the natural gas utility arm of Toronto-based Inter-City Gas Corp., which mainly serves customers in Ontario and Manitoba and has a rate base of about C$750 million.  That transaction is expected to close by year's end.  John Podmore, Westcoast's comptroller, said the Inter-City purchase and planned capital spending of about C$340 million next year, much of it related to the Vancouver Island project, are expected to raise Westcoast's consolidated long-term debt above C$1.6 billion by the end of 1990 from C$781.1 million in mid-1989.  Mr. Phelps said Westcoast expects to shrink debt within five years "back to historical levels" of less than 60% of total capital, compared with a projected 65% at the end of 1989.  In view of Westcoast's spending commitments, Mr. Phelps said, "in the short term, we feel constrained" from pursuing a major acquisition to bolster the company's oil and gas holdings, which have grown rapidly in recent years.  Mr. Phelps said he expects profit this year to be higher than in 1988, when the company had net income of C$62 million, or C$1.12 a share, on revenue of C$837.8 million.  He didn't offer a specific estimate, but he said the impact of the Inter-City purchase will be "minimal" this year.  Next year, he said, Westcoast expects Inter-City's utility business to add about 10 Canadian cents a share to earnings.  In the 1989 first half, Westcoast had net of C$36.8 million, or 67 Canadian cents a share, up about 8% from a year earlier.  Big international banks used to fume about being shut out of Scandinavian markets.  Now after a few years on the inside, a lot of them wonder why they ever bothered.  Three years ago, almost a dozen foreign banks rushed into Stockholm, hoping to forge cozier relations with big Swedish international corporations.  Nearly as many set up shop in Oslo, with an eye toward Norway's offshore oil business and big shipping industry.  The newcomers got a rude reception.  Sweden's powerful domestic banks deftly guarded their corporate clients and bloodied outsiders such as Citicorp that tried to crowd into Stockholm's lucrative foreign-exchange business.  According to Sweden's Bankers Association, nine Swedish units of international banks reported a combined loss of 8.6 million Swedish kronor ($1.3 million) last year, although that was narrower than the year-earlier loss of 63.2 million kronor.  Norway's oil-dominated economy collapsed soon after the foreign banks arrived.  And although it may have been of some consolation to the banks that they missed the pinnacle of the consumption boom -- and thus escaped the vast losses that have crippled some big local banks in recent years -- there wasn't much scope for growth.  ---  Norway's bankers association calculates that eight foreign banking units posted a combined 1988 profit of 10.9 million Norwegian kroner ($1.5 million), down 40% from 18.3 million kroner in 1987.  But excluding Manufacturers Hanover Norge AS, by far Scandinavia's most profitable foreign banking unit, Oslo-based international banks swung to a loss of 5.1 million kroner from a profit of 3.7 million kroner.  Foreign banks' actual results probably aren't as bad as official figures suggest.  "Lots of deals are originated and structured here but for administrative reasons booked somewhere else" in the parent bank's international network, says one executive in Stockholm.  But most international bankers agree that returns on increasingly precious bank capital are still too low to guarantee their units' survival.  France's Banque National de Paris S.A. and Finland's Kansallis-Osake-Pankki closed their Stockholm operations last year.  None of the international banks has left Norway yet, but Chase Manhattan Bank's Oslo unit has cut its activities to about the same level as when the bank had a representative office in the city.  ---  Monetary authorities are glum about foreign banks' performances so far.  "The reason we let them in was to create more competition for big local banks, but that hasn't happened," one Scandinavian central banker says.  "We may have underestimated the forces of concentration in banking structures here."  Foreign bankers scoff that free competition has never really been tested in the Scandinavian markets.  For example, foreign banks are still barred from opening branches and acquiring domestic banks or other types of financial service companies.  "As long as the discrimination continues, most of us won't be profitable," says the president of one Oslo-based international bank unit.  Lately, though, that has begun to change.  Feeling the pressure of the European Community's 1992 single-market plan, both Sweden and Norway abolished longstanding foreign-exchange controls and opened their domestic bond markets to foreign investors.  Perhaps even more important, domestic institutional investors are now allowed to invest freely abroad, opening up a promising new lode of international business.  Other curbs -- such as a vexing ban on branch operations -- are expected to disappear later this year.  And banking authorities in both Sweden and Norway concede privately that even the law preventing the acquisition of domestic banks by foreigners could disappear under the threat of reciprocal treatment of Swedish and Norwegian banks in EC nations.  Such steps would mark a big improvement.  But few analysts expect foreign banks ever to pose a serious threat to domestic rivals.  Even global giants like Citicorp have scaled back ambitions in Scandinavia, retreating to niche strategies.  Meanwhile, alliances with local partners are increasingly popular among European banks.  Ventures involving Cie.  Financiere de Suez and Cie.  Financiere de Paribas aim to tap Scandinavian businesses' interest in expansion in Europe in preparation for 1992.  For the Scandinavian businesses, partners in Europe can provide lucrative corporate finance and mergers-and-acquisitions assignments, bankers say, while investment alliances in Scandinavian countries help European banks sidestep many curbs on foreign ownership.  Getting on the inside track with local companies is the secret of Manufacturers Hanover Corp.'s success in Norway.  It has thrived as a niche player in the country's growing shipping market.  A hefty portfolio of Norwegian shipping loans -- which executives say sometimes has approached $1 billion over the past two years -- fueled a 5% gain in net income last year to 16 million kroner from 15.2 million kroner a year earlier.  That's about triple the profit any international rival in Scandinavia has yet achieved.  But Norwegian shippers don't really view Manufacturers Hanover as a foreign bank.  The bank has been a fixture in Oslo ever since a Norwegian-American chief executive dispatched loan officers to his former homeland in the early 1900s.  After four months of positively Middle Eastern name-calling and hand-wringing, "Days of Rage" -- the pro-Palestinian documentary -- finally aired Wednesday.  To no one's surprise, the 90-minute film was surrounded and smothered: First came Hodding Carter's commentary, then two separate pieces from the Israeli point of view, then a half-hour debate, and a long disclaimer on the program's financing.  PBS, in short, was so desperate to blunt the sharp edges of "Days of Rage" that it padded the program with every kind of qualifier, disclaimer and long-winded excuse you could think of: ". . . you will exercise your own best judgment in evaluating these issues."  After all that hemming and hawing, you had the sense that what they actually wanted to say was "Frankly, we didn't want to run the damn thing at all."  Which is too bad, because "Days of Rage" does a real service.  It presents a point of view rarely heard in the U.S. -- that of the insurrectionary Palestinians in the Occupied Territories -- and broadens the discussion of a complex issue.  As promised, Producer Jo Franklin-Trout takes us inside the lives of these young Arabs and shows us "who they are . . . and what they want."  For the 650,000 Palestinians living in the 26 refugee camps, the small towns, and the prisons along the West Bank and Gaza Strip, life is harsh.  In a region that's parched and barren to begin with, they are trapped in absolute squalor, living 10 to a room, without comforts and without a future.  But what they miss most is the pride of having a homeland.  And so, after decades of living under the Israeli occupation, a young generation, a fierce, hot-headed generation, started an insurrection they call the Intifada.  Now "Days of Rage" never sees this story from the other point of view, from the justifiable fears of an Israeli people, surrounded on all sides by Arab neighbors who for years have been bent on the destruction of Israel.  But Ms. Franklin-Trout's film is advocacy journalism, and so one makes certain allowances, for a while, as long as the film makes its points with cogency and force.  Opening with fast-paced, slickly intercut shots -- tear gas in the streets, dark silhouettes with machine guns, green-clad soldiers dragging off Arab teen-agers -- Ms. Franklin-Trout catalogs the brutality of the Israeli army: A seven-year-old girl explaining how her father took three bullets in the heart, right in front of her house.  A man describing how his brother had his brains blown out at point-blank range.  When Ms. Franklin-Trout lets these Palestinians tell their story, her film is quite effective.  To me, one of the most moving moments in "Days of Rage" is the gentle humor of Dr. Nabil Jabari, president of Hebron University, as he describes how he (like many other Palestinian doctors, lawyers and intellectuals) was arrested and thrown in jail for no reason other than "the safety of the republic."  Describing the conditions -- no running water, no cots, no soap -- he explains how he missed having a mirror most of all: "I missed my face," he laughs, "it's strange."  But if the Palestinians put their own case eloquently, Ms. Franklin-Trout mangles that case.  And that's why, in the end, for all the tragedies it exposes, I believe "Days of Rage" is a failure.  Not because of the muddy sound or the sloppy jump cuts, although they don't help.  No, it's because as writer/director/producer and reporter, Ms. Franklin-Trout has been intellectually slipshod.  Wanting her film to have the aura of objectivity, Ms. Franklin-Trout begins by adopting the pose of the network anchor.  She delivers opening lines that presuppose a reasonableness, a fairness, a balance: "Tonight, we take you inside the territory to look at the realities that led to the rebellion."  Sounds sensible.  Sounds objective.  And then suddenly, we're into this warped, one-sided view of history (with Israelis recklessly attacking Arab countries on all sides through the ages).  There's nothing wrong with advocacy journalism, but you can't have it both ways.  Out on the streets of the West Bank, Ms. Franklin-Trout does an evening news reporter's stand-up for the camera -- another convention we associate with objective television. (In fact, Ms. Franklin-Trout has the polish of a news correspondant, and a voice surprisingly like Diane Sawyer's.) But what reporter would compare Molotov-cocktail-throwing Palestinians to Mahatma Gandhi, as she does?  What reporter would gleefully talk about "bringing the {Israeli} economy to its knees"?  And what reporter would ask such blatantly leading questions? -- "You mean it could be an indefinite length of time before the Israelis give you a permit allowing you to rebuild, that you have to live like this?"  Or, "Your teenage son is in jail just for throwing stones?"  In fact, Ms. Franklin-Trout continually undermines her own film.  Along the way, for example, we see demolished homes and children with brutally beaten features.  Now these are shocking indictments of Israeli law enforcement, no doubt about it, but it starts to feel like a dog-and-pony show that's being trotted out for our benefit.  What were the children doing?  We learn later that the Intifada leadership often sends them out to throw rocks and lead Israeli soldiers into traps.  Is that what happened here?  We'll never know because she didn't ask.  In fact, that's the problem with this whole film -- she didn't ask.  Never the hard question.  Never the follow-up question.  Ms. Franklin-Trout just takes whatever is spoon-fed her.  Which means that "Days of Rage" is not advocacy journalism, because it's not any kind of journalism.  Sitting at the feet of an attractive young Palestinian, she stares deeply into his eyes as he tells her of rubber bullets.  "Are the children afraid to go out at night?" she asks breathlessly.  After a while, the viewer's reaction shifts from anger at Israeli oppression to embarrassment at Ms. Franklin-Trout's naivete, and annoyance at her innocent zeal.  After a while, "Days of Rage" doesn't even work as propaganda, because it's so heavyhanded.  The best advocacy acknowledges the other side's points, and counters them.  But for Ms. Franklin-Trout, the Israelis don't even exist, except as straw men.  How much more powerful a film "Days of Rage" would have been if she'd said: "Obviously, the Israelis are extremely concerned about the security of their borders, but in the West Bank that fear has led them to go too far . . . ."   So, in the end, this isn't "Days of Rage."  This is 90 minutes of soggy thinking.  And the shame of it all -- for PBS and the viewers -- isn't that "Days of Rage" aired.  The shame is that it wasn't better.  The Securities and Exchange Commission began examining a controversial municipal bond deal from South Tucson, Ariz., some time ago but didn't pursue the matter after Arizona authorities began litigation on the bond issue, according to an internal SEC memo.  At issue was a $178.4 million bond offering sold in early 1985 by the South Tucson Industrial Development Authority for multifamily housing.  This was the largest of three companion bond issues from Arizona, totaling $368.4 million.  All three deals were declared "not tax exempt" by the Internal Revenue Service this year as a result of violations of tax rules designed to prevent arbitrage abuses in the municipal bond market.  Arbitrage is earned by investing bond proceeds in higher-yielding instruments.  Bond market participants have said that the failure of federal authorities to deal in a decisive and timely fashion with these widely publicized bond issues from Arizona gave a green light for what turned out to be a surge of apparently arbitrage-driven bond issues that came to market in the period prior to enactment of the 1986 Tax Reform Act.  They noted the IRS's decision to declare the three issues not tax-exempt didn't come until late last March.  The SEC memo said the South Tucson bonds were issued for "luxury high-rise apartments" in "an extremely economically depressed community."  The IRS concluded all three bond issues were sold to earn arbitrage profits and that there weren't reasonable expectations when the bonds were sold of building the projects in question.  Efforts on the part of the three authorities in Arizona to cement a deal with the IRS to prevent bondholders from being taxed are nearing a conclusion.  The IRS wants to recoup $6.6 million through such a pact.  Arbitrage earnings on the three deals have been estimated at about $20 million.  The SEC staff discussed the South Tucson deal briefly in a confidential memo -- a copy of which was obtained by a Dow Jones Capital Markets Report reporter -- which centered on the agency's investigation of the municipal bond market dealings of Matthews & Wright Group Inc., which it later charged with fraud.  The firm turned in its broker-dealer license in an agreement with the SEC under which it neither admitted nor denied the agency's charges.  "About the time this investigation started {in 1987}, Commission staff in the San Francisco Branch Office had begun examining the South Tucson deal," the memo said.  "An informant had come forward to testify that the South Tucson deal was a sham done solely to earn arbitrage without any intention of ever building the apartments.  "In the meantime the Arizona Securities Commission has commenced litigation over the South Tucson deal, and as a result, neither the staff in San Francisco nor Washington has further examined that deal," the SEC memo added.  The South Tucson issue and the two other companion deals all were underwritten by Birr, Wilson & Co., which went out of business last year.  Arizona authorities remain in litigation with certain other deal participants, including bond lawyer Barry Wolfson.  The SEC memo, in reviewing various Matthews & Wright deals, cited the involvement of Mr. Wolfson's law partner, Martin Frankel, in a $500 million East Chicago Heights, Ill., bond issue underwritten by Matthews & Wright in August 1986 in what the SEC called a "cashless closing."  According to the memo, a trustee for this deal hadn't been found within days of the "closing" and a Matthews & Wright employee asked Mr. Frankel, "whose law firm had gained great notoriety in the public finance industry" as a result of the issues from Arizona, if he knew where a certain Arizona banker could be located.  At that point, the memo stated, Mr. Frankel said he "had been thinking about getting into the trustee business, and for this purpose had formed a corporate shell entity named Texas Dominion Escrow."  Mr. Frankel offered the use of Texas Dominion Escrow as the trustee for East Chicago Heights, the memo said.  It added, "A cashless closing was conducted on the deal with Texas Dominion Escrow as the trustee on Aug. 7, 1986.  These bonds were never reoffered to the public."  Frankel couldn't be reached for comment.  The law firm of Wolfson & Frankel served as bond counsel on an $80 million Northern Marianas Islands bond issue underwritten by Matthews & Wright in late 1984.  This deal was declared not tax exempt by the IRS, but President Bush said in a May 6, 1989, memo that efforts to recover funds from this issue "should be discontinued."  It's bigger than the Universal Cineplex Odeon in Los Angeles and bigger than Hoyts in Sydney.  Kinepolis, just outside Brussels, with 7,500 seats and 25 theaters, is the largest, most modern cinema complex in the world.  Over the past decade, cinema attendance figures had been steadily dropping in the Belgian capital, creating a mood of doom and discouragement among the country's exhibitors.  Since the opening of Kinepolis a year ago, the figures have risen 46%.  Kinepolis looms next to the even more mammoth Atomium, left over from the 1958 World's Fair, on a site slowly being converted into a Belgian-style amusement park.  Fake gabled architecture in the Flemish style and houses a la Magritte are part of a kitsch village of beer taverns and souvenir shops.  A "mini-Europe" has been installed next to an aquatic park.  Some spindly trees make a brave show of growing.  A huge flat-roofed concrete and glass building, Kinepolis resembles a garage with its wide internal ramp spiraling up to the theaters.  The real Kinepolis garage will hold 15,000 cars on a site that's still bare dirt.  And the box office area is almost equally desolate, echoing like a swimming pool and connected to the movie theaters via a covered bridge.  But once you enter the building, the glitz hits you in the eye.  Hundreds of feet of crimson carpeting stretch out across the two floors, and the ushers and usherettes are motes in the middle distance.  In a giant mosaic, banks of TV monitors show clips of the 25 films playing in the theaters.  Other monitors indicate the number of empty seats left in each theater.  Three cocktail bars extend along the carpeted floors.  To build this palace, Albert Bert and his family spent almost $16 million.  The largest screen measures 3,120 square feet and the 420-seat Imax theater has a floor-to-ceiling screen of 6,450 square feet.  The Showscan system of 60 frames per second on a 70-millimeter print, invented by special effects man Douglas Trumbull, is ready to be launched in October.  Each theater has THX and Dolby stereo sound systems.  Whenever they can, the Berts show their films in 70-mm prints, sometimes paying themselves to have them blown up from 35 mm.  The Bert family, which started in the film business with a nickelodeon in Flanders in the '20s, loves Hollywood and the whole showbiz myth.  You don't go to Kinepolis to see a small-budget British film or the latest Godard.  What you'll see here are undubbed copies of the big American money-spinners.  From their base, in a clutch of luxurious villas in Flanders, the Berts preside over their film empire, which includes Kinepolis plus cinema complexes in Kortrijk and Ghent.  Mr. Bert is keeping discreet about plans to open a fourth place next year.  His sister-in-law, and partner in Kinepolis, owns a huge complex in Liego and a smaller one in Hasselt.  In fact, they're beginning to outgrow the country and have plans for an even bigger movie theater in the north of France, as well as a long-term strategy to move into the rest of Europe.  Mr. Bert's patriarchal policy, the reason his sons work for him like frisky horses straining at the bit, is that "I don't make them do anything they don't want to do."  His own father may have held on tightly to the purse strings, but he told the young Bert that the world was his oyster.  Mr. Bert sees himself as the adviser and his sons as the executors, and he gives them a relatively free hand.  "They often abuse, they often abuse," he complains.  Joost designs theaters.  Koen, 31, does the programming, Geert, 30, deals with the technical aspects, and the youngest, Peter, 27, is being groomed for management.  Mr. Bert applies a few golden rules to the exhibitor trade.  As far as he's concerned, it you want to make the big time, you have to find a location on the outskirts of the city that will attract visitors from the surrounding areas.  After that comes the cinema proper, and there "the most important thing," he says, "is that you've got to be comfortably seated."  Every theater in Kinepolis has plush seats with extra-wide double armrests, plenty of leg room and downward sloping floors that give an unimpeded view of the screen.  "Many exhibitors try to economize on the seats.  That's ridiculous.  You're going to be spending two hours in them, and the best thing is when you can forget they're there at all."  The next requirement for success is big, broad screens, placed low.  Third comes a first-rate sound system.  Only then, in fourth position, does he consider the films.  If he were to give advice to his competitors, "the first thing I'd say," says Mr. Bert, "is don't spend too much money on the lobby."  Only recently, one of his sons went to the opening of a cinema in Manchester.  "The lobby was huge, but the theaters had small rocker seats."  Mr. Bert and his sons travel a great deal.  They keep up with the latest trade developments so they can apply them to their cinemas.  They go to the Show West Convention in Las Vegas, the American Film Market, any place even remotely connected to the exhibitor business.  Selling their know-how has become Joost's new passion.  He recently founded Decatron, a company that sets out to "create today the cinemas of tomorrow," as its brochure declares.  "We're not interested in working in the United States," says Joost.  "They have enough cinemas, many more than after World War II.  The situation in Europe is very different.  The market is here."  Observers have regularly prophesied failure for each increasingly ambitious undertaking by the Bert empire, and have just as regularly been proven wrong.  Mr. Bert says that, despite appearances, he's been playing it safe all along.  The rule in business, he says, is never to take risks.  "Always worry about service to the customer before profits.  That's the best policy.  Tend the tree you've planted with loving care, and the fruit will grow before you know it."  ---  Ms. Grauman lives in Brussels and covers the arts in the European Community.  The ailing International Coffee Agreement is unlikely to recover soon, delegates say, despite Colombia's efforts to revive price-support measures.  New York coffee-futures prices for December delivery rose 1.87 cents a pound Friday, to 87.75 cents, on hopes that Colombia would persuade member nations to bolster prices when 74 coffee producing and consuming nations hold a two-week meeting beginning Sept. 24.  Yet at a two-day gathering last week, 16 leading coffee producing and consuming nations didn't propose a renewal of export restrictions, says Colombian delegate Nestor Osorio Londono, even though prices have slumped since the end of June.  African and several Latin American nations "are desperate," Mr. Osorio says.  They have lost $500 million since the pact's price-supporting mechanism was scrapped at the beginning of July, he says, and if prices remain depressed, losses will mount to nearly $4 billion by June 1990.  Despite these concerns, Brazil, the biggest coffee producer, and the U.S., the most important consumer, are still refusing to compromise, delegates say.  Until they do, the chances of renewed price support measures are remote.  The defanged agreement aimed at keeping prices within a range of $1.15 to $1.45 a pound by forcing producers to restrict exports when prices fell toward the lower level and increase exports when prices rose to or above the ceiling.  But several producing nations "cheated," delegates say, by selling coffee at wide discounts to nonmember nations in Eastern Europe and the Middle East.  U.S. delegates also complained that export quotas favored Brazil and Colombia and created an artificial shortage of top-quality, "mild Arabica" coffee that is popular in North America.  As a result of this shortage, prices of mild Arabicas traded at a premium of 40% to 50% above low-quality robusta coffee.  Now only the framework of the pact remains in place, and in the past two months coffee prices have slumped 31% as desperate producers competed with each other and dumped excess coffee onto the market, dealers say.  Brazil, Mexico, Colombia and Indonesia alone sold 16.9 million bags in this period, says Robert de Jong, a director of E.D. & F Man (Coffee) Ltd., a London merchant.  A bag weighs 132 pounds.  The shipments account for 50% of global consumer requirements in the second half of this year, Mr. de Jong says.  But free-market conditions lowered the price differential between top and low quality coffee to 21 cents a pound on Friday from 40 cents a pound before the accord collapsed, he says.  Although consumers are better off in the U.S., Mr. Osorio says, their cheaper coffee is at the expense of struggling poor nations that depend on coffee for their livelihood.  Latin American coffee producers that will be badly hit are El Salvador, Nicaragua, Colombia, Guatemala and Costa Rica, he says.  African nations that are sorely affected are Uganda, Cameroon, Rwanda, Burundi, Ethiopia, Ivory Coast and to a lesser extent Kenya.  "Our President Virgilio Barco thus wrote a personal letter of appeal to President Bush," Mr. Osorio says.  Since coffee accounts for nearly 30% of Colombia's exports, higher prices would help finance the nation's anti-drugs campaign, he says.  If the U.S. fails to respond, Mr. Osorio says, Colombia will lobby other producers and persuade them to back export controls.  Unfortunately, progress will take time, he says.  Yet any agreement is likely to come to fruition only if the big players agree, delegates say.  Brazil is prepared to negotiate if the U.S. drops its demand for a change in individual export quotas, says Luiz Sette, Brazilian representative at international meetings.  "We won't give up our share of the global-export quota," Mr. Sette says.  Under the agreement's former quota system, Brazil accounted for 30% of export quotas.  In the free market, Brazil's share has risen to 50%, he says.  Brazil sold 8.5 million bags during the past two months; there is little incentive for the nation to reimpose quotas, says Mr. de Jong of E.D. & F Man.  On Friday, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter said the U.S. is willing to help renegotiate a new agreement, but only if "it serves the needs and desires of the consuming nations as well as producers."  The statement was in a Knight-Ridder news report from Burgenstock, Switzerland, where Mr. Yeutter was attending a meeting of the Swiss Commodities, Futures and Options Association.  While acknowledging Colombia's losses from lower coffee prices, Mr. Yeutter said, "Colombia would probably be better off without an international coffee agreement over a 20- or 30-year period."  He didn't explain how that might be, and he added, "I recognize there may be short-run considerations here."  Daimler-Benz AG today is expected to accept government conditions for its 1.7 billion mark ($858 million) takeover of state-controlled aerospace and defense group Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H.  The agreement would mark the final step in West Germany's largest postwar merger, and would end more than two years of haggling and false starts.  The Berlin-based Federal Cartel Office vetoed the proposed merger in April on the ground that it would distort domestic competition in key industries.  Under Friday's accord, West German Economics Minister Helmut Haussmann overrode the cartel office's veto and approved Daimler's merger plans, provided the automotive and technology conglomerate dispose of certain Daimler and MBB defense-technology activities.  The minister's controversial decision would create West Germany's largest defense contractor and Europe's third-largest industrial concern, with sales of 80 billion marks.  Daimler, with 73 billion marks in annual sales, already is West Germany's largest manufacturing company.  Mr. Haussmann also insisted that Daimler acquire the government's stake in Deutsche Airbus G.m.b.h., West Germany's share of the unprofitable European aircraft group, three years earlier than planned.  Daimler's managers also would be required to give up certain outside board seats to reduce the company's influence in West Germany's defense industry.  Ford Motor Co. said it plans to increase its number of Hispanic-owned Ford and Lincoln-Mercury dealerships to more than 80 by the mid-1990s.  The move is part of the No. 2 U.S. auto maker's efforts to attract more minority customers and broaden its market appeal.  Hispanics currently make up 7.7% of the U.S. population and are forecast to be the largest minority group in the country by the year 2010, Ford said.  "We are clearly interested in increasing our market," said a Ford spokesman.  "Increasing the number of Hispanic-owned dealerships fits into the demographics of the United States."  Ford has a total of about 5,500 dealerships nationwide.  It said it will provide training and operational support to Hispanics who have the automotive experience and financial backing to acquire a dealership.  The company said prospective Hispanic owners could move into existing dealerships or open new ones.  Ford has 316 minority-run dealerships; 40 are Hispanic-owned and the remainder are primarily owned by blacks.  While other automotive companies have instituted programs to boost the number of their minority-owned dealerships, most don't have specific goals for the recruitment of Hispanics.  General Motors Corp., which has a total of 9,835 dealerships, has 203 minority-owned dealerships, 49 of which are owned by Hispanics.  The company said it has no immediate plans to seek out Hispanic dealers specifically.  Chrysler Corp. has 39 Hispanic-owned dealerships out of a total of 5,300 dealerships.  Chrysler said Hispanics are "welcome to join" its Minority Dealer Development program even though they aren't being sought out individually.  A Chrysler spokesman said the No. 3 U.S. auto maker has placed more emphasis on recruiting black dealers than on attracting any dealers from any other minority group.  Toyota Motor Co., which has 46 minority-owned dealerships out of a total of 1,124 dealerships in the U.S., said it may begin a recruitment program for Hispanics "sometime down the road" but has no definite plans to do so.  There are seven Hispanic-owned Toyota dealerships.  President Bush announced that Paul Adams will continue to serve as inspector general of the Department of Housing and Urban Development.  It was Mr. Adams's lengthy report in April that disclosed widespread political favoritism in the awarding of departmental contracts and stimulated numerous official and media investigations into the department's programs and operations.  Mr. Adams, however, has been harshly criticized by members of Congress for what they say are serious shortcomings in the report.  He has been inspector general since 1985.  A federal appeals court upheld the Transportation Department's random drug-testing program for 30,000 federal workers, including air traffic controllers and railroad inspectors.  A three-judge panel of the court rejected arguments by the American Federation of Government Employees that urine tests taken without suspicion of illegal drug use would be an unconstitutional invasion of privacy.  "We have found the privacy interests of employees . . . outweighed by the department's compelling interests in preventing drug use," the panel said in its ruling.  The union challenged the inclusion of department chauffeurs, Federal Aviation Administration aircraft mechanics, and Federal Railroad Administration hazardous-material inspectors in the testing program.  When a federal judge dismissed the suit, the union appealed in 1987.  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner called the appellate decision "a great victory" for the public, "which expects and deserves a drug-free and safe transportation system."  Union officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. has formally exited the mutual-fund scene.  Drexel said it completed a sale of Drexel Burnham Lambert Management Corp. to a group led by I.W. Burnham II, the firm's founder.  The company manages the $165 million-asset Drexel Burnham Fund, which will be renamed the Burnham Fund.  Mr. Burnham founded the fund in 1969, has been its chairman since 1975 and will continue as portfolio manager.  Separately, shareholders cleared the way for Zweig/Glaser Advisers to take over the management of more than $1 billion of Drexel funds.  The partnership, controlled by money manager Martin Zweig and former Drexel marketing director Eugene Glaser, will rename the funds Zweig Series Trust, Zweig Cash Fund and Zweig Tax-Free Fund.  The sale of its fund lines stemmed from Drexel's decision earlier this year to shed its brokerage-office operations.  Bell Atlantic Corp.'s union employees in New Jersey returned to work after members of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers ratified a three-year contract.  The New Jersey vote Thursday night marked the end of a monthlong strike against the Philadelphia-based company.  The company had settled more than a week before with the Communications Workers of America, which represents some 43,000 Bell Atlantic employees, but most Communications Workers members in New Jersey had refused to cross IBEW picket lines.  Both unions are continuing their strike against New York-based Nynex Corp., saying the company has refused to significantly alter its plan to shift some health care costs to employees.  System Industries Inc. said it agreed to buy high-performance, high-capacity disk drives from International Business Machines Corp. for sale under its own label.  System Industries, a maker of computer data storage equipment, said the three-year renewable agreement with IBM was valued at more than $25 million.  IBM will supply System Industries with 320 megabyte, 3.5-inch drives, which System Industries will use in a new family of data-storage devices called the Cyclone series.  System Industries has seen slumping profits of late, which it blames on delays in shipping new products.  The company had a loss of $32.6 million on sales of $101.1 million in the year ended July 22, compared with net income of $3.2 million, or 80 cents a share, on sales of $134.1 million in fiscal 1988.  PaineWebber Inc. named Arnold E. Spangler as a new managing director and co-head of mergers and acquisitions.  Mr. Spangler, 41 years old, formerly was general partner of Lazard Freres & Co.  He spent the past 13 years in Lazard's mergers and acquisitions group working on health-care, pharmaceuticals, chemicals, publishing and other transactions.  He joins Robert A. Hastings as co-head of the PaineWebber department.  Mr. Spangler said he left Lazard for the "unique opportunity" to become co-head of a department; he said PaineWebber's focus will remain on the kinds of "midsize to larger companies" that he dealt with at Lazard.  Separately, General Electric Co.'s Kidder, Peabody & Co. named Les J. Lieberman a managing director in its merger and acquisitions group.  Mr. Lieberman, 33, had been a managing director at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Four years ago, Antonio Mamani, a truck driver for a state mining company, carried his pocket money in a burlap bag because the devalued pesos were too bulky to fit in his trousers.  The price of a movie ticket often rose while he waited in line to buy it.  And on payday, he and his wife rushed to market to purchase their weekly food supplies before they were marked up.  Out-of-control inflation is only a memory now for Mr. Mamani.  Unfortunately, so is his job.  As part of a super-austerity program, the government sheared away much of its work force.  Today, Mr. Mamani sells used, stolen and contraband auto parts on a sidewalk in downtown La Paz.  "Everyday there are more vendors and fewer customers," he says.  "I made a lot more money as a truck driver."  Long notorious for coups and cocaine, Bolivia has become a Third World model by successfully tackling hyperinflation and foreign debt while maintaining a democratically elected government.  Bankers, economists and businessmen extol the country as an example for Brazil, Argentina and Peru -- neighbors that are still being scourged by rampant price increases and relentless foreign creditors.  Despite this praise, Bolivia's troubling lesson for the future is that there will be no quick resumption of economic growth after the damages wrought in Latin America by the "lost decade" of the 1980s.  It isn't easy for a country to wipe the slate clean and begin again after years of heavy state involvement in the economy, huge buildups of internal and external debt, low private investment and neglect of export markets.  "It's going to take 10 years to get where we were a decade ago," sighs Fernando Illanes, Bolivia's former energy minister.  Bolivia got started earlier than most Latin American countries in trying to pull itself out of the swamp.  Mired in 25,000% inflation in 1985, President Victor Paz Estenssoro's government resolved not to spend a peso more than it collected in revenue.  Within months, hyperinflation abated, and this year, the consumer price index may rise as little as 6%.  Arguing that this tightfisted approach made it impossible to resume foreign debt payments, Bolivia then persuaded its private creditors to accept 11 cents on the dollar for their loans -- a level of debt relief that goes far beyond the plan envisioned by U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  Bolivia's new president, Jaime Paz Zamora, a former Marxist who was elected by the Congress last month after a May vote failed to give any candidate a majority, has promised to continue Mr. Paz Estenssoro's policies.  But the economy has creaked forward at 2% growth annually over the past two years -- not nearly enough to compensate for seven previous years of decline.  At least 20% of the labor force is unemployed, including 23,000 miners who lost their jobs after the government closed most of its tin mines.  Farmers and industrialists are overwhelmed by a flood of contraband from neighboring countries whose devalued currencies make their products irresistibly cheap in Bolivia.  And despite admiration for the government's hard-nosed policies, foreign bankers are understandably reluctant to resume lending after writing off so much of their debts here.  "If you want to be cynical about it," says Jeffrey Sachs, a Harvard University economist who advises the government, "you could say that Bolivia used to be a miserably poor country suffering from hyperinflation, and is now a miserably poor country without inflation."  According to former planning minister Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada, it will be necessary "to reinvent Bolivia" before healthy economic growth can resume.  This means abandoning the tin mining synonymous with the country's history in favor of other, still undiscovered ores; somehow convincing 300,000 "campesinos" to forsake their coca plots; and encouraging commercial farmers to plant crops for export.  Though the country was always thought to hold large deposits of gold and silver, state control of most mining discouraged private prospecting.  Now that the government has ended most of its mining operations, foreign investors are trickling back.  "We made three significant gold finds in the past year -- that's like shooting ducks in a pond," says Charles Bruce, the Scottish-born general manager of a prospecting company that has persuaded several big U.S., Canadian and Australian companies to explore a number of sites.  But projects of the size envisioned by Mr. Bruce require hundreds of millions of dollars.  And even after four years of stable democratic rule, Bolivia's history of political volatility -- 190 governments since independence in the 19th century -- doesn't encourage long-term investor confidence.  For shorter-term optimism, development specialists point to an unexpected boom among big farmers in Santa Cruz, the fertile lowlands in eastern Bolivia.  Soybeans have suddenly become the most important cash crop in the region.  Nonexistent here just three years ago, soy plants now cover 300,000 acres, and according to a World Bank estimate, an additional two million acres are suitable for the crop.  Transportation is the bottleneck.  An antiquated railway connects Santa Cruz to the Brazilian port of Paranagua on the Atlantic, 1,100 miles east.  Heavy investments are needed to refurbish the line and build a highway for additional shipments.  But again, Bolivia's poor credit rating makes it unlikely that foreign banks will offer the necessary loans.  Natural gas -- the third pillar of a "reinvented" Bolivia, along with new mining and export crops -- has also fallen victim to economic crisis beyond the country's borders.  By contract, Bolivia should be earning about $200 million a year from gas sales to Argentina.  But the Argentines, verging on bankruptcy, decline to pay.  That leaves coca paste and cocaine as the biggest moneymakers.  Though it doesn't appear on any balance-of-payments ledger, illegal narcotics traffic accounts for close to half of the country's export revenues.  But with world-wide supply outstripping demand, this is no longer a growth industry.  And in order to qualify for U.S. and other foreign aid, Bolivia must demonstrate it is making strenuous efforts to eradicate this trade.  In the Yungas, the humid slopes north of La Paz, a United Nations-sponsored team is attempting to persuade campesinos to replace coca with coffee.  The farmers are paid $2,000 for each hectare, or roughly 2 1/2 acres, of coca they abandon, and are given an additional $5,000 per hectare in low-interest loans for substitute crops.  But after four years, coca acreage has dropped barely 20%.  "We listen with our eyes," says Mario Quispe Palomino, a 33-year-old campesino leader.  He has sown coffee on part of his acreage, but still plants coca on the rest.  "If the coffee sells well, I'll finish off the coca," he promises.  Honda Motor Co.'s U.S. sales arm is raising base prices on its 1990 Civic and CRX models between 1% and 4% from 1989 levels.  The Japanese auto maker, which sells more cars in the U.S. than any other foreign manufacturer, so far seems to be raising prices somewhat less aggressively than the Big Three U.S. auto makers.  The company said earlier this month that it is holding 1989 prices on all but one of its 1990 Acura Legend models.  However, Honda hasn't released 1990 prices for its Accord models, which account for about 45% of the company's U.S. sales.  Honda is expected to unveil a redesigned Accord later this month, and dealers say they expect the car to be larger and more expensive than the current compact model.  The Civic and CRX lines -- including some of Honda's cheapest cars -- account for about 30% of the company's total U.S. car sales.  The steepest price boost is on the Civic LX sedan with automatic transmission.  The 1990 model will have a base price of $11,150, up 4% from $10,720 in 1989, a Honda spokesman said.  The 1990 model has cruise control as standard equipment, unlike the 1989 version, the spokesman said.  Otherwise, the 1990 model is essentially the same as the 1989.  The price of Honda's least expensive model, the Civic DX hatchback with a four-speed manual transmission, will rise 3.9% to $6,635 from $6,385, the spokesman said.  The most expensive holdover model in the Civic line, the four-wheel drive wagon with automatic transmission, will have a base price of $13,140, up 2.6% from $12,810 in 1989.  Honda also will introduce for 1990 a new Civic EX sedan.  Dealers say the Civic EX is loaded with more features than the Civic LX.  The company didn't release a price for the car Friday.  Prices for the sporty, two-seater CRX models will rise between 1% and 2.8%, the spokesman said.  The biggest increase is on the cheapest model, the CRX-HF.  That car will have a 1990 base price of $9,145, up $250 from $8,895 in 1989, the spokesman said.  The top-of-the-line 1990 CRX Si will have a base price of $11,130, up 1.8% from $10,930 in the current model year.  New-car sales in Europe were flat in July compared with a year earlier and down sharply from June as the auto industry boom showed further signs of a long-awaited slowdown.  Of the 11 countries reporting, only Austria, Italy and France showed year-to-year gains.  Industry and government statistics from the 11 countries, which normally account for about 85% of non-Communist Europe's passenger-car sales, showed volume slipped 0.7% in July from a year earlier to 827,199 units.  The July figure was down 19% from June.  The flat year-to-year picture contrasts with an average growth rate of 6% for the year to date and fits the expectations of many analysts that growth for the whole year will be below 5%.  But the increasing use of incentive programs in such key markets as Britain and West Germany may keep sales from slipping behind last year's levels for the balance of the year.  With operating profit margins running at historic highs for the sector, manufacturers "have a lot of room to play with" on prices, said John Lawson, an analyst with the Nomura Research Institute in London.  The latest surge in the exodus of East Germans is once again bringing world-wide attention to the situation in divided Germany.  The refugees from Communist-led East Germany seek freedom, travel and better living.  The East Germans coming West via Hungary this summer remind us that the German question is not at all the longing for a reunited Germany or the resurrection of nationalist feelings, but simply a quest for freedom.  The same is true of West Germans, though Bonn hears questions from Washington, London and Paris.  Are the West Germans drifting East?  Are they going to betray the Alliance to establish a European hegemony together with the Soviet Union?  Are they so keen to do business with the Warsaw pact that they would even sacrifice common security?  Is reunification more important to them than friendship with the free West?  Does the recent electoral success of the so called "Republicans," a radical movement on the far right, reflect a revival of German nationalism?  Can one still trust the Germans?  The Germans are well advised to take such fears seriously.  Nevertheless the reality is more complex.  Granted: It is somewhat difficult to understand how, only four decades after Hitler, a far-right nationalist and populist movement could emerge again in Germany.  Who does it surprise that the world is scared listening to the Republicans' leader, Franz Schoenhuber?  But there is another perspective.  Couldn't the appearance of a new right wing party be a sign that West Germany has achieved a state of democratic normalcy?  Isn't it true that an extreme right exists in almost all Western democracies?  Naturally, people are more critical of Herr Schoenhuber than of the leader of France's rightist National Front, Jean-Marie Le Pen.  But isn't the phenomenon similar?  Messrs.  Schoenhuber and Le Pen have already begun working together.  Wouldn't there be a right-wing in the U.S. Congress, if America had a system of proportional representation?  West Germany's alleged "super-stability," moreover, has often been criticized as a lack of pluralism and vitality.  Herr Schoenhuber, without doubt, is anything but the incarnation of an open society.  But Freedom is partly the right to voice reactionary thoughts.  Before the 1980s, West Germany had only three big political parties: the Christian Democrats, Social Democrats and Free Democrats.  Since then, we have witnessed the rise of two new parties, the Greens on the left and now the "Reps" on the far right.  If the political spectrum has broadened and become more like that in other western countries, is that to Germany's disadvantage?  Granted: It is difficult to understand why Germans -- who lost the war -- today seem to be engaged in new discussions about national reunification, about the continuing legal existence of the borders of 1937, and about finding a way between East and West.  But see the whole picture.  For the vast majority of Germans, the recreation of the old big German "Nationalstaat" is not a realistic aim, perhaps not even the subject of wishes or dreams.  There might be a few who still think along these lines, but not the mainstream and not the elected government.  For Chancellor Kohl, it is not a matter of territory, but freedom.  "The core of the German question is freedom," he said in 1986.  The government of Mr. Kohl and his Free Democratic foreign minister, Hans-Dietrich Genscher, is strongly opposed to a German "Sonderweg," or special way, between the Blocs.  On the contrary, it believes that the German question can be solved only in accordance with the political will and the values of Europe, only together with, and not against, our Western friends.  "The unity of the nation should fulfill itself in the freedom of its citizens," Mr. Kohl said in 1987, calling freedom the "precondition of unity, not its price."  The substance of the Kohl-Genscher policy is pragmatic cooperation with East Berlin -- with clear acknowledgement of postwar realities.  What counts for the chancellor is solving the day-to-day problems between the two German states, not the revision of the borders.  The visit of the East German leader, Erich Honecker, to Bonn in September, 1987, signaled to many non-Germans the beginning of an active reunification attempt on the part of both Germanies.  In Germany, however, this is widely regarded as the end of German unity.  Didn't the first official visit by the East German head of state finally acknowledge the existence of two German states?  That meeting was dedicated to better political relations, to more cultural and youth exchanges, to trade and the protection of the common environment.  It is not a national conspiracy against the rest of the world.  The spirit of the visit was pragmatism, not revanchism.  Thanks to America, we know about the universal meaning of human rights.  President Kennedy taught us "to pay any price, carry any burden" to foster freedom around the world.  The U.S. fought two world wars against the spread of tyranny.  So when Germans (West) look to Germans (East) and are concerned about their freedom -- is that being unfaithful to the West?  Young Germans of today were brought up looking West, mainly toward America.  Detroit is closer to them than Dresden.  When they now begin to discover Eastern Europe, when they care about their countrymen in East Germany with whom they share many aspirations, then they are merely doing what "Western education" has taught them.  Use your freedom responsibly.  Do not sit back in your armchair enjoying your easy life, but speak out for the rights of those without rights.  Germans who look toward the East are not disloyal to the Western alliance, but loyal to its very values.  What would happen were America divided by a wall?  Wouldn't Americans in Iowa be interested in the fate of their countrymen in Illinois?  If opportunities arose for closer contact, would they be unmoved?  Wouldn't they try to organize youth exchanges, trade relations and partnerships between cities to overcome the frontiers of such a Divided States of America?  Come to Berlin and see the Wall, and you will understand why Germans cannot stop looking East.  Germany is the East of the West.  Americans might long even more strongly for such contact than do the Germans, who know that the division of their country is the sad result of a terrible war they themselves began.  Mainstream German thinking today is not interested in changing borders but in minimizing their divisive nature.  If the nations of Europe come closer together and the reform movement in Eastern Europe continues, then the Germans will slowly overcome the division of their country -- but never against the will of their neighbors.  Even after such a period of improving relations, there might remain two German states.  But could anyone object if the Wall were torn down?  The President of the Federal Republic of Germany, Richard von Weizsaecker, once stated: "The German question is open as long as the Brandenburg Gate is closed."  ---  Mr. Pfluger is a visiting scholar at the Hoover Institution.  He has served until recently as the press secretary of President Richard von Weizsacker.  Like most European teen-age boys, Raphael Escoffier has a passion.  But unlike most of them, his passion isn't soccer or teen-age girls.  It is baseball.  "It has an American prestige," says the curly haired 16-year-old, who is attending a baseball tournament near Paris.  "I play in a French junior league.  This summer, when my family visited the U.S., I got to play with people there.  I loved it.  American sports are becoming popular across Europe."  Anyone who doubts that need only have driven last week to the Paris suburb of Savigny, which could have been mistaken for suburban New York or Chicago.  The French government has built a regulation-size baseball diamond in Savigny and teenagers showed up to watch games in caps and warmup jackets emblazoned with New York Mets and Chicago Cubs logos.  They watched intently as slightly older players from European national teams took to the field, and listened to sounds dear to American hearts.  "Hit one out of there, Henrik]" bellows a Dutch player to a colleague, who is batting.  "You're ready for the baths, Henrik]" responds a British adversary.  Henrik hits a single through the infield.  This is Eurobaseball, the 21st European baseball amateur championship tournament, hosted by France.  Never mind that Holland, Europe's powerhouse, demolished Britain 35-0 in one of the early games, in a sport whose scores are more likely to be 53.  Never mind that British players, short of sponsors, have to buy their own food during the tournament.  For these teams, and for the fans who found their way to Savigny's Jean Moulin Memorial Park, nothing beats the old ball game.  In the U.S., baseball may be troubled by gambling and drug scandals.  But in Europe, it is becoming the stuff of dreams.  Ten years ago, the fledgling French baseball federation had just 500 players.  This year, the federation boasts 10,000 players, and the Dutch say they have three times that many players.  Baseball isn't exactly challenging soccer's supremacy but Finland, Czechoslovakia and the Soviet Union all have baseball federations.  With baseball slated to become a full Olympic sport at the 1992 Barcelona games, European countries are investing more in the game.  Michael Warme, a 16-year-old French boy, attends a game decked out in a red, white and blue Montreal Expos cap and red warmup jacket, worn over his red and white Savigny boys' league uniform.  On his jacket collar are pins with the emblems of the St. Louis Cardinals, New York Mets and Atlanta Braves.  He discusses the game with a friend who wears a Cubs warmup jacket.  Many French teen-agers say they were drawn to the game because of the exotic uniforms and equipment.  "For Christmas, my father bought me the basic equipment -- a bat and a glove," says Michael.  "Then we looked for a place to learn to play."  Neither father nor son knew much about the game but today Michael pitches and plays shortstop for Savigny.  Raphael Escoffier, who plays right field for the Paris University Club, one of France's leading junior teams, takes the sport so seriously that he and teammates practice all winter in a gymnasium.  "We work mostly on defensive moves," he says, "and we take batting practice, hitting the ball into a net."  The Dutch, who have imported U.S. coaches since 1962, are even more avid.  "When the first U.S. navy ships arrived in Rotterdam harbor after World War II, the Americans quickly formed a team and beat the Dutch.  But those days are over now," says Huub Kohl, who coaches an amateur team in Rotterdam.  His son helped pitch the Dutch to a 3-0 victory over Belgium.  "We play three times a week, Friday night, Saturday and Sunday, and we practice twice a week.  We do very well."  The Dutch had a team in last year's Seoul Olympics, in which baseball was a demonstration sport, and they now stand No. 1 in Europe and No. 8 in world amateur rankings.  "We tell people, 'There are riots at soccer matches now but in baseball we are one big happy family,'" says Jan van der Sande, a Rotterdam baseball official.  "We have hot dogs and we all know each other."  In the 1950s, the two Dutch officials say, amateur sports clubs in soccer-mad Holland introduced baseball so they wouldn't have to close their social centers in the summer after soccer season ended.  Marcel Krudt, a 27-year-old Dutch outfielder who sells restaurant equipment, began playing baseball to stay active after the soccer season ended in April.  Now he doesn't have time for soccer.  Asked whether his friends think it is funny that he switched to a foreign sport, he doesn't smile.  "No they don't," he says.  "We play at a pretty high level."  Not everyone in Europe does, of course.  The British already have a summer sport, cricket, and they have taken to the faster-paced American sport with less relish.  In the British-Dutch game, for example, British wild pitches and errors abounded.  A Dutch runner scored when the umpire got in the British catcher's way, and the Dutch hit so many home runs that both sides lost count.  The Italians, Europe's other powerhouse, went on to win this year's tournament, defeating Holland 7-5 in the final game.  The U.S. capped its drive to curb abuses of driftnet fishing in the North Pacific by obtaining South Korea's consent to extensive inspection and monitoring of its driftnet fleet.  By reaching this provisional accord, the U.S. brought all three of the Pacific's driftnet-fishing nations under some kind of surveillance program.  The U.S. earlier this year signed similar agreements with Japan and Taiwan.  U.S. authorities still aren't certain how effective these three separate agreements will be, but a State Department official called them a "good start."  South Korea must formally sign its agreement by Sept. 27 to avert possible U.S. trade sanctions against its exports of fishing products.  That date marks the end of a one-month extension that President Bush gave Seoul to conclude the pact.  Among other things, South Korea agreed to allow one U.S. scientist to observe its driftnet fishing during the current season and to install satellite transponders on all its vessels in the 1990 season.  The transponders will allow U.S. authorities to track the fleet's movements at any time.  The U.S. Coast Guard will also have unrestricted rights to board the Korean vessels as of the next fishing season.  The satellite watch and the random Coast Guard boardings covering South Korea and Taiwan could curb the actions of their fishermen.  Although the driftnet fleets sail to catch mainly squid, they allegedly go after salmon and other valuable North Pacific species as well.  U.S. fishermen have complained that these unauthorized hauls are depleting salmon stocks off Alaska and the Pacific Northwest.  Environmentalists also charge that driftnets, some of which stretch 30 miles long, destroy dolphins and other non-targeted marine species.  By 1990, U.S. observers will be allowed to conduct on-site inspection of the South Korean driftnet fleet for as long as 45 days.  The Korean vessels also will be obliged to land their catch only at designated ports and to allow the presence of U.S. observers there, according to U.S. officials.  In view of the emergence of price pressures in Japan and West Germany, it would be unwise for monetary authorities of those countries to relax monetary policies now, the International Monetary Fund says.  In a draft of its latest World Economic Outlook report, IMF economists also project a widening of the two nations' current account surpluses next year.  West Germany's surplus is expected to grow to $54.9 billion in 1990 from $53.1 billion this year; Japan's 1990 surplus is estimated at $89.7 billion, sharply up from a projected $72 billion.  Japan's inflation has tended to rise in 1989, the IMF says.  Under these conditions, and in view of continued buoyancy of demand, "an expansionary shift of financial policies to reduce Japan's current account surplus would not seem to be appropriate at this juncture."  Looking ahead beyond the near-term, the IMF says Japan should aim at maintaining adequate growth of domestic demand, "particularly if substantial fiscal correction in the U.S. were to reduce demand for Japanese exports."  The IMF says the task of West German policymakers will be to avoid a deterioration in price performance while trying to reduce the external imbalance.  Although domestic cost inflation has been held down so far by moderate wage settlements, "the danger of a cost-price spiral shouldn't be underestimated" especially if a further rise in import prices were to worsen the climate for wage negotiations next year.  Terms of Endowment  I'll never ask my boss again  For a pay raise or advancement;  I'll seek an added worker's fee,  Or perhaps a check enhancement.  -- C.R. Reagan.  ---  Blankety-Blanks]  All crossword-puzzle authors use  (It is my observation)  An awful lot of words you don't  Hear in a conversation.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Carry-On Blues  Packing satchels to take trips with  I've trouble coming to grips with.  -- Mort Friedman.  Remember Melvin E. Hanson, a founder of the apparel chain Just Sweats Inc. who allegedly faked his own death last year to collect on a $1 million insurance policy?  Mr. Hanson and the doctor accused of signing his phony death certificate were arrested this winter and -- along with a third man still on the lam -- indicted on a number of charges, including murder.  Now this bizarre caper has taken another twist.  Mr. Hanson, now in a Columbus, Ohio, jail after being extradited from Texas, is trying to block his extradition to California, where he faces the murder charge.  His defense: He claims he isn't Melvin E. Hanson.  Trying to convince people he is someone else is a familiar ploy for Mr. Hanson.  In his most grisly deception, he tried to pass off the corpse of a Columbus drifter, Henry Ellis Greene, as his own.  He's now accused of Mr. Greene's murder.  While he was in hiding, Mr. Hanson underwent cosmetic surgery and tried a hair transplant, which didn't take.  Authorities say he also used the name Wolfgang E. von Snowden to check into hotels and fly on airplanes.  When he was nabbed at the Dallas airport, he was returning from Acapulco, carrying a book on how to change one's identity in America.  He also had identification for 14 different people, including Mr. Greene, the murdered man.  Mr. Hanson confirmed his identity to Texas authorities after they told him they knew his name from his fingerprints.  Nonetheless, in Columbus, Mr. Hanson's attorney refuses to call him by name.  When a sheriff's deputy asks the attorney to identify his client in a holding room, the attorney simply points at Mr. Hanson.  In court, where the attorney refers to Mr. Hanson as "the individual standing next to me," the lawyer maintains that his client wasn't adequately identified for extradition.  One judge has denied the argument, but Mr. Hanson is appealing that decision.  That's why it's so surprising that Mr. Hanson agreed to talk to a writer for Vanity Fair magazine for a 15,000-word article.  He granted her two interviews from his Columbus jail cell and even confessed to his name.  "He likes me," says Ann Louise Bardach, the writer.  "Like anyone else locked up for such a long time, he was lonely and wanted to tell his story."  Lotus Development Corp. is getting into the takeover business.  The big software developer is expected today to unveil CD/M&A, a compact disk-based information service for mergers and acquisitions.  The new product, based on research by IDD Information Services Inc., is meant to give deal makers instant access to strategic information.  For an annual fee of $20,000, subscribers will get regularly updated CDs -- and a device to read the CDs -- containing information on more than 30,000 publicly announced transactions: mergers, acquisitions, investments and stock buy-backs from both public and private firms.  Using text-searching software, the product will allow analysts and M&A specialists at banks, brokerages, and companies to quickly find and analyze potential deals by comparing them with past deals.  The product is the sixth in Lotus's line of One Source CD-based information services.  One Source is designed to work with personal computers compatible with International Business Machines Corp. PCs.  The CD publishing business has grown far more slowly than early projections.  But Lotus has become the world's largest provider of CD-based business information, and its CD business is the company's fastest-growing unit, said David Roux, vice president of the Information Services Group.  The group had 1988 sales of $30 million.  President Bush's insistence on cutting the capital-gains tax rate makes future talks with Congress on reducing the budget deficit unlikely, Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell said.  "Under the circumstances, there's no incentive from our standpoint to go through that exercise again," the Maine Democrat told a group of reporters, referring to negotiations earlier this year that produced agreement on a deficit-reduction plan for fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1.  Sen. Mitchell said he was disappointed that the administration hadn't worked with lawmakers to raise the $5.3 billion in new revenues called for by the budget pact "in a way acceptable to both sides, which the president could say did not represent new taxes.  Instead, the exclusive effort on the part of the administration has been with respect to the capital gains tax."  Mr. Mitchell opposes a cut in the capital-gains tax rate as favoring the rich at the expense of the middle-class.  Also as part of the agreement, administration and congressional budget officials pledged to "continue discussions . . . in order to facilitate progress toward" balancing the budget by 1993 as required by the Gramm-Rudman law.  But relations between Sen. Mitchell and White House Budget Director Richard Darman have been strained since Mr. Darman chose to bypass the Maine Democrat and deal with Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W. Va.) of the Senate Appropriations Committee earlier this year during a dispute over drug funding in the fiscal 1989 supplemental spending bill.  Procter & Gamble Co. is expected to soon settle its lawsuits against three cookie companies, ending a lengthy dispute over patents on its Duncan Hines crispy-chewy cookies.  Sources familiar with the case said the Cincinnati-based consumer-products giant will receive about $120 million in a settlement from Nabisco Brands Inc., a subsidiary of RJR Nabisco; Keebler Co., a subsidiary of United Biscuits Holdings PLC of London; and Frito-Lay, a division of PepsiCo Inc.  It's unclear how the settlement payment will be divided among the three companies.  P&G sued the three cookie makers in U.S. District Court in Wilmington, Del., in 1984, alleging they copied technology for a P&G cookie that is soft on the inside and crispy on the outside, similar to homemade.  The three companies filed counterclaims, saying P&G was merely trying to eliminate competition in the cookie market.  The cookie dispute included accusations of espionage, such as P&G's claim that a Frito-Lay agent photographed a Chicago production line and stole a sample of Duncan Hines's cookie dough.  P&G also claimed that a Keebler plane flew over another cookie plant construction site to learn details of the plant.  And in March of 1984, when P&G began selling its ready-to-serve cookies, a Frito-Lay employee allegedly posed as a P&G customer and attended a confidential P&G sales presentation.  In early 1983, when P&G test-marketed its Duncan Hines cookies in Kansas City, the brand garnered a 15% market share.  But when the company went nationwide, its success crumbled.  Within months of P&G's test marketing, Keebler's Soft Batch, Nabisco's Almost Home and Frito-Lay's Grandma's Rich & Chewy cookies hit the store shelves.  Many have said P&G's cookie problems go beyond the alleged patent infringement.  Some consider it a matter of who made a better-tasting cookie and offered the most varieties.  Duncan Hines's "flavor was never as good as it should've been," says Gordon Tucker, a former P&G brand manager who helped develop the cookies.  While he asserts that P&G was hurt by competitors copying the technology, he adds that P&G simply got beat because Nabisco "moved very fast" and introduced a full line of cookies.  Another problem was P&G's warehouse distribution system, which had to compete against competitors' fleets of trucks delivering directly to each store.  Now the $2.5 billion ready-to-serve cookie market is dominated by Keebler and Nabisco brands.  Duncan Hines brands have a "neglible share," says Hugh Zurkuhlen, an analyst with Salomon Bros.  P&G is selling only three varieties of the cookies, down from a peak of 10 flavors in June 1987.  During its fourth quarter of 1987, P&G took a $435 million after-tax charge for restructuring, including a writeoff to close some cookie production plants.  P&G officials say it was unfair competition that killed its cookies.  So P&G sought a court order five years ago to stop Nabisco, Keebler and Frito-Lay from violating its patent, and requested a cash award equal to three times the amount of the actual monetary damages, but it didn't specify an amount.  P&G also sought damages for unfair competition and an injunction to block such activities.  The cases were consolidated and a trial was scheduled to begin Oct. 2, but the settlement is expected to be signed before that date.  A P&G spokesman wouldn't comment when asked about the settlement.  "We're preparing for the trial," he said.  Officials for Keebler confirmed that settlement discussions are taking place, but declined further comment.  Nabisco and Frito-Lay officials declined comment.  Congratulations on your balanced article (Aug. 17) about Peter Secchia, the new American ambassador to Italy.  Ambassador Secchia did receive unfair and unwarranted criticism when his appointment was announced -- largely because he had not previously served in diplomatic posts.  However, as one who frequently visits Italy and meets with political and business leaders, I know that many of those leaders welcomed having an envoy from America with Mr. Secchia's outstanding record of accomplishment in the business world, combined with a proven ability to get things done that would serve him well in diplomacy.  Italy's advance is being led by aggressive and sophisticated Italian leaders who enthusiastically accept Ambassador Secchia and appreciate the talents and great ability he brings to his position.  Jeno Paulucci  Chairman  National Italian American  Foundation  Washington  Three former futures traders pleaded guilty to charges of fraudulent trading and one entered a plea of innocent to similar charges last week in connection with the government's investigation of commodity pit trading.  All but a handful of the 45 futures traders and one clerk indicted on fraud charges by the government last month have entered their pleas.  Indictments against additional traders are expected by defense attorneys in coming months.  John Myskowski, a former Treasury bond futures trader at the Chicago Board of Trade, and two former Board of Trade soybean traders, Kenneth Gillen and Harry O. Patten III, pleaded guilty to fraudulent trading.  They also agreed to testify against other indicted traders.  Mr. Myskowski, 36 years old, admitted in federal court in Chicago that he participated in illegal pre-arranged trades in the bond pit in 1988 with Howard J. Goberstein.  Mr. Goberstein is a broker who pleaded innocent earlier to fraud charges and is the main target of the federal case in the bond pit.  Mr. Gillen, 29, pleaded guilty to one count and Mr. Patten, 39, pleaded guilty to two counts of fraudulent trades made with a handful of soybean futures traders in June and July of 1988.  Those traders were later indicted.  John Ryan, 49, another soybean futures trader, entered a plea of innocent to four counts of mail and wire fraud and nine counts of violating federal commodity trading laws in 1987 and 1988.  His attorney, Robert Stephenson, said: "We're confident he'll be exonerated."  A federal judge in Washington state denied an attempt by Sir James Goldsmith and his Hoylake Investments Ltd. to block the Washington Insurance Commission from reviewing his proposed #13.4 billion ($21.1 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC, parent of Los Angeles-based insurer Farmers Group Inc.  Hoylake said it will appeal the denial of its motion for a preliminary injunction.  In a separate action in Kansas on Friday, insurance regulators there denied Hoylake's request to be exempted from the regulatory review process.  The two blows come as Sir James is scrambling in London to get an extension of the Oct. 7 deadline by which he must complete the acquisition of B.A.T under British takeover rules.  He has blamed the U.S. insurance regulatory process for the delays, and he has said that without the extension, his takeover bid will fail.  Britain's Takeover Panel is expected to rule this week on his request for an extension.  Washington and Kansas are among nine states where Farmers has insurance operations.  Sir James's group has filed federal lawsuits in all nine states to try to block the insurance regulators in those states from reviewing his takeover bid for B.A.T, a London-based tobacco, retailing, paper and financial-services concern.  A Texas judge last month denied Sir James's request for a preliminary injunction to block the review there.  In London, a B.A.T spokesman said the Tacoma, Wash., and Texas decisions demonstrate "that Hoylake's constitutional challenge is a failing tactic."  The Hoylake lawsuits are challenging the insurance regulators' authority on constitutional grounds.  Sir James has reached an agreement to sell Farmers -- if he is successful in acquiring B.A.T -- to France's Axa Midi Assurances for $4.5 billion.  The agreement is designed to win the approval of the insurance regulators.  Hearings on Hoylake's and Axa Midi's requests to acquire B.A.T and Farmers have been set by regulators in three states: In Idaho on Oct. 3, in Washington on Oct. 10, and in Oregon on Oct 18.  The Takeover Panel meeting, set for Wednesday, takes on added importance because it doesn't appear likely that Britain's Office of Fair Trading will recommend that the Hoylake bid be referred for a full study by the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.  A referral to the commission would result in a multimonth study that automatically would dissolve the Hoylake bid.  The Office of Fair Trading is expected to announce its decision today or tomorrow regarding a referral.  "We aren't particularly hopeful that we'll get an MMC referral, but we really don't need a referral to defeat the bid," the B.A.T spokesman said.  The Office of Fair Trading automatically reviews all bids over a certain size for antitrust and other public-policy implications.  Although antitrust grounds weren't present in this case, B.A.T had sought to make an issue of the bid's highly leveraged nature.  However, John Redwood, British minister for corporate affairs, reiterated in an interview with The Times of London over the weekend the government's policy that a leveraged bid isn't, itself, sufficient cause for a study by the MMC.  Richard W. Miller, who was recently named president and chief operating officer of this midrange computer maker, was named a director, increasing the board's size to 12 members.  Anthony J. Lewis, the 61-year-old chairman of this securities firm, will retire April 30.  He joined the company in 1945.  Michael Richardson, a director, will succeed Mr. Lewis as chairman.  Mr. Richardson will continue as managing director of corporate finance at N.M. Rothschild & Sons Ltd.  Charles Worsham, Morris Cranmer, and Tom Ethridge were named directors of this manufacturer of marine and oil-field rubber products.  Mr. Worsham is vice president of finance, controller, and chief financial officer of the company.  Mr. Ethridge is president and chief executive officer of Hydratech Inc., an Oklahoma City marketer of equipment used in water and oil well drilling.  Mr. Cranmer is a Little Rock, Ark., toxicologist and consultant and an official of the Arkansas Health Department.  The move expands the board to 12 members.  In your July 27 page-one article about Grumman's F-14, I was surprised to read that I had "hastily arranged a visit to the air commanders of the Pacific and Atlantic fleets, playing off their fears and recruiting them in a campaign to lobby. . . ."  This is just not correct.  While I try to see Adms.  Fetterman and Ready on a reasonably regular basis, anyone who believes that I can "play on their fears" vastly underrates these two gentlemen.  They have an understanding of naval aviation requirements far superior to mine.  A statement in the article, also previously made in an editorial, is that the secretary of defense is trying to "eliminate the F-14D."  Neither the Navy nor the Defense Department wishes to eliminate this aircraft.  The issue is whether fleet requirements can be met by remanufacturing previously built aircraft or whether additional new production is required.  Navy testimony indicates that new production is in fact needed.  Obviously a side issue, but a very important one, is the continuation of Grumman as a supplier of new carrier-capable aircraft.  Peter B. Oram  President  Grumman Aircraft Systems  Bethpage, N.Y.  ---  Your article on the fate of Grumman's F-14 paints a bleaker prospect for the future of Long Island's economy than is warranted.  Most estimates predict that more than 10,000 people would be laid off if the F-14 is canceled.  However, the Association for a Better Long Island recently surveyed 50 business leaders and found that 31% believe the region would not be affected by the layoffs and that an additional 52% feel the region's economy would be affected only slightly.  Only 10% of these business leaders feel there would be a major impact.  Several of those who took part in the survey pointed out that 10,000 jobs is still less than 1% of Long Island's total work force.  Many of them also noted that many of the people who stand to lose their jobs have valuable skills -- especially engineers -- and will find new jobs quickly.  At the same time, other Long Island business and government people dispute this claim.  They are concerned that the loss of Grumman's biggest contract would be a disaster from which Long Island would need years to recover.  It is difficult to fault any community for fighting to retain projects that are a major economic force.  But the issue of whether or not to continue the F-14 or any other large government project is a decision that should be based on national goals and policies, not local economic concerns.  However, there is an issue Congress must address: Should any federal agency terminate a major job-producing contract without a plan to ease the job-loss shock?  Connecticut's Rep. Sam Gejdenson has introduced a bill designed to ensure that defense-dependent areas can adequately deal with a reduced flow of federal dollars.  Among other things, it provides grants to communities that have been affected by defense-contract cutbacks or base closings, and even offers one year's full protection of the health benefits of workers laid off as a result of defense cutbacks.  Arthur J. Kremer  Uniondale, N.Y.  Michael Nathanson was named to the new post of president of world-wide production of this movie studio.  He will be based in Burbank, Calif.  Crowthers McCall Pattern Inc. sued investor Reginald F. Lewis, charging that his highly leveraged purchase and sale of the company triggered its slide into bankruptcy-law proceedings.  The suit, filed in federal court in Manhattan, also named Shearson Lehman Brothers Group Inc. and Bankers Trust Company, a subsidiary of Bankers Trust New York Corp., two other investors in the leveraged buy-out.  Nine other defendants -- shareholders and directors of Mr. Lewis's holding company, TLC Group Inc. -- also were named.  Crowthers McCall seeks more than $60 million in damages, said attorney Robert W. Gottlieb of Rosenman & Colin, retained as special counsel, on a variety of claims including fraudulent conveyance and breach of fiduciary duty.  Mr. Lewis's McCall-related transactions saddled the pattern company with large debt obligations that eventually forced it to file for bankruptcy, Mr. Gottlieb contended.  Shearson Lehman and Bankers Trust are also liable because they bankrolled the transactions, Mr. Gottlieb said.  "We believe liability can be established when as here the LBO transaction made McCall insolvent," Mr. Gottlieb said.  Butch Meily, a spokesman from TLC's Paris office, called the suit frivolous.  "We're confident that it will be judged so in a court of law," Mr. Meily said.  He added, "When TLC sold McCall, the company was healthy, financially sound and well-managed.  McCall enjoyed the two most profitable years in its history under TLC."  Pretax operating profit rose to $14 million from a previous high of $6.5 million.  Calls to Shearson Lehman and Bankers Trust weren't returned.  McCall Pattern Co., which began in the home-sewing business more than a century ago, was sold in January 1984 for $24.5 million to TLC, a group controlled by Mr. Lewis, a former associate with the law firm Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison, and one of the few black investment bankers on Wall Street.  As set forth in the complaint, TLC paid then-owner Norton Simon $20 million in cash and a $2.5 million note bearing annual interest at 13%.  But TLC provided only $1 million.  Bankers Trust loaned TLC $19 million and set up a $3 million revolving credit arrangement, the complaint says.  In consideration for the LBO loan, Bankers Trust became the primary banking depository for TLC/McCall funds and was granted a warrant to buy for 15 years as much as 19% of the company's outstanding stock.  In June 1987, TLC sold McCall Pattern Co. to an investor group controlled by John Crowther PLC, a British textile concern, for $63 million.  According to the complaint, Shearson, TLC, a subsidiary of Shearson Group, and Bankers Trust provided a combined $35 million in short-term loans to Crowther to purchase the McCall stock.  The $35 million, 9.75% note issue was sold to Travelers Insurance Co. and Travelers Indemnity Co. in September 1987.  Ten months later, Crowthers McCall's net worth dipped below the minimum required under the note agreement with Travelers, and the notes were declared in default.  Then, in September 1988, Crowthers McCall failed to make a $3.8 million payment of principal on the notes, which meant it couldn't make any interest payments on a separate $22 million junk-bond issue.  Three months later in December, Crowthers McCall filed for reorganization under Chapter 11.  As Crowthers McCall's fortunes sagged, TLC's business bloomed.  Coincidently, that same month, TLC purchased Beatrice International Food Co. for $985 million from Beatrice Co., Chicago.  Jerry E. Bishop of The Wall Street Journal has won the 1990 Grady-Stack Award, honoring "his numerous articles on scientific subjects," The American Chemical Society announced.  The $3,000 award "for interpreting chemistry for the public," will be presented next April at the society's national meeting in Boston.  Announcing the Grady-Stack award, the society cited in particular Mr. Bishop's October 1988 article "Global Threat" that drew attention to the buildup of methane gas in the atmosphere as an aspect of concern about global warming.  A veteran of more than 30 years with this paper, Mr. Bishop has covered all the major medical, science and technology stories of a generation.  His other honors include awards from the American Heart Association, American Medical Association, American Association for the Advancement of Science, American Institute of Physics and National Association of Science Writers.  John Fund's Aug. 28 editorial-page article is an unfair attack on M. Danny Wall and completely ignores the hostile environment confronting Mr. Wall and the savings-and-loan supervisory establishment during the 1980s.  While Mr. Fund notes the increase in deposit-insurance coverage in the 1980 deregulation legislation, there's nary a word about the level of interest rates when Congress passed the deregulation bill.  In the month the bill was passed, March 1980, three-month Treasury rates were at 15 1/2% and remained in the 14%-17% range through most of the next two years because of the Federal Reserve's anti-inflation drive.  Small wonder that many savings institutions -- pressed for earnings thanks to 6%8% fixed-rate mortgages -- rushed to Texas and other energy states where real estate was booming and the demand for mortgage credit was strong.  That boom crashed with the plunge in energy prices in 1986 and we saw the wave of financial failures in those states.  One of the untold byproducts of the 1980 law can be stated simply: Congress took controls off savings rates when there was an inadequate "police force" in the supervisory wing of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board to deal with the problems that were to follow.  Not until 1985 (and over the opposition of the Office of Management and Budget in the Reagan administration) was the Bank Board able to provide the kind of examinations and supervision that were sorely needed.  Once those actions were taken, the board's supervisory appointees began to move aggressively on troubled shops, including some, unfortunately, run by self-dealing promoters.  Although The Wall Street Journal chooses to heap blame on Mr. Wall, an honorable and conscientious government official, the truth is that he inherited a difficult situation produced by government policies and decisions made long before Mr. Wall moved to the Bank Board.  William B. O'Connell  U.S. League Management Consultants  Chicago  ---  Mr. Fund shows in microcosm the economic and moral failings of our age.  Danny Wall, who knew little more about matters economic than a first-year college student upon his arrival in Washington in 1980, is chosen as committee staff director for the Senate Banking Committee.  Magically, within seven years he's running the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.  But there's really no magic here, no sleight of hand.  This is Washington.  How does a Danny Wall, or anyone else for that matter, rise to such a position?  Simple.  They do what they're told.  There are hundreds of Danny Walls traipsing through the halls of Congress.  They are, if you will, this country's governing body.  Now that's a scary thought.  Charles G. McGuire  Dallas  Circle K Corp. said net income for its fiscal first quarter ended July 31 fell 39% partly due to interest and depreciation costs from the company's acquisition program.  The operator of convenience stores reported net of $7.6 million, or 13 cents a share, down from $12.4 million, or 25 cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue totaled $1 billion, up 25% from $816 million in the year-ago quarter.  The most recent quarter's results included an after-tax loss of $2.7 million from acquisition and expansion programs that have been curtailed.  Karl Eller, chairman and chief executive officer, said he is still considering whether to submit a proposal to acquire the company in a leveraged buy-out.  In such a buy-out, an investor group acquires a company with borrowings that it will pay down through the company's operations or asset sales.  "I don't have any idea if there are any other bidders at this time," Mr. Eller said.  Last February, Circle K retained the merchant banking firm of Wasserstein, Perella & Co. to help explore "future options," including a possible financial restructuring or merger.  Analysts said there has been skepticism over the sale of the company due to its high debt level.They added that fiscal first quarter earnings were higher than many had expected.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Circle K shares fell 25 cents to close at $9.75 -- just above their 52week low of $9.625 -- on volume of 432,000 shares.  During the past 52 weeks, the company's shares have traded as high as $16.625 each on takeover rumors.  Mr. Eller said that Circle K's profit margins have improved.  "We are running a tighter ship and doing a better job of managing the company," he said, adding: "We made some management changes."  Circle K operates 4,693 convenience stores in 33 states and licenses or has joint ventures for another 1,100 in 11 foreign countries.  Ever since a Harvard University study in April cast doubt on the relative safety of high-yield junk bonds, people on Wall Street and in academia have been scurrying to claim the intellectual high ground in what is now a raging debate.  It may be a question of whom you wish to believe: Harvard's Graduate School of Business Administration or the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School of Business, which is about to unveil its own study attacking the Harvard report as misleading and sensational.  The Wharton study by Marshall E. Blume and Donald B. Keim was prompted in part by the Harvard report.  It examined the same bonds issued in 1977 and 1978, and concluded that junk bonds provided greater returns than investment-grade bonds through last December despite a higher default rate.  "Junk bonds held in a diversified portfolio are not as risky as some people perceived," says Mr. Blume.  Nevertheless, the Wharton study accepts some of the findings of the Harvard report and suggests junk bonds aren't as lucrative as some specialists believe.  Mr. Blume acknowledges that the Harvard study by Paul Asquith, now a professor at Massachusetts Institute of Technology's Sloan School of Business, altered a widespread perception fostered by the securities industry -- and by some academics who received funding from Wall Street -- that the junk-bond default rate is insignificant.  The Harvard study found that investors who bought and held a portfolio of all junk bonds issued in 1977 and 1978 would, by Nov. 1, 1988, have experienced a default rate of more than 34%.  The most frequently cited source on the $200 billion junk-bond market, a book co-written by New York University Prof.  Edward I. Altman, says average default rates for junk bonds in the 1970-85 period never exceeded 2.1%.  Last year, Mr. Altman, who has been on "retainer" to Morgan Stanley & Co. in recent years and has been a paid consultant to Merrill Lynch & Co. more recently, disclosed at an industry conference a new, unpublished study suggesting the real default rate for junk bonds is nearly 32% over a similar period.  Mr. Altman doesn't see great significance in the discrepancy between several earlier studies, including his book, which suggest low default rates for junk bonds, and his most recent report indicating a higher default rate.  That is because he, like many other junk-bond specialists, assume the returns from owning junk bonds are more than sufficient to compensate for the risk of default.  The Wharton study is aimed at eliminating the concern sparked by the Harvard report.  It says the realized annual yield for all junk bonds issued in 1977 and 1978 is 8.51%, compared with yield to maturities of 7.6% for intermediate Treasurys, 8.08% for long-term Treasurys and 8.43% for a composite of triple-A corporate bonds.  "When a bond defaults, that doesn't mean investors lose a lot of money," says Mr. Blume.  "Default rates are a symptom.  But investors are primarily interested in returns.  The default rate isn't always the significant event in bonds."  For its part, the Harvard study didn't show whether junk bonds are good investments.  Its own examination of the investment returns from junk bonds vs. other debt securities isn't finished.  Mr. Asquith couldn't be reached for comment on the Wharton study.  Nevertheless, the junk-bond market doesn't appear to be as lucrative as many investors and traders believed.  For instance, the realized yield from junk bonds issued in 1977 and 1978 was 2.61% less than the "promised yield" because of defaults, early redemptions, which can hurt returns, and private exchanges of junk bonds that are about to default for other securities, according to the Wharton data.  "It's significant that the actual yield is 2 1/2% less than the promised yield," says Mr. Blume.  "Certainly some investors who purchased high-yield bond funds weren't aware of the risks of their investments."  And Wharton isn't making any predictions about the future success of junk bonds.  "Our study says over the period we examined you had greater returns (from junk bonds).  But that doesn't mean this will be repeated.  In the last seven months, junk bonds haven't been as good investments as investment-grade securities."  The leader of the United Airlines pilots union has told his 6,500 members they face pay cuts of up to 10%, less overtime pay and fewer vacation days to help finance their $300-a-share, $6.75 billion bid for UAL Corp.  In a 35-page mailing, which was obtained by The Wall Street Journal, sent out to pilots late yesterday, union chairman Frederick C. Dubinsky said the pay and benefit reductions will be part of a new seven-year contract during which the pilots have agreed not to strike.  The mailing laid out some of the terms under which the pilots are participating in a bid with UAL mangement led by chairman Stephen Wolf and British Airways PLC.  The group was formed in response to a $275-a-share, $6.19 billion bid from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  About two-thirds of United's pilots will have their pay cut 10%.  They are the more senior pilots who receive higher pay under a so-called A scale.  The remainder, more recently hired pilots who earn only 55% as much under a B scale, will be raised to 70% of the A scale and gain higher pay for flying larger aircraft.  They will then take 10% cuts as well.  The new contract will raise the number of flight hours they have to work from 80 hours to 85 hours a month.  However, pilots wouldn't be paid for the four of the additional five hours.  The cost savings for the difference will go toward funding the pilots' share of an employee stock-ownership plan.  That and other work-rule changes represent $53 million of $250 million in pilot cost concessions.  Some pilots will also have their medical benefits reduced via an increase in the deductible, which is the amount of annual insured health-care expenses employees pay by themselves.  There were no details of the cutback in vacation time.  In his letter, Mr. Dubinsky told the pilots the success of their bid will also rest on their individual willingness to divert money from the pilot retirement fund to raise $200 million in equity for their offer.  The letter also outlined the formation of a pilots-management panel and a labor-management group that would have a say in how the airline is run.  However, the pilots still haven't been told why employees will choose only three of the new company's 15 directors, despite owning 75% of the stock, or how eight outside directors will be chosen.  Terms of the latest agreement require fewer concessions than a pilot proposal for buying the airline in 1987.  Then, the union was calling on its membership to take 25% wage cuts and was proposing to reduce company contributions to the pilots' primary pension plan.  That plan would remain untouched under the current proposal.  The pension proposal two years ago proved highly controversial among pilot groups nearing retirement age.  Separately, Mr. Davis reached an agreement with UAL gaining access to confidential company data that could help him raise his offer.  In exchange, Mr. Davis promised not to make hostile moves against UAL for one year as long as UAL doesn't try to sell the company for less than $300 a share, or the price of Mr. Davis's latest offer, whichever is higher.  The restrictions on hostile moves would also terminate if the company attempts any non-sale steps such as a recapitalization, as long as Mr. Davis offers to acquire the company at the highest price he has previously proposed.  Aides to Mr. Davis plan to start sorting through the information today at UAL headquarters in Chicago.  But they are handicapped by the lack of any labor concessions in competing against the pilots-management bid.  So one of Mr. Davis's main hopes is that the other bid founders.  That could happen if the group doesn't hold together because the pilots balk at the concessions, or if a rival union of machinists tries to scuttle the financing by threatening to strike or join forces with another bidder.  In an apparent effort to bolster its position in talks with the pilots-management group, the machinists are scheduled to meet this week with representatives of Mr. Davis and of Texas investor Robert Bass, who also has expressed interest in bidding.  But the New York leveraged buy-out firm of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. said it isn't interested in UAL. KKR contradicted an assertion by John Peterpaul, vice-president of the International Association of Machinists, that KKR advisers have contacted the machinists.  Mr. Peterpaul stood by his earlier assertion that Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. had contacted the machinists as recently as "a couple of weeks ago" on behalf of KKR.  But the KKR spokesman said he didn't know of any such contact by Drexel.  Reviewing UAL's inside data could restrict any sales or purchases of UAL stock by Mr. Davis.  On Friday there were more rumors Mr. Davis or Mr. Bass might be selling UAL stock before they look at the data.  UAL shares fell $1.50 a share to $280.25 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  One of the first questions often asked by those who know or discover that I tinker with writing as a low-cash-flow retirement hobby is, "What kind of word processor do you use?"  Therefore, let me describe it as best I can.  It is a very compact, 67-year-old unit positioned midway between my ears, which makes it very tricky to repair or get at to install any up-to-date components.  Its memory chip is the most unpredictable element.  I don't know the storage capacity, but it is much less than it once was.  And it is quite erratic.  Some days it functions well, yet on others the recall is pitifully small.  And it even fluctuates greatly throughout the day, starting with a weak signal in the mornings and gradually improving as the day progresses.  Furthermore, its recall span has shortened significantly, being infinitely superior for items stored recently than for those from a few months back.  This is a marked change from the period between its 13th and 19th years of operation, when it knew absolutely everything.  Fortunately, I have it connected by telepathic modem to another memory unit in our household of similar construction.  It is a feminine model which, amazingly, has total recall for data and events that time has somehow completely erased from my less durable unit.  It dredges up innumerable details of events so long-past that when punched into my unit it simply flashes "Will Not Compute."  I'm sure my aging processor will serve me well so long as I can maintain its compatibility with the unit mentioned in the preceding paragraph.  This seems to be contingent to a large degree on its recall of selected units of information, like birthdays, anniversaries, Valentine's Day, etc.  These I have stored on a separate floppy disk cell in a humidified, fortified compartment.  My particular model processor has one unique idiosyncrasy, not attendant to the better-known brand names.  It is easily distracted from its work by such extraneous matters as ball games on TV or a ringing telephone.  It has several built-in features, such as spelling, grammar and synonym functions, although these may not measure up to the units now available in the industry.  They were compiled many years ago in laboratories that appear primitive today.  My printer is in harmony with the rest of the system.  It is a hand-operated, electric-powered, 40 wpm typewriter that has proved capable of handling the full range of output coming from the processor.  With an occasional tune-up and ribbon replacement, it appears fit for additional extended service.  Since the warranty period for my system has long since passed, and its trade-in value would be exceedingly small, I hope to keep it operational for a few more years.  After all, it's still working on the Great American Novel.  ---  Mr. Reagan, who lives in Topeka, Kan., is still state-of-the-art, as far as we're concerned.  Enimont S.p.A. announced it will sell 850 million common shares, representing 20% of its share capital, for 1,420 lire (99 cents) a share in an effort to raise 1.207 trillion lire ($844.4 million).  The issue price is at the higher end of the 1,250-to-1,550-lire range announced in the prospectus describing the initial public stock offering by the Italian chemical joint venture.  Enimont is equally owned by Enichem S.p.A., a state-owned chemical group, and Montedison S.p.A.  However, the price was slightly below expectations of analysts who had forecast Enimont would sell the stock for just above 1,500 lire a share.  Ford Motor Co. said it will temporarily close three of its truck assembly plants for one week each because of "a shortage of dealer orders" for certain models, and a strike at a non-Ford plant that makes truck parts.  The only plant affected by the strike is Ford's Michigan Truck facility in Wayne, Mich.  Ford builds full-size F-Series pickups and Bronco sport-utility vehicles at the plant, which uses parts made at a Borg-Warner Corp. plant in Muncie, Ind.  United Auto Workers union Local 278 went on strike last week at the Muncie facility after the company and the union failed to agree on a new contract.  Immediately after the strike began, a Ford spokesman said the auto maker might have to reduce or eliminate overtime at several truck plants because of the work halt.  But late last week, Ford decided to close the Wayne facility completely for one week beginning Sept. 18.  About 1,660 hourly employees build some 3,000 trucks a week at the Wayne plant on two shifts.  Continuing slow sales of compact Ranger pickups, Bronco II sport-utility vehicles and medium-duty and heavy-duty trucks forced Ford to order the short-term closings at two other plants, both in Louisville, Ky.  The closings begin today.  At the end of August, Ford had an 80-day supply of the Ranger and a 78-day supply of the Bronco II.  A 60-day to 65-day supply is considered normal.  Ford employs about 3,100 hourly workers at the Louisville Assembly plant, which builds roughly 6,800 of the trucks a week on two shifts.  Ford closed Louisville Assembly for a week in July and idled another Ranger plant in Twin Cities, Minn., for two weeks because of slow Ranger sales.  Ford is currently offering consumer rebates of $1,000 or more on Ranger and Bronco II.  Kentucky Truck builds about 1,300 medium-duty and heavy-duty trucks a week on one shift of about 2,000 hourly employees.  This is the second time this year Ford has closed the plant because of "lack of dealer orders."  Prior to this past closing, Ford hadn't had to idle output at Kentucky Truck because of market conditions since 1987.  Capital Cities/ABC Inc. has been quietly testing a new magazine that would promote the daytime soap-opera programs of its ABC network.  Executives of Capital Cities/ABC said that a magazine for soap-opera viewers was being tested but wouldn't confirm a launch date nor provide specifics about the magazine.  However, advertising-agency executives who have been shown prototypes said they have been told ABC will be the publisher of the magazine, with the support of New York-based Fairchild Publications Inc., a Capital Cities unit.  Agency executives say a spring 1990 launch is planned.  Sources close to ABC said the company has been testing the magazine for two years.  The Capital Cities/ABC magazine -- to be called Episodes -- will be open to advertisers and available to a mass audience.  The publication of Episodes is the first time ABC has been able to work closely together with the publishing unit of Capital Cities.  "Most publishers don't have TV holdings to work with," said Paul DuCharme, director of print media at Grey Advertising.  "Episodes serves ABC a lot of ways.  It can promote its shows while offering advertisers added value.  Among the networks, it puts them in a progressive position."  ABC's soap operas are a major profit center for the network.  Effective promotion of the soap operas is a major goal of the network, considering the size of the U.S. daytime TV audience.  According to A.C. Nielsen Co. the average daytime TV audience in July between 10 a.m. and 4:30 p.m. was 4.7 million TV households, or about 6.2 million viewers.  Capital Cities/ABC executives have told agencies Episodes will be published once every two months.  One-year subscriptions to Episodes will be offered free to viewers through a 900 telephone number that will cost $3 a call.  Subscriptions will be offered during the daytime in on-air promotions, and the magazine's circulation is projected to start at two million and reach three million by 1991.  One of the most attractive aspects of the project, according to ad-agency executives, is that Capital Cities/ABC will offer ad packages that tie in daytime commercial time with pages in the magazine.  As proposed to agencies, the cost per page of Episodes comes to about $30,000, compared with a cost of between $50,000 and $60,000 a page in women's service magazines.  Industry executives said Episodes could compete with the large-circulation women's service magazines, such as McCall's and Good Housekeeping.  It would be a challenger to Soap Opera Digest, the fast-growing biweekly that Rupert Murdoch's News America Publishing Inc., a unit of News Corp., acquired in June for $70 million.  Soap Opera Digest covers all three networks' daytime programs, as well as some of the prime-time soaps such as CBS Inc.'s "Dallas."  Michelle Berman, publisher of Soap Opera Digest, said Episodes could help convince stubborn TV advertisers to spend more in print.  "Our research shows many women tape soap operas and zap out the commercials," Ms. Berman says.  "Buying into print would be a way for advertisers around the zapping.  If Episodes works, it will give TV advertisers a reason to buy us."  Prototypes of Episodes -- subtitled "exclusive from the studios of ABC" -- are full-sized, with soap-opera celebrities featured on the cover.  Nancy Smith, director of media services at Young & Rubicam, says her prototype includes a pullout poster of a an actor, ads with coupons, a sweepstakes readers can participate in, and a soap-opera quiz about favorite shows.  Rockefeller Group Inc. is seeking to sell a major stake in the family-owned company to outside investors for more than $1 billion, according to people familiar with the proposed transaction.  Sources said the company, which owns Rockefeller Center in Manhattan among other assets, is seeking between $1.3 billion and $2 billion.  Various proposals that have been discussed would involve the sale of from 40% to 80% of the company, the sources said.  The plan represents another in a series of moves to raise cash for a generation of Rockefellers whose inheritance is tied up in real estate and other corporate holdings.  Rockefeller Group's investment banker, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., is preparing a prospectus which will be available by the end of this month to a limited group of potential investors, people close to the transaction said.  Family members are hoping to be able to raise the cash without losing control over the management of company assets, the sources said.  Richard A. Voell, Rockefeller Group's president said: "The board has authorized us to explore different strategic alternatives or a recapitalization of the company."  He said the alternatives include a long-term financial restructuring of the company or a sale of shares.  Mr. Voell said the goal of any such transaction would be to raise more capital for the company and provide liquidity for current shareholders.  He said the investor or buyer must "share the long-term interests of the company."  Japanese firms and institutional investors who are aware of the offer are said to be interested already, in large part because Rockefeller Group's real-estate portfolio includes the "trophy" properties such investors crave.  Built during the Great Depression, the core of Rockefeller Center is known for its Art Deco-style buildings which overlook a famous ice-skating rink, a Christmas tree in the winter and a gilded statue of Prometheus.  The center includes 30 Rockefeller Plaza (formerly the RCA building, now the General Electric Building), where National Broadcasting Co. is a major tenant.  In addition, there are more modern structures, including the Time-Life and McGraw-Hill buildings.  In addition to Rockefeller Center, the company's assets include 80% of Cushman & Wakefield, the national real-estate brokerage and consulting firm; Rockefeller Center Development Corp., which controls prime New York and New Jersey properties; Radio City Music Hall Productions Inc.; Rockefeller Center Telecommunications Services; and a financial-services unit.  Among recent moves to raise cash for the Rockefeller family, Rockefeller Group refinanced the 19-building Rockefeller Center in 1985 by taking out a $1.3 billion mortgage on some of the rentable space and then selling shares in that mortgage to the public through a real-estate investment trust.  The publicly held REIT has an option to convert its mortgage to a 71% ownership stake in the mortgaged property by the year 2000.  The mortgage held by the REIT applies to six million of the 15 million square feet of rentable space in Rockefeller Center.  Also in 1985, Rockefeller Group sold a 15% equity interest to outside investors.  More recently, it sold properties around the country.  The company's Rockefeller Center Development Corp. unit manages and operates the 22-acre center, and sources familiar with the latest plan said the company wants to continue to manage the complex because of the center's link to the Rockefeller family name and image.  The sources said the company may seek a group of investors who together would control a majority stake in the company, but who individually would own less than any member of the Rockefeller family.  But sources said this time it may not be easy to find investors willing to comply with Rockefeller Group's stipulations that the real-estate, entertainment and communications businesses remain under one umbrella.  The company also controls a vacant midtown Manhattan site on the west side of the center where a proposed skyscraper may be built.  The development unit also controls a 678-acre site in Mount Olive, N.J., about half of which is slated for office development.  The Rockefeller family fortune was built by John D. Rockefeller, founder of Standard Oil Co., who amassed by 1911 a fortune of $900 million, the equivalent of many billions in today's dollars.  His son, John D. Rockefeller Jr., created a series of five trusts for his children in 1934, funding each with about $50 million.  Today, the trusts are the principal owner of Rockefeller Group, and the descendants of John D. Jr. are the beneficiaries.  As the descendants proliferate, the family pie is being sliced into more and more pieces.  Many of the fourth generation are middle-aged and saddled by financial obligations.  And even some of the fifth generation are in their 30s and eager for cash to finance their business efforts.  North Hills Electronics Inc. expects to report that fiscal second-quarter net income tripled to $75,000 on an 11% sales increase, Howard G. Anders, president and chief operating officer, said.  In the quarter ended July 31, Mr. Anders said in an interview, net rose to an estimated three cents a share.  The electronics concern had year-earlier net of $23,000, or one cent a share.  Sales are estimated at $3 million for the latest quarter, compared with $2.7 million.  Six-month net fell 39% to about $95,000, or three to four cents a share, from $156,000, or six cents a share, Mr. Anders estimated.  Sales fell 5% to $5.9 million from $6.2 million.  The executive said the year-earlier six-month figures reflect a one-time order from Zenith Electronics Corp. that accounted for $1.5 million of sales and five cents a share of the net.  For fiscal 1990, Mr. Anders said, North Hills expects perhaps a 30% to 50% improvement in net from the previous year's $339,821, or 13 cents a share, as sales rise to $13 million from $12 million.  In its second quarter, North Hills Electronics saw "very fine volume pickup" in its businesses, including a 20% rise in orders for products used in local area networks, said Mr. Anders.  Such networks are groups of computers that can "talk" to, or share data with, one another.  The company's most important product in local area networking is the balun, which allows a personal computer and a printer and other peripheral items to link up in a network.  In addition, what North Hills calls a multistation access unit allows as many as eight personal computers to transfer data to one another.  These products provide about 60% of current revenue, the executive said.  The baluns, of which North Hills makes about 80 types, are designed to allow components to "talk" using International Business Machines Corp.'s token-ring method of data transmission.  "Our feeling is that token ring will surpass Ethernet," which is about a 15-year-old system, as a data-transfer standard, Mr. Anders said.  "Interestingly, our interest {in local area networking} is really a result of IBM deciding not to market our products directly," Mr. Anders said.  In 1982, IBM "decided the market for baluns wouldn't be so great" and determined to sell them only through its distributorships, Mr. Anders said.  When IBM decided not to directly market North Hills products, "we were again a small engineering company" and needed to develop more products and an organization to market them, he said.  North Hills had losses in fiscal years 1986 through 1988 as it developed a marketing system.  The company has been expanding its customer base, Mr. Anders said, using trade and military-magazine advertising as well as plowing about 27% of sales back into selling and general and administrative expenses to promote its equipment.  The company is aiming at installed personal computers to create networks, Mr. Anders said, estimating that only about 20% of PCs currently are linked.  Additionally, while new computers are being produced with one balun built in, a second must be installed in the wiring of the network itself.  North Hills will be introducing several other local area networking products in its fourth quarter.  These include fiber-optic and coaxial repeaters and line drivers, which ensure that a signal sent from one computer to another finds its destination despite any interference that might occur on the line.  Each of the new products could produce $1 million of revenue during its first year of sale, Mr. Anders estimated.  North Hills derives about 35% of its business from signal-processing products.  In this category are data bus couplers used in military aircraft to transmit electronic signals throughout a plane, Mr. Anders said.  North Hills sells to Boeing Co., McDonnell Douglas Corp., Grumman Corp., Northrop Corp. and other airplane manufacturers.  Much of this business involves retrofitting existing planes.  The operation "isn't susceptible to significant swings in the military budget," Mr. Anders said.  And the company now is looking to Europe as another significant source of revenue.  Also in North Hills' signal-processing product line are video isolation transformers used to clean up interference on closed-circuit TV lines.  The rest of North Hills' operations are in specialty power supplies for industrial applications, including computers systems, and military uses, including tanks and other vehicles.  Competition for engineers on Long Island was so severe that the company decided to produce this equipment in Yokneam, near Haifa, in Israel, Mr. Anders said.  The House is prepared to forge ahead on a wide-ranging bill to bar discrimination against the handicapped.  The bill covers, among other things, hiring practices and access to public buildings.  The Senate passed the bill on a 76-8 vote late Thursday, and House members, much as senators did, are likely to make frequent rhetorical and legislative bows to a strong small-business constituency as they consider the bill.  But even though the House is more oriented to the concerns of small businesses than the Senate, it isn't likely to seriously dilute the measure, which has acquired overwhelming momentum from disability groups finally sensing a major civil-rights victory.  Four House committees -- labor, judiciary, public works and commerce -- plan hearings on the bill this month, and the measure could reach the House floor in October.  Passage is likely by Thanksgiving at the latest and the bill could go to President Bush for his signature by the end of the year, according to Melissa Schulman, senior legislative assistant to Rep. Steny Hoyer (D., Md.), chairman of the House Democratic caucus and the bill's chief House sponsor.  The House may even adopt the Senate bill without amendment, a move that would accelerate its enactment.  The measure has 229 co-sponsors in the 435-member House.  Mr. Bush backed it early and often, starting with last year's election campaign.  He wouldn't veto it now, "no matter what it looked like," says Robert Silverstein, chief counsel to the Senate subcommittee on the handicapped.  Some sense of the emotional clout behind the bill was expressed in the Senate debate by Sen. Tom Harkin (D., Iowa).  Arguing for the legislation, he said, "To this day, no federal law prevents an employer in the private sector or an owner of a hotel or restaurant or transportation or communications company from excluding, segregating or otherwise discriminating against 43 million Americans with disabilities."  By now, "the business community recognizes the basic premise, that disabled people are entitled to protection under the law," said Pete Lunnie, a labor-relations official with the National Association of Manufacturers.  But, he said, companies want to know with some certainty what the extent of that legal protection will be.  At one point during negotiations over the bill, the Bush administration had estimated the costs of the employment and public-accommodations provisions could range between $10 billion and $20 billion annually.  But the legislation was modified to make clear that it wouldn't require insurance for AIDS victims or any revamping of existing buildings, and the White House now estimates its cost at around $1 billion to $2 billion a year.  The Senate bill would require employers to make "reasonable accommodations" for the handicapped, in hiring and other ways, but it says they wouldn't have to incur an "undue hardship."  Smallest companies -- those with fewer than 25 workers starting two years after enactment and those with fewer than 15 employees two years later -- would be exempt.  Owners of theaters, restaurants and other public buildings would have to equip new or renovated buildings to admit disabled people.  There wouldn't be any general small-business exemption to the public-accommodation requirements, but most new and renovated buildings wouldn't have to have elevators if the buildings have fewer than three floors, or if each floor has less than 3,000 square feet.  Access for the handicapped also would be required for Amtrak trains, mass-transit stations and buses.  The Senate amended the bill to require that telephone companies provide special devices that deaf people could use to communicate visually, beginning three years after enactment, rather than the two years previously specified.  The Senate also voted 90-0 for an amendment offered by Sen. Rudy Boschwitz (R., Minn.) to require courts to consider a company's good-faith effort to comply with the law when civil actions are brought by the U.S. attorney general on charges of discriminating against disabled people in public accommodations.  But the Senate rebuffed, on budget and tax-policy grounds, a proposal by Sen. Orrin Hatch (R., Utah), that small companies be given a tax credit of as much as $5,000 for the cost of changes they make to their premises for the benefit of handicapped people.  Friday, September 8, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.80% 25 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.875% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.29% one month; 8.30% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.28% six months; 8.28% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.63% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.50% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.32% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 4, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.88% 13 weeks; 7.87% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.11%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.05%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.05%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.09%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Florida Federal Savings Bank said it narrowed its fiscal fourth-quarter loss by more than half, primarily because of reduced operating expenses.  For the quarter ended June 30, the thrift reported a loss of $15.9 million compared with a loss of $35.3 million in the year-earlier period.  For fiscal 1989, the loss was $48.4 million, compared with a loss of $68.9 million in fiscal 1988.  Florida Federal said operating expenses in its fourth quarter fell by almost one-third, to $25.3 million from $37.1 million.  For the year, operating expenses fell 19%, to $99.1 million from $122.9 million.  "We reduced operating expenses for the year to below-target levels," said John Sapanski, chief executive officer.  The thrift also said it believes problems involving students will be settled soon.  In early 1988, Florida Federal came under federal investigation for allegedly filing fraudulent insurance claims on millions of dollars in government-backed student loans.  The investigation helped to trigger a management shake-up that included the resignation of Florida Federal's chairman.  Friday, Mr. Sapanski said the Education Department, the Justice Department and the U.S. attorney's office will meet with Florida Federal this month to discuss a "conclusive settlement."  The British Coal Board has agreed to sell its extensive U.S. real-estate portfolio, including the Watergate complex in Washington D.C., for more than $800 million, according to industry sources.  Buyers for the properties include a number of well-known U.S. real-estate concerns.  The Coal Board, which invests about $20 billion of United Kingdom coal workers' pension money, bought the properties over the past decade, when the real-estate market was much stronger than it is today.  It put its American real-estate portfolio on the block, it said, because it thought there were better opportunities for real-estate investment in Europe.  The Watergate complex will be purchased either by Dallas developer Trammel Crow Co. or Washington builder Oliver Carr Co., according to people close to the negotiations.  They said Morgan Stanley Realty, the real-estate arm of Morgan Stanley & Co. that is handling the sale, was negotiating with both parties and is expected to select the winning bidder within a week.  Morgan Stanley Realty declined comment on the sale.  The sales price for the Watergate, most famous as the scene of the break-in at Democratic headquarters that led to the resignation of President Richard M. Nixon, will be between $100 million and $120 million, said people close to the deal.  The Coal Board has also signed a contract with the New York-based J.W. O'Connor Co. to purchase 12 retail properties, consisting of two regional shopping centers and 10 smaller developments, located mainly in Southern California.  The Coal Board plans to sell its 38 office and warehouse properties to Trammel Crow Ventures, a subsidiary of Trammel Crow.  The Coal Board's properties are held by its subsidiaries, Pan-American Properties, Inc. and Buckingham Holdings Inc. People involved with the sale wouldn't provide details on exactly how much the Coal Board will receive for each piece of the portfolio.  While the Coal Board's retail properties attracted the most investor interest, the sale of the Watergate is expected to arouse the most public curiosity.  Opened in 1965, the Watergate includes a 237-room hotel, two office buildings and shopping areas.  Its location and riverfront views make it a prime property.  British Coal's sale of its U.S. holdings runs counter to the national trend of foreigners increasing their share of U.S. real estate.  Over the last half decade, Japanese, British, Canadian and other overseas interests have taken big bites of the U.S. real-estate market, particularly in major markets such as New York, Los Angeles and Washington.  Over the next few years, investor attention is expected to shift toward Europe, where internal trade barriers will be eliminated in 1992.  Drexel Burnham Lambert today is scheduled to finally enter what amounts to its guilty plea.  In lawyerly language, Drexel's attorneys will say the firm decided to plead guilty to six counts and pay $650 million because prosecutors had otherwise threatened to RICO Drexel out of business before any trial.  So after all the hoopla, it comes down to this: The rubber hose of RICO means we may never know what, if anything, Drexel did that broke the law.  This unsatisfying result is just one of the messes left behind for Richard Breeden and Otto Obermaier.  President Bush recently nominated the free-market-oriented Mr. Breeden to be chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Last week and just before tomorrow's New York mayoral primary, Mr. Bush officially nominated Mr. Obermaier to be the permanent successor to Rudy Giuliani as U.S. Attorney for Manhattan.  These two will have their work cut out to restore the confidence of the market in the common sense and fairness of white-collar law enforcement.  Wall Street and civil libertarians who believe even stock brokers have rights will be relieved when the new guard replaces the old.  Aside from the RICOing of Drexel, prosecutorial abuses have included the indicting of innocents Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor; the piling on against small-timer Lisa Jones; the bankrupting of Princeton/Newport before trial; the two mistrials so far in the GAF case; and what is at least gross overstatement about Michael Milken's alleged crimes.  Perhaps federal judges will be the ones who most welcome the change.  Consider how Judge Pierre Leval spent last Tuesday afternoon.  He had the surreal experience of a defendant pleading guilty to the questionable crime of having been told, "Your Bunny has a good nose."  This was the cryptic message banker Martin Siegel gave Robert Freeman, formerly of Goldman Sachs, in relation to arbitrageur Bunny Lasker's rumors about a 1986 bid for Beatrice.  Before he sentences Mr. Freeman in November, Judge Leval might ask his law clerks to look for a precedent where such obtuse language amounted to insider trading.  Judge Leval no doubt noticed that Mr. Freeman didn't admit any securities violation, only mail fraud -- whatever that means.  Judge Leval also learned that the prosecutors had no idea what actual harm to the market Mr. Freeman did -- if any.  Judge Leval followed the standard practice of asking the prosecutor to estimate Mr. Freeman's potential civil liabilities to victims of his trades.  The prosecutor said he didn't know.  "Restitution of $50 is a different thing from a restitution of $50 million," Judge Leval noted.  The prosecutor said $50 million sounded about right.  An apparently astonished Judge Leval replied, "I didn't mean to suggest that number.  I was just pulling it out of the air."  The prosecutor insisted that $50 million was "fine" with him; Mr. Freeman's lawyer, Robert Fiske Jr., said this figure was "off the wall."  Mr. Obermaier, a former prosecutor, may have something to say about such cavalier attitudes to markets.  He has noted the Giuliani-era practice of elevating "parking" and harmless technical disclosure problems to crimes, and even to racketeering.  Mr. Obermaier told the National Law Journal in 1987 that the SEC "to some degree has abdicated its role. . . .  Criminal enforcement has superseded civil enforcement and with that there has been some distortion of the position that Congress envisioned."  Mr. Breeden might take Mr. Obermaier's hint, and make the SEC's top goal clarifying its own rules and regulations.  Insider trading, for example, remains undefined yet a crime.  Ridding the markets of fraud is an important function but one that requires laws that make it clear to both regulators and the regulated what behavior is permissible and what is not.  Mr. Breeden and Mr. Obermaier have had the chance over the past few years to see how white-collar prosecutions sometimes can raise harder issues than murder, robbery and drug cases.  Victims often are hard to find.  The laws are notoriously vague.  The accused often do not even suspect they might have committed crimes.  It can only be good for markets to have regulators and prosecutors more attuned to the need for discretion and balance in enforcing the securities laws.  Airline passengers in Europe spent $540 million worth of time last year waiting in airports because of air-traffic control problems, according to a study conducted by the airlines that valued passengers' waiting time at $21.50 an hour.  The study of Europe's clogged air-traffic control system by the 21-member Association of European Airlines also determined that air-control inefficiency causes additional costs of $500 million a year and that delays in travel cost the airlines themselves $980 million a year.  In addition, it found $400 million a year in indirect costs to the economy and $1.8 billion in other costs associated with the inefficient structure of Europe's airways, for an annual total of $4.2 billion.  The report is the second this year in what promises to be a series on the subject.  But the response it got in Europe only highlighted the political turf battles that threaten to delay any meaningful cost-reducing measures.  The report's answer to the costs it cited was to propose a pan-European air-traffic control system.  With air travel projected to double in the next 10 to 15 years and flight delays already mounting, the association says, the 22 Western European nations should group their air-traffic control systems into a holding company that would receive directly the charges airlines pay to fly across national airspace.  This holding company would be owned by the nations and by private investors such as the airlines, and it would plan, set standards for and finance air-traffic control equipment.  The report didn't say the nations should give up the sovereignty of their airspace but that they should gradually integrate their air-traffic control centers with others in Europe.  An intergovernmental agency called Eurocontrol would coordinate the governments' actions.  Western Europe currently has 22 national systems running 42 air-traffic control centers.  These centers handle 11 million flights a year at a cost of $1.6 billion.  The U.S., by comparison, has 20 centers that handle 37.5 million flights -- for about the same cost.  The association says Europe could handle its current traffic with only six centers.  The savings, it says, would exceed the $2.2 billion that national authorities are planning to spend on air-traffic control over the next few years.  The problems of Europe's system are well known.  Each country, or in some cases even an individual air-traffic control center within a country, has its own computer equipment, procedures and pay scales for controllers.  Most of the computers aren't equipped to "talk" to each other, so controllers have to rely on telephone calls.  Poor design of air lanes and lots of restricted military airspace and political one-upmanship have only made things worse.  The reception the association's study received reflected this disunity.  The current Eurocontrol organization itself, which now only groups nine European Community nations plus Turkey and Malta, criticized its plan as lacking a technological foundation.  The European Civil Aviation Conference, composed of civil aviation authorities from 22 nations, said it plans its own study.  A member of the European Parliament criticized the airlines for not lobbying their national governments to change things.  The director of air-traffic services for the Netherlands blamed the airlines for causing the delays.  He said all the carriers want to fly at exactly the same hours, on the same routes and at the same altitude.  Air-traffic controllers also were critical.  Several pointed out that even with improved, coordinated air-traffic control, there still wouldn't be enough runway capacity at many European airports.  If airspace capacity is boosted, they said, where are those additional planes going to land?  They also blamed the governments for bureaucratic delays in providing air-traffic control services and the airlines for massive increases in capacity.  Philippe Domogala, a regional vice president of the International Federation of Air-Traffic Controllers' Associations, pointed out that while an airline can decide to spend $125 million for a new jumbo jet and round up financing in a short time, getting a new air-traffic control center is quite another matter.  Denmark's new center in Copenhagen, for example, took 10 years of studies and planning followed by four years of construction and installation -- although it only cost $55 million.  With this kind of lag between demand and supply, he said, "we'll always be the loser."  Karl-Heinz Neumeister, secretary-general of the association, defended the study.  He said it wasn't intended to be a technical treatise but was meant to stir governments and institutions to act, to try to use existing resources and to take a businesslike approach to the chaos in the skies.  "It is not a technical problem," he said.  "It's only a question of political will."  {First of Two Parts}  WASHINGTON -- Just in case President Bush isn't sure how to handle his job, Congress has some specific instructions for him.  Mr. Bush's agriculture secretary is required by law to employ at least 14,177 full-time workers in the Soil Conservation Service.  His budget aides are banned from even studying the possibility of selling off agencies that market electricity produced at federal dams.  His State Department is forbidden to open any diplomatic posts in Antigua or Barbuda -- but generally barred from closing diplomatic posts anywhere else in the world.  The president can't sell military aircraft to any Central American country without informing Congress 15 days ahead of time.  But if any other country sells military aircraft to any Central American country, Mr. Bush's secretary of state has to report it to Congress.  Individually, such restrictions are but nuisances to a president.  But their proliferation, combined with such high-profile presidential failures as Ronald Reagan's defeat on Contra aid, is kindling a bitter debate about perhaps the most far-reaching issue facing Mr. Bush: the power of the presidency itself.  An increasing number of political activists, mainly conservative Republicans, are complaining that presidential power has been steadily eroded as Congress has become more involved in the details of domestic and foreign policies.  The result, conservatives assert, is a presidency too shackled to conduct a decisive foreign policy or clean up the budget mess, and they are launching a campaign to change the balance of power.  "I think it's reached the point of critical mass," says C. Boyden Gray, the White House counsel and one of the Bush administration's leading crusaders for enhancing presidential power.  The issue has flared anew several times in recent months.  Just a few weeks ago, President Bush vetoed a bill Congress passed that would have toughened an agreement the president's aides had negotiated with Japan to jointly produce the new FSX jet fighter.  By imposing new restrictions on Japan, demanding a new round of negotiations once production begins and giving congressional aides the power to audit the fighter program, the bill "conflicts with the president's proper authority under the Constitution," Mr. Bush complained.  Mr. Bush also has strongly protested -- and partially deflected -- a drive in the Senate to clamp restrictions on his administration's talks with the Palestine Liberation Organization.  And he complained when Congress acted on its own to slap tougher sanctions on China than the president chose to punish Beijing for its crackdown on pro-democracy protesters.  Though it is largely Republicans who complain about such shackles on the president, even some Democrats argue that the chief executive has become too hobbled.  "Institutionally, the office of the president must be strengthened," declares Stuart Eizenstat, who was President Carter's chief domestic policy adviser.  But this talk of enhancing presidential power sets blood boiling among Democrats in Congress, who argue that the presidency is powerful enough and invoke the ghosts of Vietnam and Watergate to bolster their position.  "It's historically absurd" to say a president's power has eroded, steams Wisconsin Rep. David Obey, chairman of the foreign-aid appropriations subcommittee.  "Anybody who says that has the institutional memory of a mouse."  This emotional debate is full of ironies.  Traditionally, it has been conservative Republicans who warned about the need to check the powers of a president lest he become dictatorial, while liberal Democrats lobbied for a strong chief executive.  Today, the two camps essentially have switched sides.  Moreover, it is surprising that the debate is flaring only a few months after the conclusion of the two-term Reagan presidency, widely thought to have been the most successful in a generation.  But Mr. Reagan's success on issues like taxes and defense in his first term was an "aberration" that masked a long-term decline in presidential authority, argues Burton Yale Pines, director of research at the Heritage Foundation, a conservative think tank.  Moreover, he contends, the failures of Mr. Reagan's second term and his weakness after the Iran-Contra scandal wiped out much of the power he enjoyed.  In many ways, the current debate over presidential power is just the latest chapter in an argument that has raged since the founding of the Republic.  The framers of the Constitution, of course, tried to institute a system of checks and balances in which the powers of the executive, legislative and judicial branches would partially offset one another.  Today, though, presidential power comes as much from a president's ability to use the White House as a platform for communicating and persuading as from the skimpy powers explicitly spelled out in the Constitution.  "Presidential power is associated with the impressions you're able to convey," says Charles Jones, a scholar at the Brookings Institution.  And that, says some observers, leaves the presidency as an institution too vulnerable to incursions from Capitol Hill.  Mr. Bush raised the issue of presidential power in his campaign, once writing a speech on the topic in longhand on a legal pad.  He has maintained that the 1973 War Powers Act, which requires that Congress approve any prolonged stationing of troops in hostile areas, is unconstitutional, and he calls for a line-item veto, which would give him the power to excise individual projects in big spending bills.  In practice, Mr. Bush is trying to maximize his power with a strategy of alternately challenging and compromising with Congress.  But aides say he regularly raises the issue of presidential power in meetings with lawmakers, and the general counsels of administration agencies recently held an unpublicized meeting to discuss presidential prerogatives.  Mr. Bush gets support from one of his predecessors, former President Gerald Ford.  He "strongly" favors repealing the War Powers Act and changing the 1974 Budget Act, which bars a president from simply refusing to spend funds appropriated by Congress.  Mr. Ford, who also served 25 years in Congress, declares: "I don't want an imperial presidency, but I don't want an imperiled president either."  There is little doubt that Congress today dictates more details of some executive branch programs than before.  For instance, a bipartisan congressional task force earlier this year reported that laws governing foreign aid now fill some 500 pages and require the president or his aides to send Congress 288 reports.  The executive branch must notify Congress of even minor changes in the cost or details of every foreign-aid project, meaning that the Agency for International Development now sends some 700 official notifications to Congress annually.  Congress now "earmarks," or designates for specific countries, some 98% of the economic-support aid it appropriates, leaving a president little room to shift funds to countries as he deems necessary.  The task force concluded that foreign-aid programs are "hamstrung."  Much of Congress's deeper involvement in executive affairs began in the days of national anger over the Vietnam War and Watergate.  Those traumas produced what Mr. Pines of the Heritage Foundation calls "a coup" in the mid-1970.  "Congress grabbed a number of important powers away from the president."  Democrats, though, think the talk about an erosion of presidential power is simply a partisan power grab by Republicans, who have controlled the White House for 16 of the last 20 years but have been frustrated for 34 years in their efforts to control Congress.  And there is a distinctly Republican tinge to the campaign to bolster presidential power.  The Heritage Foundation has started a drive to raise $250,000 for a program to battle "the Imperial Congress," and conservative columnist and former Reagan aide Patrick Buchanan argued recently that, with Democrats embarrassed by the ethics scandals surrounding former House leaders Jim Wright and Tony Coelho, "the time is at hand . . . to restore the presidency."  Rather than crippling the chief executive, many Democratic lawmakers contend, they are merely exercising their duty to oversee federal spending.  Rep. Obey argues that presidential power hit its low point in the waning days of the Nixon presidency, and that Congress's role has actually been scaled back since then.  For instance, the value of arms that a president can sell abroad without congressional approval has been increased, and the Supreme Court several years ago struck down so-called "legislative vetos," under which Congress sometimes reversed executive branch decisions.  Like the Republicans, Democrats can cite a former president for support: Jimmy Carter, who says that much of the debate is politically inspired.  Mr. Carter argues that a lot of Congress's recent activism was incited by President Reagan's efforts to circumvent or mislead lawmakers, particularly in the Iran-Contra affair.  "When a president tells Congress the truth or makes every effort to cooperate with Congress, congressional initiatives to subvert the president are unlikely or are unsuccessful," Mr. Carter says.  Indeed, sometimes Congress clamps on fetters when it appears to be the executive branch that is abusing power.  Lawmakers have been angered, for instance, to find that executive branch aides sometimes stifled programs they didn't like by simply failing to fully staff them.  So Congress writes into bills language spelling out minimum staffs the executive branch must employ in certain agencies -- declaring in an agricultural appropriations bill, for instance, that the Farmers Home Administration must have at least 12,675 full-time positions this year.  Morton Halperin, national legislative director of the American Civil Liberties Union, argues that the Iran-Contra scandal showed that "the problem still is too much presidential power" because President Reagan managed to launch a secret aid program for the Contras although Congress had passed five versions of the so-called Boland Amendment aimed to block military aid.  Presidential aides complain that lawmakers continue to devise ever more ways to affect executive branch actions.  To stop the White House from making controversial changes in programs, for instance, lawmakers now sometimes write into spending bills so-called "gag rules" that prohibit officials from even considering the changes.  One bill stipulated that the Reagan administration couldn't use appropriated funds -- meaning even the time of paid government workers -- to study selling the Naval Petroleum Reserve in California, which presidential budgeteers think is outdated and expendable.  White House aides say the problem of congressional activism may be most acute in the area of foreign policy, where it robs the president of the one thing he most needs to conduct affairs in the 20th century: flexibility.  And often intervention comes not just from congressional Democrats, but from the very Republican conservatives who claim they want to strengthen the White House.  An example was the House's recent vote to impose tougher economic sanctions on China than Mr. Bush wanted following the brutal Tiananmen Square crackdown.  The vote to force the president's hand was 418-to-0, and one of those voting in favor was Rep. Newt Gingrich, the fiery Republican whip who regularly excoriates colleagues for grabbing presidential power.  The uncertainty raised by restrictions on presidential freedom on foreign policy sometimes freezes the executive branch, officials say.  The Bush administration recently wanted to help Peru fight drugs by building an airstrip in a remote valley so troops could be ferried in to eradicate crops and interdict drug shipments.  There were American bulldozers in the area capable of doing the work.  But they had been sent for a road project, not an airstrip, and Congress has ordered that funds be used only for the projects designated in foreign-aid legislation.  The result: Work on the airstrip was delayed for about two months, until executive branch lawyers decided that the bulldozers could be used -- if the State Department, which was handling the drug program, paid rent for them to AID, the agency of the State Department that was handling the road program.  Similarly, when Panamanian President Eric Arturo Delvalle broke from strongman Manuel Noriega last year and tried to overthrow him, the Reagan administration wanted to send Mr. Delvalle a radio transmitter so he could broadcast messages from hiding to rally anti-Noriega forces.  Virtually everyone in the U.S. favored helping Mr. Delvalle.  Yet the shipment was blocked when some Central Intelligence Agency officials and administration lawyers raised red flags.  Why?  Because Mr. Delvalle was still technically the president of Panama, and officials feared that sending the radio would violate a congressional ban on providing any aid to Panama's government.  When ABC Sports made its presentation to network affiliates at the Capital Cities/ABC Inc. annual convention in June, the proceedings began with all the glitz and tackiness of a Las Vegas floor show.  A miniblimp circled the cavernous ballroom of the Century Plaza hotel in Los Angeles to celebrate the 20th season of "Monday Night Football," which begins today.  Hank Williams Jr. appeared on stage and sang the broadcast's new theme song, a retooled version of "All My Rowdy Friends."  With its rah-rah pitch to affiliates and a huge promotional and advertising campaign aimed at viewers, ABC aims to pump some excitement -- and ratings -- back into "Monday Night Football."  Though it is prime time's second-longest-running program, after CBS's "60 Minutes," and though it continues to attract a huge audience and big advertisers, its ratings have plunged 28% since 1985 in the key demographic group, men 25 to 54 years old.  Although the decline stems partly from a general loss of network viewers to cable and home video in recent years, "Monday Night Football" also has slipped in the network standings, from third when it premiered in 1970 to 16th last year.  At the same time, ABC's costs for the program have climbed to about $130 million a year from $8.5 million the first season.  Despite the ratings decline, ABC has raised ad rates about 8% this season to between $225,000 and $250,000 for a 30-second commercial, one of the highest amounts in prime time.  Ad executives say the network can charge such high rates because the games remain one of the most efficient ways to reach a large male audience.  "It's still a great buy," says John Sisk, senior vice president and director of network negotiating at the ad agency J. Walter Thompson U.S.A. Inc.  "Most of prime time does not have strong male appeal."  Still, the competition is unusually stiff this year, particularly from third place CBS Inc. and newcomer Fox Broadcasting, a unit of News Corp. CBS's Monday night lineup includes "Murphy Brown" and "Designing Women," which appeal to women.  And Fox is launching its Monday schedule by placing a ratings winner, "21 Jump Street," at 8 p.m. and hoping much of its audience stays with Fox for a new science-fiction series, "Alien Nation," at 9 p.m., when "Monday Night Football" begins.  "We thought this was the best way to go up against ABC's football package," says Peter Chernin, president of the Fox Broadcasting Entertainment Group.  He explains that "'21 Jump Street' does very well with young males, and we believe 'Alien Nation' has broad appeal."  Moreover, with ESPN Inc., the all-sports cable network 80%-owned by ABC, and a raft of new regional cable sports networks, "there is now so much sports on television, that 'Monday Night Football' may be a phenomenon that may have outlived its time," says Howard Rosenberg, television critic for the Los Angeles Times.  "I find it less and less interesting."  Even the union representing the football players agrees.  "There is a glut of sports," says M.J. Duberstein, director of research at the National Football League Players Association.  "It's no longer special."  ABC executives dismiss any suggestion that "Monday Night Football" is on the way out, but they acknowledge that it needs more extensive marketing than ever before.  "The on-air promotion schedule is the most aggressive it's ever been," says Tom Remiszewski, director of advertising and promotion at ABC Sports.  In the past week, the network has run a spot promoting tonight's kickoff, playing up the 20th-season theme and featuring Mr. Williams singing the line, "Are you ready for some football?"  The network is also participating in game-day luncheon parties to be held in 11 cities that are sites of Monday night games this fall.  The parties, underwritten by Epson America Inc., will feature former NFL players invited by ABC Sports, as well as the network's game announcers, when possible.  "We've never hosted so many parties," Mr. Remiszewski says.  ABC may also get a boost from last week's issue of Sports Illustrated, which ran an eight-page advertising supplement on the history of "Monday Night Football."  The supplement carried three full-page ads, two from auto makers and one from ABC.  The network also is changing its halftime show to include viewer participation, in an attempt to hold on to its audience through halftime and into the second halves of games.  One show will ask viewers to vote on their favorite all-time players through telephone polls.  And ABC soon will market a "Monday Night Football" videocassette featuring highlights from 20 years of Monday night games.  ABC is also trying to recover some of the broad appeal that "Monday Night Football" had in earlier years.  Last month, the network ran a 10-second spot promoting a Monday night exhibition game between the Cincinnati Bengals and the New Orleans Saints in which honky-tonk jazz music played and the announcer said, "The Boomer is Bayou-bound," referring to Cincinnati quarterback "Boomer" Esiason.  The spot had a "come to the party" tone, rather than stressing the game itself.  "They are wisely using the 20th season as a springboard to increase the audience and broaden the exposure," says Jim Spence, a former ABC Sports senior vice president who is now president of the consulting firm Sports Television International Inc.  When "Monday Night Football" started, Roone Arledge, then president of ABC Sports, set out to appeal to more than football fans by assembling a trio of announcers who balanced expertise with controversy and comedy.  Viewers would often tune in just to hear the bantering between Howard Cosell and Don Meredith, and to hear Mr. Cosell's caustic comments.  Mr. Cosell left after the 1983 season, however, and ABC fumbled during the next several seasons with its announcing choices, which included former football players O.J. Simpson and Joe Namath.  "It's a much straighter sporting event than when it started," says Mr. Arledge, now president of ABC News.  "The presentation is now much more jock-oriented."  ABC Sports officials say they've already made a change that will quash such criticism.  To help revive interest among a wider audience, ABC last year installed Dan Dierdorf, a former lineman for the St. Louis Cardinals, as a commentator.  Mr. Dierdorf's manner in the booth is similar to that of John Madden, the enormously successful CBS commentator.  Although ratings continued to drop last year, ABC executives say they think the improved announcing team will help ratings this year.  Despite its troubles, ABC executives say "Monday Night Football" will be around for a while yet.  "For two decades, people have taken their best shots at us," says Donald Lewin, vice president of production for ABC Sports "We were told we couldn't compete against Carol Burnett or shows like 'Rhoda.' Well, we're still here, and they aren't."  The easiest way to get a handle on the "sweeping" Americans With Disabilities Act that the Senate just passed is to consider this: Just days before the vote, in the middle of war-on-drugs week, the bill would have made it illegal for employers to discriminate against people who use crack and other drugs.  That got removed.  Also at the last minute, the Senate struck out language that would have encouraged people to file lawsuits on the grounds that they were about to be discriminated against.  The Americans With Disabilities Act, which breezed through the Senate Thursday, is loopy legislation in a good cause.  It starts with the premise that 43 million people are handicapped, about one-sixth of the nation.  The bill even declares that a person who is merely "regarded as having an impairment" should be considered disabled.  That assertion prompted Senator Bill Armstrong to insist upon an amendment specifically stating that despite the vague wording, pedophiles, transsexuals, voyeurs and kleptomaniacs cannot be considered disabled and protected by the bill.  There probably is a bevy of similar groups, beyond Senator Armstrong's imagination, who will be included under this definition, and who will use the act to file lawsuits.  Like so much recent federal lawmaking, the bill is a swamp of imprecise language; it will mostly benefit lawyers who will cash in on the litigation that will force judges to, in effect, write the real law.  Examples of vagueness abound.  If the bill passes, as expected, owners of any new or altered buildings will be compelled to make "reasonable" accommodations for the disabled.  The bill doesn't explain what "reasonable" entails.  The bill includes three separate definitions of discrimination, which seem to conflict.  The most interesting declares that discrimination occurs when a business provides "a service, program, activity, benefit, job or other opportunity that is less effective than that provided to others."  Let judges figure out what "effective" means.  The bill says a company needn't incur "undue hardship" in meeting the standards.  Judging from the few places in which the bill is specific, the "undue hardship" provision could be pretty hard.  For example, the bill does compel bus companies to install wheelchair lifts and toilets for the handicapped on inter-city buses.  According to the industry, that will cost between $200 million and $666 million.  Industries tend to exaggerate the costs of prospective laws, but even the lower figure is much higher than the entire industry's net annual profits.  In other places where the bill is specific, it takes additional measures to encourage litigation.  Plaintiffs will be able to sue not only for the usual monetary damages, but also for punitive damages ranging from $50,000 to $100,000.  It is very rare for a civil-rights act to allow punitive damages.  In this case, the punitive damages will foster suits, discourage settlements and arm plaintiffs as they negotiate for settlements.  Crafted primarily by Democratic Senators Kennedy and Harkin, the bill is based on the presumption that most Americans are hostile to the disabled and need this sort of blunt coercion.  According to this thinking, it is the innate hardheartedness of society that causes the hardships suffered by the disabled; society needs to be redesigned.  This philosophy dovetails nicely with the prevailing idea that Senator Kennedy brings to other civil-rights issues, namely that the U.S. is fundamentally discriminatory.  Not surprisingly, Ralph Neas, the affirmative-action spokesman whose specialty is blocking the Bush administration's appointments, is a vocal supporter of the bill.  It is surprising that George Bush and the White House inner circle would ally themselves with this crabby philosophy.  They enthusiastically support the bill, even in its earlier, more monstrous forms.  Tom Harkin is one thing, but why would this White House so willingly dump such direct costs and a litigation nightmare on small and often struggling companies?  We're certain that most Americans are instinctively sympathetic to the disabled's problems, and are willing to make a good-faith effort to enable them to live full lives.  They don't need to be sledgehammered into decency.  There is, finally, one positive thing that can be said about this legislation.  As usual, the original bill would have exempted Congress from the coverage of any new law for the disabled.  But late Thursday night Senator Charles Grassley rose to propose that the bill apply to Congress as well; his amendment carried.  The odds are that the amendment will be struck down in the House or in conference.  But this alone is a historic occasion, the first time Congress has seriously entertained the idea that it too should live under the vague legal monstrosities it creates and imposes on everyone else.  Maybe someone should try to put Congress on the receiving end of the act's first lawsuit.  Campeau Corp. said it will submit a proposed financial restructuring to its board of directors tomorrow to reduce the company's debt and boost working capital.  The real-estate and retailing concern confirmed reports that it plans to sell its Bloomingdale's department-store chain and said Bloomingdale's Chairman and Chief Executive Marvin S. Traub has expressed an interest in leading a management buy-out of the company.  Campeau also said it is negotiating a $250 million loan from Olympia & York Developments Ltd., a Toronto real estate developer that owns approximately 25% of Campeau.  Campeau said the loan, which would be convertible into Campeau stock, is to "meet liquidity needs projected to begin Sept. 14" at its two retail subsidiaries, Federated Department Stores and Allied Stores.  A Campeau spokesman declined to provide other details of the restructuring.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange Friday, Campeau shares fell C$3.375 to close at C$18.50.  Trading had been halted Thursday after rumors of the Bloomingdale's sale drove up the price of the stock.  Campeau officials declined to be interviewed on the financial situation at Federated and Allied, but industry executives said the two retail divisions need additional funds to pay for Christmas inventory.  In addition, Campeau has a loan of about $400 million left over from its acquisition of Federated last year that converts into exchange notes and warrants this week unless the loan is refinanced by Campeau.  "The problem isn't insolvency, it's liquidity," said one finance executive.  In an interview, Mr. Traub declined to comment on what he might bid for Bloomingdale's or where he hopes to obtain financing.  He denied rumors circulating on Seventh Avenue that he is teaming up with designer Ralph Lauren and cosmetics maker Estee Lauder.  "We are just deciding who is part of the group of investors," Mr. Traub said.  "In a week we will announce the financial advisers and the attorneys we will be working with.  It will take most of the fall season to work things out."  Analysts and industry executives said they expect a lively auction for Bloomingdale's, and Mr. Traub conceded that his own effort isn't guaranteed of success.  Analysts estimated the 17-store chain, whose operations are primarily in Northeast, could fetch between $1.2 billion -- the store's sales last year -- to $2 billion or more.  Possible buyers include any number of U.S. and foreign retailers, but so far Mr. Traub appears to be the only confirmed bidder.  The Campeau announcement surprised many analysts and industry executives because the company previously has said it had no plans to sell Bloomingdale's.  When Campeau purchased the chain last year through its acquisition of Federated, Campeau Chairman Robert Campeau vowed to expand Bloomingdale's across the country.  In addition, Mr. Campeau and other company executives in recent months have made upbeat remarks about Campeau's finances, indicating the company's cash flow is more than sufficient to cover its interest expenses.  In its statement Friday, Campeau said it is selling Bloomingdale's because its divestiture would cause "the least disruption" to Campeau's remaining operations and "it offers the best opportunity to most effectively reduce Campeau's leverage with a single transaction."  Campeau has about $10 billion in debt.  Despite the sharp drop in Campeau shares Friday, some analysts viewed the Bloomingdale's sale positively and prices of Federated and Allied bonds rose.  The proposed sale is "good news in so far that a crown jewel can be used to reduce leverage in the system," said Mariel Clemensen, manager, high-yield research at Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette Securities Corp.  One sign of serious problems at Federated and Allied would be delays in bill payments, but several apparel makers said Friday that they are being paid promptly.  "Our business this fall is way up with Federated," said Tom Puls, president of Donna Rico Inc.  "Our factoring company watches very closely for late payments.  If they suspected anything was wrong, they'd clamp down right away."  Campeau is evidently willing to pay a big price for Olympia & York's assistance.  Although the terms of a loan haven't been agreed on, analysts note the loan could substantially increase Olympia & York's interest in Campeau.  Based on prior agreements between the two companies, Ross Cowan, an analyst at Levesque Beaubien Inc. in Toronto, predicts a loan could create an additional 10 million Campeau shares.  That would increase Olympia & York's holding to 35% fully diluted while decreasing Mr. Campeau's stake below 50%, Mr. Cowan estimated.  Another question is the status of Campeau's efforts to refinance $1.2 billion in debt incurred as part of the Federated acquisition.  At the company's annual meeting in late July, Campeau said it expected to receive commitments within 30 days for $1.2 billion in mortgage financing to refinance the debt.  But the company so far hasn't announced receipt of the commitments.  On Friday, a Campeau spokeswoman said the company is proceeding with plans to obtain the financing.  The loan is needed partly to refinance $800 million in debt due in January 1990.  Also at the meeting, James Zimmerman, chairman and chief executive of Campeau's retailing divisions, said comparable-store sales are expected to increase 3% to 4% in fiscal 1990.  Mr. Zimmerman conceded that, although those increases are no better than inflation, if Campeau only does that well for the rest of its life, the company will make "bucket-loads of money."  At the annual meeting, Mr. Campeau confidently predicted cash flow would considerably exceed interest costs this year.  And at a meeting late last month with Jerome Chazen, chairman of Liz Claiborne Inc., Mr. Campeau angrily dismissed a question from Mr. Chazen about Campeau's financial health.  "He got very upset," Mr. Chazen recalls, adding that Mr. Campeau said business was very good and that the stores were paying their bills on time.  ---  Jeffrey A. Trachtenberg in New York contributed to this article.  Economists expect some backpedaling in this week's trade and inflation data but nothing drastic enough to change recently favorable trends.  The July trade deficit is likely to widen to about $9 billion from June's unusually narrow $8.17 billion, according to the consensus view.  And August's producer price index is expected to be unchanged to slightly higher after two months of declines.  Both reports are due Friday, along with August industrial production and capacity utilization.  August retail sales, due Thursday, are expected to be robust, thanks partly to strong if statistically murky auto sales.  Economists have been expecting slower progress in narrowing the trade gap, particularly after June's shrinkage.  "Getting the first couple of billions was easier; further improvement is going to be tough sledding," said Neal Soss, chief economist at First Boston Corp. in New York.  Still, he and others said, if the July deficit comes in as expected, it would signify continued progress on the trade gap.  A jump in oil imports and weaker exports were blamed for curbing progress on the deficit.  Oil also plays an important role in the outlook for August's producer price index.  After two months of declines, the index is expected to be flat.  Nonetheless, softer oil prices, which have helped hold the index down in recent months, continue to play a moderating role.  Philip Braverman, executive director at Bank of New York Securities, expects producer prices to inch up by 0.1%.  But even that small rise "may be a disappointment for people who expect deflation to continue," he said.  Excluding the volatile food and energy sectors, the index is expected to rise 0.3%, according to MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  But Stuart Hoffman, senior economist at PNC Financial Corp., Pittsburgh, says a flat producer price index will be interpreted as "the third good PPI number" after two surprisingly big rises earlier in the year.  The index fell 0.4% in July and 0.1% in June.  Auto sales are expected to help fatten August retail sales, although by just how much is uncertain because of manufacturers' rebates.  When reporting numbers to the government, auto dealerships don't subtract the rebates.  But they do subtract dealer incentives, according to a Census Bureau official.  This means a $12,000 car with a $1,000 manufacturer rebate and a $300 dealer incentive would be reported by the dealer as an $11,700 sale rather than a $10,700 sale.  Do the dealers follow these instructions to the letter?  "It's kind of a mixed bag," the official said.  Auto sales make up a big chunk of retail sales -- nearly 20% in June.  August retail sales are expected to be up 1%; but excluding autos, sales are expected to be up only 0.4%, according to MMS.  In July, overall retail sales rose 0.9%.  Back-to-school apparel buying is also likely to boost the retail sales report.  The auto industry also helped keep industrial production and capacity utilization strong in August.  Economists expect output increased by about 0.2%, a level that would keep operating capacity unchanged at 83.6%.  Separately, the National Association of Accountants said more than half the corporate controllers it surveyed don't expect a recession in 1990 -- their rosiest view on the economy in 12 months.  But the controllers are scaling back their 1989 internal profit forecasts to reflect a decline in sales and earnings.  Asked to rank the top three factors that will affect the economy over the next six months, the controllers listed interest rates, inflation and the federal budget deficit.  And 61% of the controllers said inflation will be more than 5% over the next 12 months.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Sept. 8  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money Supply  @ M1 Week ended  @ Aug. 28 (in billions) $777.2 - $2.4  @ M2 Week ended  @ Aug. 28 (in billions) $3,137.2 - $1.1  @ M3 Week ended  @ Aug. 28 (in billions) $4,005.4 - $5.0  @ Auto sales  @ August total vs. year-ago 881,188 +10.4%  @ Consumer credit  @ July (in billions) $699.2 + $0.3  @ New jobless claims  @ Week ended Aug. 26 318,000 + 0.6%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @ Auto sales (Wed.)  @ Early September  @ Retail sales (Thurs.)  @ August  @ Money supply (Thurs.)  @ New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @ Trade deficit (Fri.)  @ July  @ Producer price index (Fri.)  @ August  @ Industrial production (Fri.)  @ August  @ Capacity utilization (Fri.)  @ August  The selling of imported herbal medicines laced with dangerous substances is a more widespread problem in the U.S. than thought, according to the Centers for Disease Control.  Long believed to be centered mainly in communities of Asian and Latin American immigrants, the distribution of such concoctions has reached some far-flung areas, the CDC reported.  In the small west Texas community of Dalhart, for example, authorities are tracing a distribution network for a drug smuggled from Hong Kong.  The drug, called chuifong tokuwan in Hong Kong, was sold in Texas as a pain killer in a package labeled: "The Miracle Herb -- Mother Nature's Finest."  But the substance actually contained a variety of prescription drugs as well as potentially harmful lead and cadmium.  "The fact that we're reporting this in a rural part of Texas points out that this is a widespread problem," says Roy T. Ing, a physician and epidemiologist at the CDC.  Chuifong tokuwan, which was banned by the Food and Drug Administration in 1978, is just one of many purported herbal concoctions sold illicitly in the U.S.  Some of the others contain such prescription drugs as anabolic steroids, antibiotics and even narcotics, the CDC says.  Nobody knows the full extent of the problem, but a look at the chuifong tokuwan case provides a glimpse.  A year ago, Texas health authorities who were investigating a citizen complaint found the drug being sold in a Dalhart restaurant.  Tracing the distribution network, they decided the drug was smuggled into the U.S. with tea and other food shipments.  And they also found that it was being sold widely in Texas, and in Oklahoma and New Mexico.  Texas authorities confiscated what they could but the product still is being sold in some places, says Dennis Baker, director of the food and drug division of the Texas Health Department.  "People in New Mexico got it by buying from friends," says Millicent Eidson, an environmental epidemiologist with the New Mexico Health and Environment Department.  Chuifong tokuwan may have alleviated symptoms in some patients but it also had some disturbing side effects, the CDC says.  In Texas, users who allowed themselves to be examined had average cadmium levels three times greater than that of a sample of people who hadn't taken the drug, the CDC said.  High levels of cadmium can damage the kidneys.  "Our message is that people should be very careful about taking anything, especially people who have some chronic illness," says the CDC's Dr. Ing.  Wall Street analysts generally applauded Avon Products Inc.'s announcement Friday that the company is "exploring the possibility" of selling its two fragrance subsidiaries.  James Preston, Avon's chairman and chief executive officer, said in a statement that the company hasn't made a final decision to sell, but has retained Morgan Stanley & Co. to explore the possibility.  Avon acquired Giorgio Beverly Hills and Parfums Stern in 1987 for about $345 million.  During the first six months of this year, four of its perfumes -- Giorgio Beverly Hills, Red from Giorgio Beverly Hills, Oscar de la Renta, and Uninhibited by Cher -- were among the 10 top selling fragrances in the country.  Mr. Preston said in the statement that if Avon realized any gains on the sale it would apply the revenue toward reducing Avon's $1 billion debt.  The two fragrance subsidiaries will generate about $326 million in sales this year against about $228 million last year.  Earnings before interest and taxes last year amounted to $18 million; this year, those earnings are expected to be $36 million.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Avon closed unchanged Friday at $36.25 a share.  "The impact near term would be positive, but I don't think we're going to see a sale unless Avon can get its price," said Jeffrey Ashenberg, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. "Operating profits from those businesses aren't meaningful because the cost of product introduction is so high.  Avon can make more from investing the funds from the sales or by reducing its debt load."  Diana Temple, an analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc., noted that in July, Unilever United States Inc., agreed to pay Minnetonka Corp. a shade more than $300 million for Minnetonka's Calvin Klein fragrance business.  "The bottom line here is that the fragrance business just doesn't fit with Avon's door-to-door selling business," said Andrew Shore, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. "Assuming the fragrance business is worth what Avon paid for it, the company is better off using the money to reduce debt.  Mr. Shore, as well as several other analysts, speculated that Avon decided to investigate the possible sale of its fragrance lines following a private meeting Mr. Preston had late last month with Minneapolis investor Irwin Jacobs.  In early August, Mr. Jacobs offered $41-a-share for all of Avon's stock and said he intended to sell both of Avon's fragrance subsidiaries.  His bid was rejected by Avon's board.  An Avon spokesman disagreed with that speculation, however, saying, "The company has considered selling that business since early this year."  Possible buyers may well include Unilever United States, which has gained a major share of the department store business with such brands as Eternity, Obsession, Chloe, Elizabeth Taylor's Passion, Lagerfeld and Fendi.  "The department store fragrance business is a lot less fragmented today than it was several years ago, and Avon doesn't have the resources to buy more brands," said Robert Renck, Jr., an analyst with R.L. Renck & Co. "Unilever has made it strategically much more difficult for Avon to compete there."  A spokesman for Unilever United States said it isn't company policy to comment on market rumors.  However, he added, "Our objective is to build our position in the fine fragrance and cosmetic business through a combination of internal growth and acquisition."  Other possible buyers, analysts said, include Shiseido Cosmetics of America Ltd., which is owned by Tokyo-based Shiseido Co. Namio Wanikawa, president of Shiseido Cosmetics was in Japan Friday and couldn't be reached for comment.  Friday, September 8, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.53 16 3/4 - 14.23  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 29.07 23 5/8 - 18.73  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.49 7 5/8 - 10.19  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.97 8 5/8 - 21.38  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 21.27 17 7/8 - 19.49  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.78 12 7/8 + 31.65  @ General Amer Invest NYSE 22.32 18 1/4 - 18.23  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.46 95 7/8 - 7.98  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.90 13 3/4 - 18.64  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.99 8 1/4 - 17.42  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 18.02 14 1/2 - 19.53  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.48 9 3/8 - 18.34  @ Quest For Value Cap NYSE 17.94 12 5/8 - 29.63  @ Quest For Value Inco NYSE 11.74 12 3/4 + 8.60  @ Royce Value Trust NYSE 11.31 9 3/4 - 13.79  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 12.08 10 3/8 - 14.11  @ Source Capital NYSE 43.21 42 - 2.80  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 29.61 24 1/4 - 18.10  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 22.08 18 - 18.48  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.69 11 5/8 - 0.56  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.76 8 1/4 - 5.82  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.08 10 + 10.13  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.46 9 3/4 + 3.07  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.56 9 7/8 + 3.29  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.30 9 + 8.43  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Seasn OTC 5.82 5 1/4 - 9.79  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.21 9 1/4 + 0.43  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.65 9 5/8 - 0.26  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.51 22 - 10.24  @ ASA Ltd NYSE bc54.67 42 5/8 - 22.03  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 14.31 13 - 9.15  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.78 18 3/4 - 13.91  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 63.28 59 7/8 - 5.38  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be zz z  @ Brazil NYSE 18.02 10 3/4 - 40.34  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.68 53 7/8 - 49.67  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.58 11 7/8 + 23.96  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.57 19 1/4 - 14.71  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b4.94 41 5/16 - 0.05  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.97 10 1/4 - 20.97  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.64 10 1/2 - 16.93  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 10.99 10 3/8 - 5.60  @ Duff&Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.47 8 1/4 - 2.60  @ Ellsw Conv Gr&Inc AMEX 9.01 7 5/8 - 15.37  @ Engex AMEX 13.99 10 - 28.52  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 21.03 20 1/2 - 2.52  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.97 10 3/8 - 5.42  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.91 10 7/8 - 8.69  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.43 10 3/8 - 0.53  @ France Fund NYSE b12.53 12 - 4.23  @ Gabelli Equity Trust NYSE 14.65 13 7/8 - 5.29  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.96 9 1/8 - 8.38  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE b10.26 8 3/8 - 18.37  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.53 10 - 13.27  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b49.25 48 3/8 - 1.78  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.62 11 3/8 - 9.87  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f14.03 17 1/8 + 22.06  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.58 10 1/2 - 9.33  @ Korea Fund NYSE 19.20 40 1/4 +109.64  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 12.02 11 5/8 - 3.29  @ Meeschaert G & C MWSE 8.12 7 7/8 - 3.02  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b12.39 12 - 3.15  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.87 9 1/8 - 16.05  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.90 10 1/2 + 6.06  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 30.62 26 - 15.09  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.48 10 1/8 - 11.80  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.67 8 5/8 - 0.52  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 10.01 9 - 10.09  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 15.79 15 1/4 - 3.42  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 15.79 13 1/8 - 16.88  @ Spain Fund NYSE 14.25 19 1/2 + 36.84  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b41.63 38 3/4 - 6.92  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b9.15 8 3/8 - 8.47  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b12.99 12 1/8 - 6.66  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.93 9 5/8 - 11.94  @ Thai Fund NYSE 17.16 19 5/8 + 14.36  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 12.27 10 1/4 - 16.46  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.52 14 5/8 + 0.72  a-Ex-dividend. b-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. d-NAV reflects $1.54 per share for taxes. e-In Canadian Dollars. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  This is in response to your Aug. 25 article and others in recent weeks on East German emigration.  My own regular and prolonged sojourns in that country for professional as well as family reasons reveal many shortages: There is no crime of consequence, no poverty, no drug abuse, no illiteracy, no pornography, no prostitution.  No doubt 10% of the population, wooed by Western television or memories of pre-war times, finds these shortages onerous.  They should leave -- good riddance.  No one who lives and works in a Western European capital or visits the U.S. can doubt the catastrophic decline of civilization, which, in these places, accompanies the growth of money richness.  Heaven knows, the pages of The Wall Street Journal report it candidly enough, week in and week out.  If this be virtue, then surely East Germany is a most wicked land]  To judge, however, by the pathetic complaints of the mass of Western citizens who are inundated by the numbing (your word) crime, drugs, illiteracy and social disintegration that dominate their lives more and more, it seems as if the shortages from which the East Germans suffer might be welcome.  But this would be naughty to suggest.  In passing: Anyone who can find a shortage of consumer goods in East Germany is lying.  Only in France and Italy are food and produce more plentiful and better than in East Germany.  Many simple and reliable consumer goods that long ago disappeared in the West (unprofitable) are cheap and abundant in East Germany.  The rich cultural opportunity for average citizens that once characterized at least Northern Europe and the main cities of Southern Europe is thriving in East Germany, and is all but dead in the expensive West.  Another wickedness] With all these dangerous shortcomings, no wonder the West has been trying for 45 years to ignore, subvert and suppress the "second" half of Germany.  David Backhaus  Paris  Last October, as other computer-disk-drive companies were laying off hundreds of employees, MiniScribe Corp. announced its 13th consecutive record-breaking quarter.  This time, however, the surge in sales sent a shiver of apprehension through MiniScribe's board.  "The balance sheet was scary," says William Hambrecht, one of the directors.  What worried Mr. Hambrecht was a sudden, three-month run-up in receivables to $173 million from $109 million, a 59% increase.  Inventories were similarly bloated, swelling to $141 million from $93 million -- a dangerous development because disk drives can become obsolete from one quarter to the next.  Seven months later, the portents that had worried Mr. Hambrecht generated grim headlines: MiniScribe's spectacular sales gain had been fabricated.  In fact, the company acknowledged, it didn't know whether it could produce accurate financial statements for the prior three years.  The news shocked Wall Street, whose rosy financial forecasts helped quintuple MiniScribe's stock price in just two years.  After all, this was a company that, by all appearances, had risen from the dead under the direction of Q.T. Wiles, then the chairman of Hambrecht & Quist, a highly respected venture-capital firm that in 1985 had injected $20 million into MiniScribe.  Mr. Wiles's proven ability to resurrect ailing companies was already so renowned that he was known as "Dr.  Fix-It."  "It looked for two or three years like Q.T. was a miracle worker -- at least from the outside," says Jim Porter, president of Disk/Trend Inc., a California-based market-research firm.  Instead, what was supposed to be the crowning achievement of a storied career has become an epitaph.  Mr. Wiles has resigned from MiniScribe and from half a dozen other companies, including Hambrecht & Quist, and lives in near-seclusion.  He repeatedly declined to be interviewed for this article; his lawyers, instead, supplied a 40-page summary of a seven-hour interview in which Mr. Wiles responded to questions from investigators hired by the company's outside directors.  Virtually all of MiniScribe's top management has been dismissed, and layoffs have shrunk world-wide employment to 5,700 from a peak of 8,350 a year ago.  MiniScribe might have to write off as much as $200 million in bad inventory and uncollectable receivables.  And an audit team composed of outside directors, under the scrutiny of the Securities and Exchange Commission, is investigating MiniScribe's failure to provide reliable financial statements to public investors.  The audit report, expected to be released this week, is unlikely to disclose more than a summary of the team's findings.  Yet interviews with current and former executives, employees, competitors, suppliers and industry analysts depict a corporation run amok.  Mr. Wiles's unrealistic sales targets and abusive management style created a pressure cooker that drove managers to cook the books or perish.  And cook they did -- booking shipments as sales, manipulating reserves and simply fabricating figures -- to maintain the illusion of unbounded growth even after the industry was hit by a severe slump.  MiniScribe isn't the only high-tech company to indulge in questionable practices.  Datapoint Corp. almost went out of business seven years ago when its practice of booking shipments as sales got out of hand, and the computer-networking concern is still struggling to return to profitability.  More recently, a highflying California company, Ashton-Tate Corp., has been sued in a federal court in Los Angeles by shareholders accusing it of similar bookkeeping games; the company has denied any wrongdoing.  And DSC Communications Corp., of Dallas, signed a consent agreement with the SEC this year in which it agreed to restate 1984 and 1985 results that allegedly recognized sales prematurely.  But the temptation to fudge numbers is greatest when times are hardest, and when Quentin Thomas Wiles arrived at MiniScribe in mid-1985, times were rock-hard.  The disk-drive maker had just lost its biggest customer, International Business Machines Corp., which decided to make its own drives.  And with the personal-computer industry then slumping, MiniScribe was drowning in red ink.  Dr. Fix-It's prescription was to slice off a fifth of the work force and overhaul the company from top to bottom, chopping it into separate divisions grouped around different products or research efforts.  Each division had its own staff and each division manager set his own budget, sales quotas, incentives and work rules.  The idea, Mr. Wiles has said, was to create accountability.  In practice, MiniScribe became a chaotic Babel of 20 or more minicompanies under one corporate umbrella.  "There was constant change, constant reorganization," says an employee who held 20 different positions at MiniScribe in 6 1/2 years.  Mr. Wiles also turned up the heat under his lieutenants.  Four times a year, he would summon as many as a hundred MiniScribe employees to Palm Springs for several days of intense "dash meetings," at which participants were force-fed his idiosyncratic management philosophy.  At one of the first such meetings he attended, says a former division manager, Mr. Wiles demanded that two controllers stand, "and then he fired them on the spot, saying to everyone, 'That's just to show everyone I'm in control of the company.'"  At each dash meeting, division managers had to present and defend their "dash books," Mr. Wiles's term for business plans that had to conform to a set formula.  Invariably, say former participants, Mr. Wiles would find such plans deficient and would berate their authors in front of their peers.  A former controller says Mr. Wiles would throw, kick and rip dash books that displeased him, showering his intimidated audience with paper while yelling, "Why don't you understand this?  Why can't you understand how to do this?"  Mr. Wiles, according to his attorneys, is "fairly autocratic and very demanding of the people who work for him."  Even that understates the case.  In fact, Mr. Wiles's behavior drove away some of his most senior engineers and cast a pall over those who remained.  John Squires, a MiniScribe founder, says he quit after his first dash meeting because he couldn't abide Mr. Wiles's "SWAT team" management style.  Mr. Wiles was so intimidating, adds a former manager, that he and the executives he brought with him became known as "the VC," derived from "venture capitalists" but alluding to the Viet Cong.  Moreover, Mr. Wiles made no bones about his plans for the company.  "He used to say that the faster he could sell MiniScribe, the better," recalls the former manager.  Then, something changed.  In late 1986, the manager says, Mr. Wiles started singing a different song at the dash meetings: "All of a sudden he was saying, 'I no longer want to be remembered as a turnaround artist.  I want to be remembered as the man who made MiniScribe a billion-dollar company.'" Sales objectives became the company's driving force, a point Mr. Wiles underscored in the interview with investigators, when he acknowledged that financial results became "the sole determinant" of whether bonuses were awarded.  "Basically," a former MiniScribe accountant says, "Q.T. was saying, 'This is the number we want to hit first quarter, second quarter, third quarter and so on,' and it was amazing to see how close they could get to the number they wanted to hit."  Hitting the number became a companywide obsession.  Although many high-tech manufacturers accelerate shipments at the end of a quarter to boost sales -- a practice known as "stuffing the channel" -- MiniScribe went several steps beyond that.  On one occasion, an analyst relates, it shipped more than twice as many disk drives to a computer manufacturer as had been ordered; a former MiniScribe sales manager says the excess shipment was worth about $9 million.  MiniScribe later said it had shipped the excess drives by mistake.  The extras were returned -- but by then MiniScribe had posted a sale at the higher number.  In his interview with investigators, Mr. Wiles said he wasn't aware of any such incidents.  Other accounting maneuvers, starting as far back as 1986, involved shipments of disk drives from MiniScribe's factory in Singapore.  Most shipments went by air freight, but a squeeze on air-cargo space toward the end of each quarter would force some shipments onto cargo ships -- which required up to two weeks for transit.  On several occasions, says a former division manager, MiniScribe executives looking to raise sales changed purchase orders to show that a customer took title to a shipment in Singapore, when, in fact, title wouldn't change until the drives were delivered in the U.S.  In a more dramatic version of this ruse, according to a former accountant, MiniScribe executives tried to persuade an audit team that 1986 year-end results should book as sales the cargo on a freighter that they contended had set sail in late December.  The audit team declined to do so.  Eventually, the cargo and the freighter, which didn't exist, were simply forgotten.  MiniScribe executives also found other ways to inflate sales figures.  One was to manipulate reserves, the accounting entries designed to offset unrecognized losses, such as returns of defective merchandise or bad debts.  Mr. Wiles acknowledged to investigators that creating adequate reserves "never did sufficiently take root in the MiniScribe organization."  Despite this awareness, Mr. Wiles failed to take corrective action and said that the last time he looked closely at the issue was in late 1986.  The problem of inadequate reserves grew so great that private analysts began noticing it in 1988.  Despite $177 million in receivables, one says, MiniScribe was booking less than 1% in reserves; the rest of the industry, meanwhile, had reserves ranging from 4% to 10%.  To avoid booking losses on returns in excess of its skimpy reserves, defective drives would be tossed onto a "dog pile" and booked as inventory, according to Greg Fortune, a disk-drive failure-analysis technician.  Eventually, the dog-pile drives would be shipped out again to new customers, continuing the cycle.  Returns of defective merchandise ran as high as 15% in some divisions, Mr. Fortune estimates.  At a time of strong market demand, such ploys enabled MiniScribe to seem to grow almost exponentially, posting sales of $185 million in 1986 and $362 million in 1987.  In early 1988, Mr. Wiles was confidently forecasting a $660 million year, and he held fast to his rosy forecast even as disk-drive sales started slipping industrywide in late spring and nosedived in the autumn.  Meanwhile, Mr. Wiles increased the pressure on his managers.  "Everyone wanted to do good by Q.T.," says a customer representative, describing how division reports would be doctored as they rose from one bureaucratic level to the next.  Before long, the accounting gimmickry became increasingly brazen.  Division managers were told to "force the numbers," says a former marketing manager; he tells of one division controller who quit when ordered by a vice president to lie about financial results.  In this tense atmosphere, wild rumors abounded.  Workers whispered that bricks were being shipped just so a division could claim to have met its quota.  Others joked that unwanted disk drives were being shipped and returned so often that they had to be repackaged because the boxes wore out.  Employees also joked about shipments to "account BW," an acronym for "big warehouse."  But that wasn't just a joke.  MiniScribe established several warehouses around the country and in Canada as "just-in-time" suppliers for distributors.  The largest and most abused was in Los Angeles, where it served as a supply point for Cal-Abco Inc., a major electronics-parts distributor.  Yair Barzilay, a Cal-Abco partner, says his company wasn't invoiced until it received a shipment from the warehouse.  MiniScribe, however, was booking shipments to the warehouse as sales.  And because the "just-in-time" operation wasn't under Cal-Abco's control, the number of disk drives shipped was at MiniScribe's discretion.  MiniScribe won't say how many unordered disk drives went to the warehouse, but a former employee puts their value at $80 million to $100 million.  By last fall, MiniScribe's suppliers began to sense that something was terribly amiss.  Domain Technology, a supplier of the coated aluminum disks on which disk drives store information, says MiniScribe started falling behind in its payments; then, its orders dropped.  Eventually, says Domain's president, David Pearce, MiniScribe was returning virtually all Domain shipments, saying they were defective -- a contention that he vigorously denies.  "We took a $7 million hit on that," he says -- a jolt that helped push Domain into bankruptcy proceedings in June.  Wall Street, which had so eagerly embraced Mr. Wiles's previous forecasts, also began to smell trouble.  "The company was talking a really bullish game," says John Rossi, an analyst at Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  "But I really couldn't find any significant customers other than Compaq."  In fact, several major anticipated orders on which Mr. Wiles had been pinning his hopes -- principally from Apple Computer and Digital Equipment Corp. -- fell through in the fall.  So, by the time MiniScribe announced its 1988 results in mid-February, they simply confirmed the growing suspicions.  The company reported a fourth-quarter loss of $14.6 million and a drop in net income for the year to $25.8 million from $31.1 million despite a 66% increase in sales to $362.5 million -- on paper, that is.  Scarcely a week later, Mr. Wiles abruptly resigned, telling board members that the company's problems were far more pervasive than he had realized.  Friends say he was devastated by what his exhaustive, three-week examination of the company revealed.  "He reacted like he'd been blindsided," Mr. Hambrecht says.  Adds a former marketing manager: "It was almost like a fraternity party, with everybody huddling together to figure out how to keep the house dad from knowing what was going on."  The house dad may not have wanted to know.  After investigators showed him several memos that had been distributed at a meeting he attended, Mr. Wiles acknowledged that they "indicated the opposite of what he had previously been told."  He denied having seen them and noted that if he had seen one particular memo, "he would have certainly read it as saying 'somebody's cheating.'"  Investors say they, too, have been cheated, having seen the value of their stockholdings tumble from a high of $15 a share to less than $3.  A dozen shareholder lawsuits have been filed in federal court in Denver in recent months, charging, in the words of the first of them, that MiniScribe "engineered phony 'sales'" to artificially inflate its stock to benefit insiders.  In 1988, MiniScribe officers and directors sold 350,000 shares of company stock.  The suits also charge, among other things, that Coopers & Lybrand, the company's auditor, "participated in the conspiracy" by "falsely" certifying the company's financial statements.  Hambrecht & Quist also was named as a defendant.  Both Hambrecht & Quist and Coopers & Lybrand deny any wrongdoing.  Robert Sparacino, the chairman of the audit committee of outside directors that has been delving into the allegations of wrongdoing, declines to say what the panel has found.  All he does say is that "the incidents that occurred were not trivial."  At the height of the Vietnam War protest movement, the Reserve Officers' Training Corps was hounded off some college campuses and besieged at others.  Several ROTC offices were torched by protesters.  Some closed after enrollment plummeted.  In those days, some students who needed the ROTC scholarship money felt such peer pressure that they hid their military uniforms in their backpacks on the way to and from their dormitories.  Lt. Col. William Hausman, who heads the Army ROTC program at Fresno State University, remembers that as a graduate student in the early 1970s at Stanford University, he felt compelled to wear his hair long and strip the military stickers off his car just to get along.  But in recent years, public attitudes about ROTC have done an about-face.  The stigma has subsided, and ROTC programs are regaining respectability.  More students are enrolling and completing the programs as standards have been raised and more corporations have made a point of hiring ROTC graduates.  "Twenty years ago, many students might have joined a protest movement," says Col. Hausman.  "Now they're joining ROTC."  ROTC enrollment peaked at about 181,000 cadets in the 1962-63 academic year as many students sought to avoid being drafted and sent to Vietnam as enlisted men.  By 1974, the year the U.S. withdrew from Vietnam and the Selective Service draft was ended, ROTC enrollment had plunged to 39,346.  A resurgence began in 1976 when women were first commissioned as officers.  Enrollment rose steadily in the early 1980s with increased scholarship funds and has sustained a level of about 62,000 for the past few years.  Joseph Hebert III, a Navy ROTC instructor at Villanova University from 1971 to 1974, remembers how rough the anti-war protesters made his job.  "We couldn't get on campus with our uniforms on," he says.  "Protesters would throw eggs and rocks at us.  We held our meetings at fraternity houses."  Fifteen years later, Villanova's Navy ROTC program is ranked among the top five in the country, based on academic and military testing.  The school's recent graduates include Mary Kay McCue and Rebecca Rehill, both Navy reconnaissance pilots.  Scholastic Aptitude Test scores of Villanova midshipmen average 1180.  All 224 cadets who began the program last fall had freshman grade point averages above 3.0, compared with an average of 2.7 in 1985.  "There is a heavy emphasis on grades that wasn't present a few years ago," says Capt. Thomas P. Corley, an Army ROTC instructor at LaSalle University in Philadelphia.  Adds Maj. Gen. Robert E. Wagner, commander of the Army Cadet Command at Fort Monroe, Va., which oversees ROTC programs nationwide.  "The young people we are producing now are the best I've ever seen, academically and physically, in the 32 years I've been in the Army.  They are truly motivated."  To make the cadets more marketable to corporations, ROTC programs now require heavier academic loads, including advanced mathematics and computer training.  Cadets also are steeped in leadership and management skills courses, such as problem solving.  In an effort to spread the word about its ROTC improvements, the Army retained the New York-based firms of Young & Rubicam and Burson-Marsteller to develop a two-year advertising and publicity campaign.  The results appear substantial.  A Burson-Marsteller survey last month of about 6,000 corporate managers showed positive ratings for ROTC by more than 90% of respondents.  Fox-Morris Associates Inc., an employment consulting firm, says corporate requests for ROTC graduates have risen 15% in the past year alone.  Fox-Morris has placed more than 300 ROTC graduates with big companies since the beginning of 1989, compared with about 180 graduates in all of 1984.  Personnel executives at General Motors Corp., Johnson & Johnson, Procter & Gamble Co. and other companies say they believe ROTC graduates make better hiring prospects than average college graduates.  Moreover, they consider cadets generally brighter, better disciplined and more mature, and find that they tend to advance faster in corporate careers.  ROTC "puts young men and women on a fast track faster," says Douglas M. Reid, a senior vice president of Xerox Corp.  The contrast is apparent on campus, too.  Unlike their predecessors in the Vietnam era, many ROTC students today can be seen wearing their uniforms and boots -- not just to military classes, but all day long.  Explains a cadet at LaSalle: "We like the way we look."  ---  @ The Fall and Rise of ROTC  @ ACADEMIC CADETS CADETS  @ YEAR ENROLLED COMMISSIONED  @ 1962-63 181,700 N.A.  @ 1973-74 39,400 5,367  @ 1975-76 41,000 4,567  @ 1979-80 45,000 6,343  @ 1986-87 60,000 7,809  @ 1988-89 63,000 8,176  @ N.A.=Not available  Pantera's Corp. said it received a waiver from its secured lenders extending a $4.6 million interest and principal payment until Sept. 29.  The payment was due Aug. 1.  Troubled Pantera's, which owns and operates the Pizza Inn restaurant chain, has been trying for several months to restructure about $36 million in debt and to raise about $25 million in new equity.  Pantera's said that as a condition to its waiver, it can't pay interest due Sept. 1 on its $6.9 million in 10% convertible subordinated debentures due 2003.  The company said it has 30 days to make the interest payment before the debentures could be declared in default and become immediately due.  Gold Fields of South Africa Ltd. announced a 1.03-billion-rand ($365.1 million) rights issue of new ordinary shares at 75 rand a share.  Chairman Robin Plumbridge said in a statement that the issue would substantially increase the company's liquidity and enable it to finance commitments to existing projects and new opportunities in the mining sector.  The rights offer, the second-largest in the Johannesburg Stock Exchange's history, will be made to holders of ordinary shares and compulsorily convertible redeemable preference shares registered on Sept. 15.  On the local stock market, Gold Fields of South Africa closed Friday at 85.50 rand, up 1.50 rand.  Top officers at Par Pharmaceutical Inc. blamed its previously admitted unlawful activities on only two employees while others helped falsify and destroy documents "to hide other illegal manufacturing practices," a congressional subcommittee charged.  The House Energy and Commerce subcommittee, investigating improprieties in the generic drug industry, made the allegation against Par President Perry Levine and his son, Jeffrey M. Levine, executive vice president, in a letter to a Baltimore federal judge.  The judge will sentence Par and its Quad Pharmaceuticals subsidiary on Wednesday on one count of paying an illegal gratuity to a Food and Drug Administration official.  Two other top officers of the Spring Valley, N.Y., generic drug maker have pleaded guilty to providing illegal gratuities to FDA employees and are awaiting sentencing.  Perry Levine has said he would retire once a successor has been found.  Jeffrey Levine is on leave from the board.  Neither has been charged with any crime.  Par officials didn't return phone calls.  Par will be the subject of a subcommittee hearing today.  The panel has been looking into payments of cash and gifts to FDA employees to speed the drug approval process of some companies while disadvantaging others.  In a briefing memorandum attached to the letter to federal Judge John R. Hargrove, the subcommittee said Par's FDA applications to make generic drugs "are rife with problems such as material false statements, systematic destruction of unfavorable test results concerning both products under development and those already marketed, and material alterations in chemical formulations between bioequivalance tested and marketed products."  Such revelations raise serious questions about the chemical makeup, safety and efficacy of generic drugs.  Both the FDA and the generic industry trade association have said they aren't aware of any unsafe generic drugs sold to consumers.  Part of the panel hearing will focus on the FDA's role.  Top compliance officials at the FDA's generic division said in a recent interview they didn't begin to investigate Par's manufacturing facilities until April.  However, the company had disclosed in October 1988 that it was the target of a federal grand jury probe led by the U.S. attorney's office in Baltimore.  That year-old investigation was triggered by evidence gathered by Mylan Laboratories Inc., a Pittsburgh generic drug maker.  Also a chemist in the FDA's antibiotic drug review branch noted in an October 1985 memo to Dr. Marvin Seife, then director of the generic drug review division, that batches of two injectable drugs produced by Par's Quad unit "weren't produced according to the manufacturing instructions in the applications.  "Since Quad Pharmaceuticals has submitted almost 60 applications . . . in a very short time period, it is possible that drug product may have been prepared for other applications in a similar manner," the chemist wrote.  His memo was an exhibit in an earlier subcommittee hearing.  Some analysts have long voiced suspicions about Quad because in only its second year of existence it received approvals for more products than any other company in the history of the FDA.  In addition, Dr. Seife recently testified that he suspected in 1986 that Par and Quad were among a handful of companies that got favorable treatment from review chemists.  Specifically, Dr. Seife noted a "close relationship" between Dilip Shah, a former FDA employee who became president and chief executive officer of Quad and an FDA generic supervisor, Charles Chang, who has resigned from the agency after pleading guilty to two counts of interstate travel in aid of racketeering in connection with another generic drug maker.  Dr. Seife, who has declined to be interviewed, testified that he tried to steer drug applications from suspect companies away from the reviewer Mr. Chang.  Mr. Shah pleaded guilty to providing about $1,000 to Mr. Chang.  Walter Kletch, an ex-FDA review chemist, pleaded guilty to accepting two $500 gift certificates from Mr. Shah.  Ashok Patel, a former senior vice president at Par, also pleaded guilty to giving Mr. Chang about $500.  David Brancato, another former FDA chemist, also pleaded guilty to receiving cash gratuities from Messrs.  Shah and Patel.  Messrs.  Shah and Patel each face a maximum penalty of two years in jail and a $250,000 fine.  And Par and its Quad unit each face as much as $500,000 in fines.  The panel's focus on the safety of drugs may hinge on FDA inspections of Quad this past January and November 1988 that disclosed a host of problems at the maker of injectable products.  A synopsis of the inspections was made an exhibit at an earlier panel hearing.  Some highlights:  -- Six children complained of abdominal toxicity after using Quad's vincristine sulfate, used in cancer chemotherapy.  Five of the children previously were treated with a similar medication from another manufacturer and didn't suffer any adverse effects.  Quad failed to report the complaint as required by the FDA.  -- In May 11, 1987, Quad's sales director wrote a misleading letter to as many as 4,000 doctors "in an attempt to capitalize on the shortage" of a tuberculosis vaccine produced by a competitor.  The letter didn't distinguish between the two products.  Patients could have been harmed if doctors didn't realize the difference.  -- An FDA compliance official advised the Veterans Administration marketing center on June 30, 1986, that the agency couldn't recommend purchase of a drug called metoclopramide hcl, used to relieve severe heartburn.  The official said Quad had marketed the product before the patent on the brand-name product expired.  -- The same FDA official on June 10, 1986, recommended to Veterans Administration that it reject a cancer drug called methotrexate sodium because Quad failed to obtain either new drug approval or generic drug approval to sell the medicine.  -- Several other Quad employees provided false statements during inspections.  Regulators proposed a minimum capital standard for national banks that also would clear up confusion over capital requirements for savings and loan institutions.  The comptroller of the currency proposed that national banks be required to hold at least $3 in capital for each $100 in assets.  The 3% capital-to-assets ratio would come as a relief to the thrift industry, which, under the recent thrift bailout law, must meet the same capital standards as national banks.  Regulators have discussed setting the capital floor as high as 6%.  Separately, the Resolution Trust Corp., which was established by the new law to sell or liquidate insolvent S&Ls, announced it intends to sell five more of the nation's biggest and most troubled thrifts.  The five have combined assets of $9.3 billion.  Nearly 900 S&Ls, with $500 billion in assets, currently wouldn't meet the proposed 3% minimum.  Almost 500 more thrifts, with another $500 billion in assets, couldn't meet a 6% test.  Institutions that can't meet the standard will be required to devise plans for increasing their capital to the required level.  The Federal National Mortgage Association plans to help thrifts decide how best to meet the new requirements.  The comptroller's action will make life easier for thrift regulators, who have been wrestling with confusion stemming from the new thrift law.  The law calls for a 3% capital minimum for thrifts, but it also says regulators must make thrift standards "no less stringent" than levels for national banks by the end of this year.  One reason for the thrift regulators' uncertainty has been that the comptroller is in the process of changing from the current, uniform, 6% minimum capital requirement for national banks to a system that sets minimum capital levels on a case-by-case basis according to the riskiness of banks' assets.  The comptroller's proposed 3% floor would assure that under the new approach, even banks with very low-risk assets couldn't hold less than 3% in capital.  The comptroller's proposed capital floor, which could be approved in December but wouldn't take effect until the end of next year, should enable thrift regulators to propose a similar standard in the next several weeks, as required under the bailout.  "It clarifies things a lot," said Jonathan Fiechter, a top official of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, which will become part of the Treasury Department and will be renamed the Office of Thrift Supervision in a few weeks.  "Now we don't have to guess what the comptroller will propose."  However, the proposal leaves unresolved a dispute between Comptroller Robert Clarke, who has backed the 3% level, and William Seidman, the chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., who believes that the minimum should be 6% to deter risky lending.  Under Mr. Clarke's proposal, only common stock and some preferred stock would count toward the 3% minimum.  In recent weeks, he and Mr. Seidman have discussed a compromise 4.5% minimum-capital level, in which less tangible forms of capital could be counted toward meeting the extra 1.5%, but Mr. Clarke stayed with his plan, saying that was "more complicated than it needs to be."  Mr. Seidman, responding to the comptroller's plan, said 90% of the country's 13,000 banks could reduce their capital with a 3% minimum.  That could "substantially increase the risk of loss to the deposit insurance funds," he said.  Mr. Clarke, who said he had the support of top officials at the Treasury Department and the Federal Reserve, argues that a 6% minimum would be higher than most banks' risk-based requirements -- and thus would eliminate the incentive for bankers to hold lower-risk assets.  The disagreement raises the possibility that bank capital standards will lose the uniformity various regulators have maintained in recent years.  Mr. Clarke regulates 4,300 national banks with about two-thirds of the banking industry's $3 trillion in assets.  Mr. Seidman's agency insures deposits at all banks, but sets regulations only for the 7,000 state-chartered banks that don't belong to the Federal Reserve System.  The comptroller's office said about 800 national and state-chartered banks would have to raise capital to meet the 3% or risk-based minimum capital standards.  The five thrifts on which the RTC opened bidding are University Federal Savings Association, Houston, $2.6 billion in assets; Hill Financial Savings Association, Red Hill, Pa., $2.6 billion in assets; Pacific Savings Bank, Costa Mesa, Calif., $1 billion in assets; Peoples Heritage Savings, Salina, Kan., $1.8 billion in assets; and Freedom Savings & Loan Association, Tampa, Fla., $1 billion in assets.  The size of the thrifts, the severity of their losses and the eroding values of their loans mean that the transactions will be costly for the government, which is acting as their receiver.  The initial outlay of cash by the RTC could be as high as $8 billion to $10 billion before it recoups some of the cost through sales of assets.  Earlier, the RTC announced it wanted to sell five other large thrifts, and negotiations are continuing for those.  The RTC initially said it sought to sell the thrifts via simple transactions, in which investors would contribute 6% new equity and the RTC would make single lump-sum payments to compensate the investors for the bad assets left on the books by the institutions' former managers.  But the RTC and investors making bids say the new agency now is entertaining offers for the thrifts' deposits alone, some portion of the assets or entire institutions.  Many potential investors have been skeptical that the RTC would be able to arrange simple, whole-institution sales without even greater government cash infusions, due to the uncertain values of the sick S&Ls.  "It could require more cash than they may have," said Gerard Smith, an official of a $300 million Salomon Brothers fund established to invest in the failed thrifts.  ---  Paulette Thomas also contributed to this article.  Rohr Industries Inc. saw its stock price backfire a bit Friday after a disappointing earnings performance earlier in the week.  Shares of the Chula Vista, Calif., maker of aircraft-engine parts tumbled $1.625 each to finish at $29.625 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Volume was a hefty 287,900 shares.  The company, as a matter of policy, won't comment on its stock activity.  But it noted after posting fiscal-fourth-quarter results that it is experiencing pressure on profit margins because of new program introduction and, on military projects, revised requirements ordered mid-contract by the Pentagon.  Moreover, Rohr said, it is trying to cope with added costs from parts shortages and higher interest expense on debt incurred to finance its rapid growth.  For the quarter ended July 31, sales rose 20% to $304.3 million from $254 million a year ago.  But net income fell 9.8% to $8.3 million, or 47 cents a share, from $9.2 million, or 52 cents a share.  Many analysts expected the company to best last year's mark.  "It's obviously a setback," said Michael Rosen, of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "This was a company that was supposed to exhibit improvement quarter over quarter."  Mr. Rosen, who was anticipating Rohr's net to be closer to 60 cents a share, noted that its operating margin was 6.3%, down from 7.8% during the preceding three months -- and that was with a lower tax rate this time around.  Still, the company seems well positioned to rebound.  Wolfgang Demisch, of UBS Securities, New York, said the demand for Rohr products -- mostly nacelles, the streamlined enclosures housing jet engines -- "is way ahead of anybody's expectations."  Backlog is a record $2.2 billion, up 38% from last year, as the commercial-airliner market continues to boom.  "When you're running as fast as you can like Rohr, even the smallest obstacles become larger," Mr. Demisch said.  "I don't see why the company should be hit too severely" by last week's poor earnings showing.  In fact, he added, the drop in Rohr's stock could provide a good opportunity for investors hoping to gobble up shares at what may be a bargain price.  Rohr, after all, is taking steps to regain Wall Street's favor.  For instance, on the F-14 fighter, Rohr in the fourth quarter filed claims and raised price proposals to recover costs associated with engineering changes directed by the Navy.  Rohr makes about 25% of the airframe on the F-14, which is assembled by Grumman Corp.  "Our primary focus now is to streamline our operations by eliminating disruption so that they are more efficient and thus more profitable while maintaining high delivery volumes," Harry W. Todd, Rohr's chairman and chief executive officer, said in a statement.  For the year, Rohr reported net of $33.5 million, or $1.90 a share, up 3.1% from $32.5 million, or $1.85 a share, a year ago.  Sales totaled $1.04 billion, up 15% from $907.1 million in the prior year.  Standard Register Co., a maker of business forms, is betting that improved customer service will allow it to prosper in an industry that has substantial overcapacity, John K. Darragh, president and chief executive, said.  "Business is slow," mirroring the general economy, Mr. Darragh said in an interview, and the company is having difficulty passing along price increases.  "In an industry operating at less than 80% of capacity, pricing is going to be very competitive."  Standard Register expects third-quarter profit "to at least equal" the $5.7 million, or 19 cents a share, earned a year earlier, he said.  The third quarter is normally the weakest because of vacations.  Profits were even weaker than usual in the 1988 third quarter because of rapid cost increases.  Revenue in 1989 will be up 5% to 7% from last year's $675.2 million, "but it will be virtually all in price" increases, Mr. Darragh said.  "We have a shot" at exceeding 1988 net income of $38.1 million, or $1.28 a share, he said.  "It will be difficult if the economic growth rate in the second half is only 1.5%."  However, if the economy grows at a more robust 2.5% to 3% Standard Register is likely to top 1988 profits, he added.  Standard Register supplies forms to such a wide variety of customers that it tends to be a good business barometer, the executive said.  First-half net income slipped to $18 million, or 61 cents a share, from $18.4 million, or 62 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $347.7 million from $325.8 million.  Paper prices have decreased slightly lately, Mr. Darragh said.  However, industry margins are depressed because companies were unable to pass through paper price increases amounting to about 28% over the previous 20 months, he said.  Standard Register hopes to gain market share "in a very fragmented industry" with a new advertising program emphasizing customer service, Mr. Darragh said.  While he is confident the new program will bring in additional volume, it remains to be seen whether Standard Register can provide the promised level of customer service and still generate satisfactory profit margins, he said.  There's only modest opportunity for sales growth in the forms industry other than through acquisitions or increasing market share, he said.  Electronic data interchange among companies, such as direct ordering through a computer hookup, is beginning to slow the growth of the forms business.  "So far the impact hasn't been significant," he said, but by the end of 1990 electronic data interchange will have taken away $600 million of business from the $8.5 billion-a-year industry.  To improve service, Standard Register this year began using electronic data interchange with major customers.  It also has linked its own sales offices, forms-printing plants and warehouses in a computerized network allowing the company to promise faster delivery, Mr. Darragh said.  Orders received before noon are shipped that day and orders received in the afternoon go out the next day, he said.  The forms industry has been slow to use computers to simplify ordering and speed shipments, Mr. Darragh conceded.  "Our industry didn't want to get rid of purchase orders" and other paper work, he said.  Abbott Laboratories said its board approved the purchase of as many as 10 million shares, or about 4.5%, of the company's common stock.  Robert A. Schoellhorn, chairman and chief executive officer, said in a news release that the medical-products concern is "extremely optimistic about Abbott's continued growth," and added that the company thinks the buy-back "represents a sound investment and wise use of our resources."  Abbott also said it expects 1989 earnings will top last year's record $752 million, or $3.33 a share, and 1989 sales will exceed the year-ago $4.94 billion, which was also a record.  A spokeswoman declined to provide a more precise projection.  In the year of the Alar apple and the cyanide grape, consumers are showing growing concern about the safety of the food they buy.  In the latest sign that marketers are catching on, 1,200 supermarkets plan to stop selling produce treated with known or probable cancer-causing pesticides.  The ban, to be phased in by 1995, is part of "Pesticide Reduction Goals," to be announced at news conferences today in Washington, D.C., Sacramento, Calif., and Phoenix, Ariz.  The project is being orchestrated by the National Toxics Campaign Fund, an environmental group.  Other steps include requiring all produce suppliers to identify the pest-control substances they use, sharply limiting the acceptable levels of pesticides known to cause nerve damage, and carrying organically grown produce whenever possible.  With total sales of about $8 billion a year, the stores account for only a small percentage of national supermarket sales of almost $300 billion.  But the move is part of a broader effort to use product safety as a marketing tool, and the anti-pesticide pledge is only the latest example of safety-related marketing.  Last week, three chemical companies said they would scale back sales of a popular fungicide, ethylene bisdithiocarbamate, or EBDC, which is one of the chemicals to be banned by the supermarkets.  Last month, several supermarket chains decided against selling milk and other dairy products from cows treated with a genetically engineered bovine growth hormone until the Food and Drug Administration completes safety studies.  "People have realized that there is a hypersensitivity on the part of consumers to a lot of health-related concerns," says Bill Bishop, the president of a food-industry consulting firm in Chicago.  The supermarkets involved -- Bread & Circus Wholefood Supermarkets in Massachusetts, Petrini Meat Inc. in San Rafael, Calif., Raley's in Sacramento, Abco Markets in Phoenix and Provigo Inc. in Montreal -- seem sure to come under attack from food producers.  In a news conference today, four food-industry trade associations are expected to criticize the pesticide project for needlessly alarming consumers.  Moreover, actions such as those by the supermarket chains don't involve positive marketing steps as much as damage control, says Mr. Bishop, the consultant.  After reports earlier this year linked the apple pesticide Alar to cancer risks in children, supermarkets had to act "to head off a flap," he says.  Some began posting signs and placing ads assuring customers that their produce was Alar-free.  "It was a way to manage negative publicity, but I don't think it produced a lot of positive marketing benefits," Mr. Bishop says.  Companies can run into trouble even with positive marketing.  Recently, sales of oatmeal have soared in response to claims about its cholesterol-reducing effects.  But last week, Texas sued Quaker Oats Co., charging that its oatmeal and oat bran ads falsely claim that eating the cereal cuts cholesterol and the risk of heart attacks.  The FDA is preparing to send a letter to several companies raising questions about psyllium, an ingredient that is supposed to help reduce cholesterol.  Promoters of the supermarket pesticide project see their plan as a positive appeal to consumer concerns.  In addition to EBDC, the chemicals to be banned include alachlor, the most widely used field-crop herbicide, and captan, which is used on a variety of fruits and vegetables.  President Reagan did not have a Machiavellian bone in his body, but if he had, one can imagine him smiling smugly as he signed the bill that so generously increased the insurance of Medicare patients against hospital costs for catastrophic illness.  It was an ideal piece of legislation from a conservative point of view, and this for three reasons:  First, it would benefit the elderly who are, from a conservative point of view, the ideal recipients of welfare-state benefits.  They are our parents or grandparents, after all, to whom we feel a natural obligation.  Moreover, they are beyond all social pathologies, are not likely to be corrupted by welfare entitlements, and in any case would not be corrupted for very long.  Second, the expense of this bill -- which would balloon in the "out years" -- would pre-empt other, less desirable welfare-state expenditures.  Third, the bill was to be financed, at least in part, by a progressive tax on the elderly, in the form of an increase in Medicare premiums, scaling up with income.  This was a neat little time bomb that liberals, who admire progressive taxation, would be quite blind to.  That bomb has now exploded.  The opposition to the tax increase is so intense that the Democratic congressional leaders are rattled.  They are also exceedingly annoyed, and, openly or covertly, are accusing the middle-class elderly of selfish ingratitude.  They point out that some 60% of the elderly, with low incomes, will pay no increase at all.  And the progressive tax on the remaining 40% is not all that severe, averaging just a few hundred dollars for households in the $40,000 to $50,000 bracket.  Surely they can afford it, can't they?  But what anyone can or cannot afford turns out to be a very subjective matter, with little connection to tables of income statistics.  One would have thought that congressmen, who complain of the difficulty of making ends meet on an income of $89,500 a year -- which puts them deep into the top 5% of the population -- could appreciate this.  But the egalitarian and redistributive ethos is so strong in contemporary liberalism that these same congressmen are astonished at this mini-tax rebellion they now confront.  The basic sociological, psychological and political truth is that it is very expensive to lead a "decent" middle-class existence these days.  Taxes -- federal income tax, state income tax, property tax, sales tax, et al. -- probably absorb a good 40% of the income of a $50,000 senior-citizen household.  True, such households don't have the expenses involved in a working life, or in raising and educating a family.  But they may have assumed other expenses that represent gratifying commitments -- like helping their children buy a home, or helping their grandchildren get a college education.  Grown children often resent having to help support their parents, but elderly parents with a "comfortable" income positively enjoy helping their children and grandchildren.  The ego-satisfaction is immense -- and, besides, they worked all of their lives for this money, didn't they?  Even a few hundred dollars, at the margin, is not such a trivial sum to surrender.  And if, instead of making gifts to their children, they enjoy an annual summer cruise -- well, for such postponed pleasures it is now or never.  Just how this situation will work itself out remains to be seen.  Presumably the Democratic Congress will reduce the tax while arbitrarily revising downward the estimated cost of the program.  The administration will oppose such a reduction, on the ground of fiscal responsibility, but one cannot really see Republicans in Congress endorsing such opposition, or President Bush actually vetoing such legislation.  To focus on these tactical maneuvers, however, is to miss the main point: We are witnessing the end game of welfare-state politics.  It's not simply that fiscal constraints are taking their toll.  More important, welfare-state politics is being drained of its political energy.  There is no way to finance new, ambitious programs without taxing the middle classes -- which, in current circumstances, means households with incomes in the $40,000 to $100,000 bracket. (In New York City where private schools are deemed to be necessary $150,000 is still experienced as a middle-class income.) These middle classes are not, statistically, a majority of the population, whose median household income is $32,000.  But they are the politically articulate and politically active majority.  And, much as they may casually and blandly approve of new welfare-state programs in the abstract, they are now making it as clear as can be that, beneficiaries or no, they don't want to pay for them.  To be sure, the interest groups behind an ever-expanding welfare state still exist and have a disproportionate specific gravity within the Democratic Party.  These include the so-called "helping professions" -- social workers, nurses, nutritionists, psychologists, teachers, etc. -- who stand to benefit directly.  Their major and strongest ally in this entrepreneurial activity, however, has been the trade unions, which used to be able to mobilize working-class support for this essentially professional-middle-class agenda.  But no more.  The unions are weaker today than at any time in the post-World War II era, and are steadily growing weaker.  They are losing battle after battle, on the industrial front and the legislative front.  As a result, the welfare-state coalition, though influential, is no longer the political force it once was.  Nor is there any reason to think it will regain its lost virility.  Neither Democrats nor Republicans have as yet come to grips with this sea change.  The Democrats (most of them, anyhow) persist in believing that an expansion of the welfare state broadens and strengthens their political base.  Republicans persist in believing that fiscal responsibility must take priority over welfare-state entitlements, and that the electorate will, in the long run, appreciate this posture.  But just watch the congressional races next year.  Except in a few places -- New York and San Francisco, for example -- candidates will not be making a fuss about either the need for new government programs to enhance the general welfare or the fiscal difficulty in financing such programs.  One will have to eavesdrop on smaller, select meetings to hear earnest rhetoric about spending more or less money on AIDS, public housing, welfare families, or the homeless.  To the constituency as a whole, the favorite themes will be drugs, crime, environmentalism, the American flag and "unfair" Japanese competition.  Education will also be receiving much attention, but the issue will be defined more in terms of "educational reform" than simply spending more money.  In this end game of the welfare state, Republicans have an advantage.  But they nullify it with a narrow-minded focus on "fiscal responsibility."  A dose of Machiavellian shrewdness would do them a world of good in coping with those welfare-state issues that will remain on the agenda.  A case in point is provided by the current legislative proposals involving day care.  The Democrats, inevitably, insist on a federally funded program of day-care centers to serve primarily working women.  This creates jobs for their "helping professions," expands the federal regulatory bureaucracy, and pleases the militant feminists who regard house-bound mothers as dropouts from the feminist crusade.  The Bush administration, in response, has come up with a simple increase in the tax exemption for dependent children, plus a "rebate" for those with incomes so low that they pay no taxes.  Let the family then make its own provision for day care.  The administration's proposal is superior from every point of view.  It addresses an inequity -- the fact that inflation, over the years, has radically depreciated the tax allowance for dependent children.  It does not involve the creation of a new regulatory bureaucracy.  Above all, it does not discriminate against those mothers -- and they are about half of the total -- who prefer to stay home with their preschoolers.  But it is not gaining the popular support it ought to have, even in Congress, because its terms are insufficiently generous.  Another few billion dollars a year would make the proposal irresistible, but the Office of Management and Budget and the Treasury insist that "we can't afford it."  So some modified version of the Democratic bill is more likely to pass, and the money that OMB and the Treasury have saved on paper will be spent, in fact, in the wrong way.  And the Democrats will claim a political victory, which the media will duly celebrate.  Another, more remote, case in point is some version of national health insurance.  Already the corporate world is signaling its receptivity to this traditional, "progressive" idea.  But it is not the progressive idea that will have triumphed with the advent of such a program.  It will be medical technology, whose steady advance has resulted in an equally steady increase in medical costs of some 10% to 15% a year.  Corporate medical insurance cannot cope with this phenomenon.  Only government can slow down the growth of this financial burden by coercing -- yes, coercing -- consumers into accepting inferior service, and doctors and hospitals into accepting lower fees.  Only government can ration medical technology.  Only government can coerce the legal profession into retreating on the medical malpractice front.  It would make sense, therefore, for a conservative administration to do some positive thinking on this issue.  If it's going to happen, why not take the credit?  But any such suggestion is dismissed as unthinkable.  It's too bad that Republicans are so inept at playing this end game of the welfare state.  The merits of pre-emptive spending seem destined to remain forever incomprehensible to the conservative cast of mind.  The result is that we shall end up with a large, more inefficient, more intrusive, and probably more corrupt welfare state than we should have.  ---  Mr. Kristol, an American Enterprise Institute fellow, co-edits The Public Interest and publishes The National Interest.  Prospect Group Inc. withdrew its $78 million hostile tender offer for troubled Recognition Equipment Corp. after failing to obtain permanent financing for its offer.  Recognition's stock tumbled $1.375 a share on the news Friday, closing at $6.50 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Before Prospect's difficulties in arranging financing arose in July, shares of Recognition, which makes a document image-processing system, had traded above Prospect's $11-a-share tender offer.  Prospect, a small leveraged buy-out firm that has interests in child-care services, a railroad and a cutlery maker, cited confidentiality agreements that it had signed in declining to comment on why it was unable to line up financing.  In announcing an unsolicited $12.75-a-share offer of cash and notes for Recognition last December, Prospect said that the First National Bank of Boston, flagship of Bank of Boston Corp., had agreed to arrange $75 million of permanent financing for the offer.  The offer was later reduced to $11 a share.  But in July, Prospect, which owns 14.1% of Irving, Texas-based Recognition, said that the bank had withdrawn its offer of permanent financing but still would provide $46 million in bridge financing for the tender offer.  Prospect didn't say what it would do with its Recognition holdings.  Peter Enderlin, a securities analyst with Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co., said that he believes the failure to arrange financing says more about Bank of Boston's own credit troubles than about any hidden problems at Recognition.  In the latest quarter, Recognition reported a $3.9 million loss that placed it in violation of certain covenants in existing agreements with lenders.  Recognition has obtained waivers from its lenders and is renegotiating terms.  For the nine months, Recognition posted a loss of $4.4 million, wider than $3.8 million a year ago; the year earlier loss included a $3.6 million charge from a change in accounting for spare parts and a $168,000 operating loss.  Revenue fell 5% to $188 million from $198 million.  Despite all this, Mr. Enderlin said, Recognition has a strong financial position, proprietary technology and solid marketing.  He estimates the company's book value is $10 a share.  In Irving, Recognition declined to comment on whether it continues to talk with potential suitors.  To explain why he is spending a week in four aging stadiums, stock trader Dolph Andrews plucks a phrase from author John Updike's essay on slugger Ted Williams.  He is searching, he says, for that special emotion that "crowds the throat with joy."  For Mr. Andrews and 26 other baseball lovers on a Smithsonian Institution-sponsored tour of historic ballparks, this is the ultimate sentimental journey -- a trip back to a time when a strike was a pitched ball, not a labor dispute, and the game was played in sun-kissed parks with lush lawns, not covered canyons with plastic grass.  It is also an opportunity to pay their respects to some beloved dinosaurs that may soon be replaced by more profitable modern sports factories.  Of the four parks on the itinerary, only Chicago's Wrigley Field isn't threatened with extinction.  Chicago's other ballpark, Comiskey Park, will be replaced with a new stadium by 1991.  Civic debates are raging over whether to raze or renovate Detroit's Tiger Stadium and Cleveland's Municipal Stadium.  "You know that old Frank Sinatra song, 'There Used To Be a Ballpark Here?'" muses Harold Rhinehart, a Philadelphia real-estate investor, at the tour's kickoff dinner.  "It feels like that should be playing in the background."  Adds Leonard Bruns, a Bakersfield, Calif., retiree: "You could play that just about anywhere."  Baseball's new economics has imperiled its old ballparks, which generally provide more seats for yesterday's $2 bleacher fan than for today's $20 corporate patron.  With player payrolls soaring and cities bidding wildly for scarce professional sports franchises, team owners have both the need and the leverage to get new, publicly financed facilities stuffed with revenue-producing luxury skyboxes and premium-priced box seats.  As old gives way to new, baseball fans are wallowing in diamond nostalgia.  In the current hit movie "Field of Dreams," the baseball field becomes a mystical place where dreams come true.  A series of lithographs of historic ballparks has "caught on beyond my wildest expectations," marvels New York sports-art dealer Bill Goff.  "We touched a heartstring."  The Smithsonian tour also caught on well.  Taking members on a four-game baseball road trip is a marked departure from the highbrow fare typical of the national museum's 14-year-old travel program.  While the weeklong tour isn't cheap ($1,450, plus round-trip air fare to Chicago), its appeal has already prompted the Smithsonian to plan a reprise next summer.  "The phones have been ringing off the hook," says Jeanette Pilak, the museum's representative on the tour.  "People say, 'I don't care where you're going or how much it costs, just sign me up.'"  So I have joined this caravan of dreamers to find out why these Midwestern dowagers exert such a powerful emotional pull.  For many on the tour, these ballparks are the worn old trunks that contain some of our fondest memories -- and some of our most bittersweet regrets.  For Stephen Fromyer of Severna Park, Md., for instance, these parks are reminders of a youth dedicated to becoming a professional baseball player.  It was a dream he never fulfilled, becoming a psychologist instead, but never forgot.  They are also safe harbors, unchanged and unspoiled, in a world of wrenching changes.  As tour members learn, however, not every old ballpark is a wonder to be cherished.  Some are just old.  COMISKEY PARK  The oldest park in the major leagues, Comiskey is remembered mostly for the mishaps that have befallen it and its star-crossed tenant, the Chicago White Sox.  Built in 1910 for a mere $750,000, the stadium soon housed the infamous "Black Sox," who were accused of throwing the 1919 World Series.  The team didn't win a pennant again until 1959.  Damage caused by rioting teen-agers during 1979's ill-fated "Disco Demolition Night," in which disco records were burned on the field, forced cancellation of a game.  The park's tragicomic history helps explain why preservationist protests never reached a fever pitch here.  Besides, contends White Sox historian Richard Lindberg, it is a cavernous, cold and impersonal place where the big green Cs etched into the exterior constitute the only design extravagance permitted by tightfisted owner Charles Comiskey.  Still, it took a lucrative offer to the White Sox (from St. Petersburg, Fla., where a nearly completed baseball stadium has a dome but not a tenant) to galvanize the state legislature into authorizing funding for the new park rising across the street.  "The choice was simple," Mr. Lindberg says.  "Either build the ballpark or lose the team."  By 1991, the new stadium will supplant what was once known as the "Baseball Palace of the World."  In Sox country, the city's hardscrabble industrial South Side, few things last forever.  "I wish my mother and father could be here forever, but they're dead," explains luncheon speaker Orestes "Minnie" Minoso, a popular White Sox outfielder of the 1950s.  "It's the same with the ballpark."  TIGER STADIUM  The chattering tour group falls silent upon entering the hallowed shrine at Trumbull and Michigan avenues, a spot where professional baseball has been played in one park or another since 1896.  "It's like walking into the Sistine Chapel," says Norman Wainwright, a Stockton, Calif., boat pilot.  This stadium reeks of history.  The great Ty Cobb played here.  Lou Gehrig's streak of 2,130 consecutive games played, one of baseball's most revered records, ended here in 1939.  Reggie Jackson smacked a light standard on the towering right-field roof with a now-legendary home run in the 1971 All-Star game.  The ballpark also has its eccentricities -- the only flagpole in baseball that sits in fair territory, the right-field upper deck that juts out over the field.  And it puts the fan as close to the action as anywhere in the majors.  Nevertheless, the Tigers have caught new-stadium fever, citing a shortage of premium seats and a maintenance tab that runs $4 million annually.  While some of baseball's best seats are here, so are some of the worst, with many obstructed views.  Nearly half of its seats are in the bleachers, with only 27,000 between foul poles, the fewest in the majors.  "Everybody loves the ballpark, but to keep it the way it is is to perpetuate mediocrity in today's business," says Irwin Cohen, director of group sales for the Tigers, the biggest losers in the big leagues this year.  He argues that with the current stadium the club can't generate enough revenue to field a consistently capable team.  Besides, he adds, today's fans want to sit near the infield, not in the bleachers.  This is serious stuff in Detroit.  The Tigers are getting stiff opposition from the preservationist Tiger Stadium Fan Club, which meets with tour members to present its views.  Tour members who were ready to sacrifice Comiskey as a crumbling relic are eager to fight for Tiger Stadium, offering moral and financial support to the group.  "You can't transfer your myths from place to place," says Mr. Andrews, the stock trader.  "If we lose our sense of history, we lose our sense of what we are."  MUNICIPAL STADIUM  Few fans get dewy-eyed about Municipal Stadium, even though it has been the site of considerable history.  Joe DiMaggio's 56-game hitting streak ended here in 1941.  Cleveland Indians pitcher Herb Score was felled by a line drive off the bat of Yankee Gil McDougald in 1957.  A 20-game winner the year before, Mr. Score never regained his form after the incident, and retired five years later.  Ted Williams hit his 500th home run here in 1960.  Like the city in which it resides, however, Municipal Stadium gets little respect.  Built in 1931 in just 370 working days in the vain hope of luring the 1932 Olympic Games, the 70,000-seat-plus facility resembles a giant warehouse, a fitting image for this gray, industrial city.  In its cavernous, 11-story-high interior, fans can get about as close to the action as they can to the gold in Fort Knox.  The gnats swarming in from Lake Erie sometimes outnumber the fans.  The Indians resisted playing here full time until 1947, holding most of their games at cozier League Park.  Local objections to replacing Municipal have more to do with money than sentiment.  Voters thrashed a 1984 referendum on public funding for a retractable-dome stadium.  A scaled-down proposal has been stalemated.  While the Indians want a more intimate new park, the Browns, the football team that also plays here, want to refurbish the old one.  Still, should the ballpark vanish, its passing would be mourned by some.  Bob Feller, the Hall of Fame fastballer who pitched for the Indians from 1936 through 1956, except for four years of World War II service, meets the tour in the stadium's press box.  "I like the old parks, they're like people -- some tall, some short, fat, thin," he explains as he autographs baseballs and programs.  "The new parks are sterile.  You could wake up in the middle of one and you wouldn't know if you were in Los Angeles or New York."  WRIGLEY FIELD  To the baseball purist, few venues can match Wrigley Field, home of the Chicago Cubs, for sheer timeless nostalgia.  Cheapskates still man the roofs of surrounding apartment buildings.  The verdant ivy that smothers the gently contoured, brick outfield walls still swallows bouncing drives.  The famed Cub "bleacher bums" still hurl back enemy home runs in disgust.  The ancient scoreboard is the only one in the major leagues still operated entirely by hand. (In Boston's Fenway Park, not included on this tour, the numbers are posted by hand, but some lights are operated from the press box.) Wrigley's scoreboard still provides running inning-by-inning scores for all games at all times.  "You don't have to hope that you turn around just when the score you're interested in is blinking," as you must with most electronic boards, Frank Readdy, a retired Navy test pilot, says.  Oh, some things have changed.  A row of luxury boxes now hangs from the second deck.  And after a long fight, lighting to allow night games was finally installed last year by the current owner, Tribune Co., the Chicago-based media giant.  The improvements quieted Tribune threats to move the Cubs to the suburbs but didn't still the wrath of Cub fans.  A popular item outside the stadium these days is a T-shirt listing the "Top Ten Lies Told at Wrigley Field," including "The Tribune Co. really cares about the fans," and "There will never be lights in Wrigley Field."  A city ordinance that limits the Cubs to 18 night games a season until 2002 has helped calm the furor.  And the team has distracted light-haters this season with that rarest of occurrences -- a pennant-contending Cubs team.  For a while, at least, the so-called "friendly confines" are safe.  Cub fans can still gaze at the center-field bleachers and argue about whether Babe Ruth did or didn't point out where he would hit a home run in the 1932 World Series.  They can still chuckle over former Cubs outfielder Jose Cardenal's stashing of his comb in the ivy for between-pitches grooming.  And they can continue to mourn the pennant-stretch collapse of the beloved 1969 Cubbies.  At a farewell dinner, Bill Welsh, a retired investment banker from Boca Raton, Fla., tries to explain why those memories are so important.  "People want those things they had in their youth," he says.  "And they want to pass them on to the next generation."  In the year leading up to the opening of the London Stock Exchange, economists and financial reporters world-wide were bursting with stories about "The Big Bang."  It was hyped to the heavens.  In anticipation of the onslaught that would deliver fresh business and new clients, many American financial institutions opened up new offices or expanded existing operations in Britain.  But the avalanche never got rolling; within a year, most businesses found themselves cutting back.  The Big Bang had delivered a few tremors, but none were potent enough to register on the fiscal Richter scale.  Now, it seems we are being asked to hold our breath in anticipation of another momentous happening.  By the end of 1992 we are slated to witness the birth of "Fortress Europe" -- a Europe made rapturous with the miracle of economic unity.  Just think of it: Project 1992 will deliver a commonwealth of nations without economic borders.  In this single-market Utopia of 335 million consumers, people, capital, goods and services will move as freely as they do within the U.S. Companies will be able to compete in a free, open and equitable market; passports will be passe.  American companies are already being warned to solidify their European presence now or miss out on the greatest thing since sliced bread.  Well, pardon me, folks, but I don't buy the whole loaf.  Yes, there is going to be a more closely knit European Community featuring fewer barriers on all aspects of living.  But this is neither surprising nor new.  The evolution toward this semi-unification has been going on for the past 40 years.  There are, however, some walls that loom as obdurate as Stonehenge.  Consider the many differing rules by which Europe's players are governed.  In Britain, my company -- Remington -- has seven accounts that make up 85% of our business.  In Italy, however, no organization can own more than six retail stores, which means we have to deal with a plethora of mom-and-pop shops.  This means our distribution network there is completely different from the one we use in Britain.  In Britain, sales representatives can be terminated with 90 days' notice.  In Italy, the law doesn't let us dispose of reps so easily.  They, in effect, own their territory.  To fire a rep requires paying a penalty based on the rep's anticipated earnings over a long period of time.  In France, anyone who gets fired must receive severance pay, an amount borne solely by the company.  In Britain, when a worker is made "redundant" the government picks up part of the check.  Retirement and benefit programs also differ from country to country.  Will these suddenly change in 1992.  Hardly.  There probably will be a long period of adjustment.  As Fortress Europe is being assembled, Spain and Portugal are joining the Common Market.  These countries have a lower standard of living than do their new economic allies.  How will their suddenly accessible low-cost labor pool affect the unemployment rate across Europe?  All European Community members have some form of taxation on goods and services, called value-added taxes, or "VATs."  These vary from country to country.  For instance, Spain's VAT is about 12%, while Ireland's is 25%.  The European Commission, the group in charge of planning the 1992 extravaganza, is trying to harmonize these figures.  Some countries would be forced to raise their rates and others to lower theirs.  This suggestion is causing quite a brouhaha.  British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher is on record as being opposed to such mandatory changes; she is not about to give up her government's power of taxation.  Mrs. Thatcher is also determined to retain some border controls.  She feels they are necessary to stop illegal immigration, the inflow of drugs, and the easy transit of terrorists.  And she is voicing the concern of many European leaders on these delicate subjects.  The value of the various European currencies is another problem yet to be solved.  Several members of the European Commission are pushing for a unified monetary system and a European central bank.  Few European leaders are dancing in the streets over this suggestion.  Mrs. Thatcher is diametrically opposed to any such changes.  And then there are product approval controls and stringency standards, which vary widely from country to country -- not to mention the approval procedures for pharmaceuticals, which also differ widely.  In America, managers are now hearing how "you must be placed in Europe RIGHT NOW]" What's the hurry?  Fortress Europe should help facilitate the exchange of goods among its member nations, not make it tougher.  Remington, like most U.S. companies, shouldn't have to open up a factory across the Atlantic in order to take advantage of this.  Like most American companies, Remington can benefit by shipping to one European location, from which we will then distribute our products to other countries.  Some observers warn that a united Europe could slap heavy duties on goods coming in from outside their realm.  I don't see this happening.  If it did, I'm sure the U.S. would respond in kind.  And since the U.S. is Fortress Europe's largest potential customer, a European-initiated duty war would be suicidal.  If there is a major, immediate impact, it will come in the number of mergers across national borders.  We are already seeing signs of this.  French companies acquiring British companies; British businesses acquiring German enterprises.  With the lifting of various restrictions, these transactions are becoming more common; wider access certainly will be possible.  In today's global economy any American company that wants to be a player must have a finger in international marketplaces.  But you don't have to catch the next Concorde to remain competitive.  Remington isn't doing anything differently to prepare for 1992.  We have a base in Britain and do some assembling there.  If we were to lose a duty war, we might have to see about establishing a manufacturing plant there as well.  It would probably take only about six months to accomplish this.  We'd have plenty of time, as would the rest of corporate America.  Europe 1992 may serve very well as a symbol and an ideal; it remains to be seen how it will function in reality.  ---  Mr. Kiam is CEO of Remington Products.  When the junk bond market was jolted this spring, depressing prices and jacking up yields, traders blamed fears of an imminent recession.  The recession didn't arrive.  But the junk market hasn't recovered.  What's going on?  The average yield on junk bonds now tops 13.5%, which is 5.3 percentage points more than on 10-year Treasury notes, traders say.  That gap is slightly narrower than it was at the beginning of last month, but remains enormously wide compared with last year's average gap of 4.2 points, according to Moody's Investors Service Inc.  "High yield bondholders are still skeptical of the belief that the economy is strong," says Frank V. Colombo, director of high yield research at Dillon, Read & Co.  "They aren't so quick to jump to the conclusion that everything's okay."  In fact, a lot of things are far from okay in the world of junk bonds, those corporate debt securities ranked below investment grade by credit rating services, such as Moody's.  In a study to be released today, Moody's will go so far as to suggest that a recession may be the least of a junk issuer's potential problems.  The study will show that this year's weakness in the junk bond market is the result of a sharp deterioration in corporate credit quality.  Among the causes are some very basic business problems: increased competition, price pressures and technological obsolescence.  Moody's said it has downgraded the credit ratings of 104 speculative-grade companies in the first eight months alone, compared with 110 downgrades for all of 1988.  Even without a recession, Moody's noted, downgrades are leading upgrades by a factor of 2.8 to 1 this year, compared with 1.5 to 1 last year.  Credit downgrades depress bond prices, forcing yields to rise.  "Companies saddled with high debt have become inviting targets for cash-rich competitors who will make every attempt to wrest market share through aggressive price cutting," says John Lonski, Moody's senior economist.  "Increased competition and technological change can pare revenues as easily as an economic downturn."  Consider the junk bonds of troubled MiniScribe Corp., a Longmont, Colo., maker of computer disk drives.  Moody's said it downgraded MiniScribe's convertible subordinated debentures in May to Caa from single-B-2 after a severe price war with competitors reduced MiniScribe's cash flow.  In addition, Moody's said a high debt load has made it difficult for MiniScribe to adapt to current technological changes and to increase research and development spending-factors that will impair its ability to return to health.  "The high debt may be a hindrance to these companies.  It takes finance to capitalize technological change.  If you are deeply in debt, you won't be able to keep pace with technological changes and soon will find yourself at a competitive disadvantage," says Mr. Lonski.  Moody's found that troubles among high technology companies are growing rapidly.  So far this year, only two high-technology junk bond issues have been upgraded while 20 issues have been downgraded.  In addition to MiniScribe, the list of downgraded bonds includes Wang Laboratories Inc., Control Data Corp., Wyse Technology and Zenith Electronics Corp.  In most cases, the reason cited for the ratings change was the company's inability to respond to competitive pressures.  "Rarely was a junk bond downgrade attributed to a recession-like reduction in product demand," says Mr. Lonski.  The industries with the most defaults are real estate, finance and retailing.  Many of these companies with credit problems have been highly publicized, notably Integrated Resources Inc., Southmark Corp., Gibraltar Financial Corp. and Revco D.S.  Dillon Read's Mr. Colombo says that such news is keeping investors away from the market even though the economy appears to be healthy.  "People probably do feel better about the economy," he says.  "But on the other hand they have seen a number of troubled credits jump up and bite them -- some of which weren't expected."  Still, there are some optimists around.  Garrett Moran, manager of the high yield department at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., remains convinced that the current market conditions will change and that junk's cheap prices "represent a buying opportunity."  He says the market's tone will pick up in the fall "when some good new issues hit the market."  ---  Friday's Market Activity Bond prices rose as much as 1/2 point Friday in response to an unexpected contraction in the consumer credit report and a robust dollar.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 100 13/32, up about 12/32 from 100 1/32 Thursday.  The issue's yield fell to 8.08% from 8.11% Thursday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 98 30/32 to yield 8.14%, compared with a price of 98 22/32 to yield 8.18% Thursday.  Rates on Treasury bills fell Friday as the discount rate on three-month Treasury bills fell to 7.77% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.01% while the rate on six-month bills eased to 7.78% for a yield of 8.19%.  News that consumer credit contracted in July by a seasonally adjusted $280 million, or at a 0.5% annual rate, caused an afternoon short-covering rally.  A Dow Jones Capital Markets Report survey of economists had expected, on average, a $3.6 billion rise in consumer credit.  The data finally "gave the market something to trade on," says Elizabeth Reiners, a money market economist at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. Bond buyers "interpreted the contraction to mean there may be less consumer spending, but that may not necessarily be the case."  Donald Fine, chief economist at Chase Manhattan Bank, says that investors may have overreacted.  "There was a paucity of number this week and this one particular number is getting more attention than it deserves," he says.  Activity had been extremely sluggish all week because of a lack of significant economic statistics or other market-moving developments.  A stronger dollar also helped Treasury prices.  Late Friday in New York, the dollar was trading at 147.20 yen and 1.9950 marks, up from 146.63 and 1.9800, respectively, from late Thursday.  In other major markets:  -- Municipal bonds finished unchanged to 1/4 point higher in slow trading.  But activity is expected to pick up this week as more than $1 billion of new bond offerings are priced.  The primary focus will be Washington Public Power Supply System's $450 million refunding revenue bonds, which are expected to be priced tomorrow by a group led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Because WPPSS defaulted on a major issue in the past, traders are anxious to see how the new offering will be received.  -- Corporate bonds rose about 1/8 point.  Last week, a total of $1.3 billion of new debt was offered, compared with $1.5 billion the week before last, according to Securities Data Co. Last week's figures included a $1.15 billion issue of zero-coupon securities by Motorola Inc.  Among the expected new issues for this week are Connecticut Light & Power Co. and GTE South Inc.  -- Mortgage securities gained more than 1/8 point.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 97 9/32, up 6/32, to yield 9.51% to a 12-year average life.  FMC Corp. lost a key battle with its insurers over who will have to bear the costs of complying with a government-ordered cleanup of toxic wastes.  A California state appeals court said FMC Corp.'s general-liability insurance policies don't cover such costs.  The case was closely watched after another California appeals court, in a suit involving Aerojet-General Corp., ruled the opposite way in May.  In the current ruling, issued late last week, the court determined that cleanups under the federal Superfund law are a traditional exercise of the government's police power.  The court said insurance doesn't cover such governmental actions.  FMC, a machinery and chemicals concern formerly based in California, sued 173 of its insurance companies in an effort to establish that it could recover costs associated with the cleanup.  The insurers said damage to property not owned by FMC is the only thing covered under terms of the policies.  Deborah Pitts, a lawyer for defendant AIU Insurance Co., said the bulk of pending Superfund litigation nationally concerns this issue.  Cases are pending in five state supreme courts.  Three federal appellate courts have ruled that insurance coverage doesn't apply; two intermediate state courts of appeals have found that it does.  The issue hasn't come before the U.S. Supreme Court.  The court in the FMC case took issue with the contrary decision in the Aerojet case, stating it "could render liability insurers responsible for the costs of doing business, such as mandatory compliance with a local zoning ordinance."  Bowen H. Tucker, senior litigation counsel for FMC, said the company will seek a rehearing in the appellate court or will ask the California Supreme Court to hear the issue.  The state Supreme Court turned down the insurers' request for an appeal in the Aerojet case last month.  Now that two appellate panels have reached contrary conclusions, state Supreme Court review is more likely.  ---  TOUGH FOREIGN LIBEL LAWS could apply in suits against U.S. authors and publishers.  In a current libel case, a federal judge in Chicago rejected a foreign plaintiff's request to apply the law of India in U.S. court but has left open the possibility that foreign law -- which lacks the protection of the First Amendment -- could apply under certain circumstances.  Morarji Desai, a former prime minister of India, sought to apply Indian libel rules -- which are based on British law -- in his suit against author Seymour Hersh.  Mr. Hersh reported in a book that Mr. Desai sold Indian state secrets to the CIA.  Typically, damages are higher in U.S. courts than in foreign courts, but First Amendment protections in the U.S. make it much more difficult for public officials to win libel claims here.  U.S. District Judge Charles R. Norgle ruled that foreign defamation laws could apply in U.S. courts if it could be shown that a defendant had intentionally abandoned his First Amendment shield.  The judge said that substantial foreign distribution of the writing, coupled with relatively limited domestic distribution, might constitute such abandonment.  Floyd Abrams, a First Amendment lawyer, said, "It is a very troubling concept that the First Amendment might not be applied in U.S. courts simply because of the likelihood more books would be sold in a foreign country than at home.  That puts authors at the mercy of public taste."  Judge Norgle ruled that U.S. laws would govern in the Hersh case, but he hasn't issued his opinion explaining why.  Trial is scheduled to begin Wednesday.  ---  THE GAF CORP. stock-manipulation trial is back for a third run -- and sooner than expected.  U.S. District Judge Mary Johnson Lowe rescheduled the trial of GAF and its Vice Chairman James T. Sherwin, moving it from Nov. 6 to Oct. 23.  The judge apparently speeded up the process because she has more free time now that the scheduled trial of stock speculator Salim B. Lewis has been canceled.  Mr. Lewis pleaded guilty to three felony counts last month.  The first GAF trial ended in a mistrial in January when Judge Lowe found that the prosecutor improperly, but unintentionally, withheld an expert report.  After the jury became hopelessly deadlocked in the second trial, Judge Lowe declared another mistrial.  Since then, former Singer Chairman Paul A. Bilzerian was found guilty of securities fraud, and Mr. Lewis threw in the towel.  Charges in the cases of Messrs.  Bilzerian, Lewis and Sherwin stemmed from the cooperation of former brokerage chief Boyd L. Jefferies.  Mr. Jefferies will be the government's star witness at the GAF trial.  Defense attorneys say they have no plans to settle the GAF case prior to trial.  ---  LAWYER ADVERTISING, once taboo, now competes for awards.  The California Lawyer, a San Francisco monthly, devoted seven pages of its August issue to 11 law firms' marketing brochures and newsletters, recognized as superior by a four-judge panel.  More than 100 firms submitted entries, ranging from T-shirts to board games.  "We were expecting a couple of dozen entries," said Raymond Reynolds, California Lawyer's editor and publisher.  Brochures with monolithic gray covers got the thumbs down.  The judges preferred the marble pattern adorning the cover of the brochure submitted by Los Angeles-based Buchalter, Nemer, Fields & Younger.  With more entries flooding the office in response to the article, Mr. Reynolds says the magazine will start a regular marketing column and is planning a second contest for next year.  ---  PEPPER, HAMILTON & SCHEETZ, Philadelphia, merged its Washington office with the firm of Sloan, Lehner & Ruiz, which specialized in international law.  Joining Pepper's 55-lawyer Washington office as partners are Robert D. Sloan, 41, George A. Lehner, 41, Vanessa Ruiz, 39, and Andrew Winter, 33.  Messrs.  Sloan, Lehner and Winter and Ms. Ruiz recently co-authored a 696-page lawyers' guide to Europe's 1992 single-market initiative for the Bureau of National Affairs Inc.  ---  TAX COUNSEL: Drinker, Biddle & Reath said Harry L. Gutman, 47 years old, joined the firm as partner in its tax group.  Mr. Gutman, a former Treasury Department deputy counsel for tax legislation, taught at the University of Pennsylvania Law School before joining the 230-lawyer firm.  General Dynamics Corp. received $94.4 million in Air Force contracts for F-16 aircraft equipment and for improvements to the electronic warfare evaluation system facility.  Grumman Corp. received $44.6 million in Navy contracts for F-14 and E-2C aircraft equipment.  Contel Federal Systems, a division of Contel Corp., received a $28.8 million Air Force contract for intelligence data processing.  United Technologies Corp. received a $26.4 million Air Force contract for engine tuning equipment.  Textron Inc. received a $17.5 million Army contract for improvements to OH58D helicopters.  Raytheon Co. received a $17 million Army contract for Hawk anti-aircraft missile components.  Rockwell International Corp. received a $16 million Air Force contract for development of MX mobile missiles.  Boeing Co. received a $13.3 million Air Force contract for Minuteman missile services.  Australia's chief anti-trust regulator said he has "the strongest reservations" about the possible sale of any Bond Corp. Holdings brewing assets to rival brewer Elders IXL Ltd.  Bond Corp. is considering various corporate-restructuring proposals to reduce its debt, including one from Elders that envisages the sale to Elders of part of Bond Corp.'s Australian brewing operations.  But Bob Baxt, chairman of the Trade Practices Commission, said he found it "difficult to conceive of any such deal" that wouldn't breach Australian anti-trust law.  The Agriculture Department is widely expected tomorrow to trim its one-month-old projection for a big rebound in U.S. corn and soybean production from last year's drought-stricken levels.  Dry weather during the first half of August stunted corn yields in western Corn Belt states such as Iowa and Nebraska.  Heavier-than-normal rain slowed soybean growth in Indiana and Ohio to such an extent that some analysts are speculating that many fields won't fully mature before the first killing frost.  Nonetheless, most analysts expect the Agriculture Department to forecast near-normal crop yields, and that would have many implications.  It might prompt some economists to lower their forecasts of food inflation.  It might give the Soviet Union a clear enough picture of U.S. conditions to prompt it to begin purchasing U.S. crops to supplement its own autumn harvests.  Indeed, the price of some soybean-futures contracts rose in trading Friday at the Chicago Board of Trade on rumors that the Soviet Union is interested in buying as much as two million metric tons of soybean meal.  The department's projection, which is based on Sept. 1 conditions, will also figure heavily in the debate over the next farm bill.  The debate will climax in the next several months.  The farm bill will dictate agricultural policy for probably the next five years.  While a near-normal harvest would prevent any food shortages, it wouldn't be enough to rebuild to a comfortable level the stockpiles of corn that were slashed by the 1988 drought.  Such a projection would support any push by the White House to cut spending on federal programs that encourage farmers to restrict planting.  Tomorrow's report is the second of the monthly forecasts the Agriculture Department will release this year on the impending harvests.  Based on Aug. 1 conditions, the department forecast that U.S. corn production would jump 49% to 7.35 billion bushels from the 4.92 billion bushels harvested in 1988.  The department pegged the soybean harvest at 1.91 billion bushels, up 24% from the 1988 crop of 1.54 billion bushels.  Sparks Commodities Inc., Memphis, Tenn., one of the most closely watched crop forecasters, is predicting a U.S. corn harvest of 7.13 billion bushels and a U.S. soybean harvest of 1.85 billion bushels.  Steve Freed, senior grain analyst at Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago, is pegging the corn harvest at 7.30 billion bushels and the soybean harvest at 1.88 billion bushels.  Richard Loewy, president of AgResource Co., Chicago, expects U.S. farmers to harvest 7.28 billion bushels of corn and 1.87 billion bushels of soybeans.  A few forecasters' estimates are higher than the Agriculture Department's one-month-old estimates.  Based on Sept. 1 conditions, Leslie Analytical Organization Inc., Chicago, is estimating corn production at 7.44 billion bushels and soybean production at 1.91 billion bushels.  The Agriculture Department's September crop estimate is pivotal because it gives a relatively clear fix on the final harvests.  Weather usually loses much of its influence on potential yields in September because the crops are nearing maturity.  That allows grain traders, economists and governments to make important calculations.  If the Agriculture Department does trim its forecast as expected, some grain analysts speculate that corn prices won't drop much lower through autumn.  Crop prices usually slip to their lowest levels in the fall as the harvests replenish the nation's grain bins.  But corn prices will find strength, according to these analysts, because the 1989 harvest won't be enough to rebuild the huge stockpile that the 1988 drought forced the U.S. to exhaust.  Before the harvest began last year, the U.S. had roughly one-half of a year's supply of corn in storage.  That more than offset the impact of the drought.  The cushion is much smaller this year, and few see it growing next year.  At the same time, projections for nearnormal harvests would reinforce predictions that food inflation would be moderate.  Paul Prentice, an economist at Farm Sector Economics Associates, said he will likely trim his forecast of 1989 food inflation to 5.5% from his current estimate of about 5.7%.  Earlier in the year, his 1989 forecast had been as high as 6%.  He said he is forecasting 1990 food inflation at roughly 5.0%.  After the report is released tomorrow, anticipation will begin building over when the Soviet Union will begin its usual fall buying spree of U.S. crops.  The Soviet Union has placed some of its biggest orders here in the fall because that is when it knows how much to import to supplement its fall harvests, and U.S. prices are typically around the lowest levels of the year.  This fall is unusual because the U.S. and Soviet Union are preparing for negotiations this December over a new long-term grain pact.  Some traders are speculating that the Soviet Union might delay its purchases in order to win price concessions from the White House.  By last year at this time, the Soviet Union had already made a large purchase in the U.S.  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Energy  The oil markets questioned whether gasoline and crude contracts could continue their gains of last week.  While many traders were anticipating a correction all of last week, others expect further increases in the belief that demand for both crude and products remains strong.  Gasoline clearly has been the biggest mover in the energy arena.  The market for gasoline appears to be tight because demand hasn't slowed as it usually does when the summer winds down.  "Gasoline demand has been inordinately strong at a time it should be weakening," one trader said.  In addition, a lot of gasoline capacity could come off the market in coming weeks as a number of large refineries curtail operations for scheduled maintenance.  Market participants will be looking to this week's American Petroleum Institute report on inventories.  Further drawdowns could add to the bullish sentiment, although any signs that companies are building reserves of gasoline could have the opposite effect.  Crude prices haven't risen in the same gangbuster fashion as has gasoline, although they have edged up.  For the moment, it seems the oil market is more than absorbing the robust output from the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  Precious Metals  Traders will continue to look at the dollar to judge which way precious metals prices will go.  The apparent divorce of precious metals from the influence of the dollar is mostly noticeable when the dollar weakens, according to William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures.  "But when the dollar becomes strong, it depresses precious-metals prices," he said.  Such was the case last week, Mr. O'Neill said.  When the dollar eased a bit, gold and silver prices rose only slightly, he said.  "Gold and silver traders didn't react significantly to new life-of-contract highs in crude oil, which normally would be regarded as inflationary and a price-supporting development for precious metals," he said.  "Also, traders largely ignored turmoil during the election in South Africa.  Platinum responded slightly to it, but then fell back," he said.  However, Mr. O'Neill noted, when the dollar strengthened again, gold and silver fell to life-of-contract lows.  On Friday, precious-metals prices fell as the dollar reached its strongest point since June.  Dinsa Mehta, chief bullion trader at Chase Manhattan Bank, feels that the dollar remains the dominant influence in precious metals, but that "in turn, the dollar is sensitive to interest rates.  So, the dollar and precious metals are, in effect, an interest-rates market."  Traders have had great difficulty pushing the spot price of gold below $360 an ounce despite a strong dollar, Mr. Mehta noted.  So, spot gold could rebound and test $365 if the dollar isn't able to sustain its current upward momentum, he said.  An aid to any rally, Mr. Mehta added, would be the drying up of gold selling by producers, which was strong in the first two quarters of the year.  ---  @ U.S. Harvests  @ (In billions of bushels)  @ CORN SOYBEANS  @ 1987 7.072 1.923  @ 1988 4.921 1.539  @ 1989 est. 7.133 1.847  @ Source: Agriculture Department; estimates by Sparks Commodities Inc.  Gulfstream Aerospace Technologies, a Chrysler Corp. unit, said it signed an $85 million contract with British Aerospace (Commercial Aircraft) Ltd. to design, tool, and manufacture the wings for the British Aeropace PLC unit's new 29-seat Jetstream 41 aircraft.  Gulfstream said a total of 200 wing sets are included in the first contract.  They will be delivered over a 10-year period.  Production is to begin with five wing sets during 1990, and increase to at least 35 wing sets by 1994.  The first wing set is to be delivered next June.  A federal appellate court has ruled that banks can package their own loans and underwrite them as securities.  The 43-page ruling by the Second Circuit Court of Appeals reverses a decision last December by Judge Kevin T. Duffy, who found that U.S. Comptroller of the Currency Robert Clarke had breached federal laws separating the banking and securities fields by permitting Security Pacific National Bank, a unit of Security Pacific Corp., to underwrite some of its residential mortgages as securities.  Barbara Lucas, general counsel for Citicorp's investment banking arm, said, "I haven't read the opinion yet, but from what I've heard it sounds like a great victory for the banks."  Added H. Rodgin Cohen, a partner in Sullivan & Cromwell, a New York law firm that has major banking clients: "While this opinion doesn't decide the outer limits of securities activities for banks, it does have significant ramifications."  The ruling deals directly only with mortgage loans packaged as securities, but legal and securities experts said that they see no reason the ruling's rationale couldn't be applied to all other forms of consumer and commercial loans, even ones purchased from other banks.  If that is true and the appellate ruling withstands an almost certain appeal to the U.S. Supreme Court, banks could become a far more powerful competitor in the securities markets.  Asked if an appeal is planned, a spokesman for the Securities Industry Association, a trade group representing securities firms, said the ruling will be reviewed at its Sept. 19 board meeting.  The spokesman added that the rationale relied on by the appellate court was previously rejected by the high court.  The ruling is but the latest inroad that banks have made into the securities business.  Earlier this year, the Federal Reserve Board gave four banking companies -- J.P. Morgan & Co., Citicorp, Chase Manhattan Corp. and Bankers Trust New York Corp. -- permission to underwrite and deal in corporate debt on a limited basis through separate securities affiliates.  Previously, the Fed had cleared several banks' securities affiliates to underwrite and deal in commercial paper and securities backed by mortgages and other consumer receivables.  However, the Fed expressly said that the banks' securities affiliates couldn't underwrite securities backed by loans written by their affiliated banks.  Faced with pressures to build capital, banks in recent years have tried to trim the size of their loan portfolios without foregoing new loans by selling loans, often as securities.  Usually, Wall Street firms underwrote those securities.  But recently, banks have tried to cut out the middlemen and save themselves the underwriting fees by handling the securities issues themselves.  In 1987, Mr. Clarke gave banks the go-ahead to do so, reasoning that underwriting the loans as securities was essentially the same as selling a loan portfolio.  The amount of underwriting at stake under the ruling is huge.  Citicorp, for instance, plans to remove $15 billion of loans, largely mortgages and credit card receivables, from its balance sheet this year through securitization.  Porsche AG, Frankfurt, West Germany, said group sales rose 1.8% in the fiscal year ended July 31 to 2.53 billion marks ($1.28 billion) from 2.48 billion marks a year earlier, as a surge in domestic sales helped compensate for a fall-off in export sales.  The sports-car maker didn't disclose group profit but said earnings had "improved considerably" despite the burdens of new-model introductions.  Citing lively demand in West Germany and in foreign markets aside from the U.S., the auto maker said it is expecting a "satisfactory" result for the current fiscal year.  The three-year-old headquarters of glass-making giant Vitro S.A. is a piece of old Mexico.  Wrought-iron gates and tree-sized cactuses surround yellow-brick offices built in the style of an 18th century hacienda.  But the old-fashioned ambiance has little to do with Vitro executives' nostalgia.  "We're always looking for foreign joint venture partners, and this is the Mexico they want to see when they visit," says Vitro's executive chairman, Adrian Sada, raising his arms to the Spanish-style vaulted brick ceiling of his board room.  Mr. Sada, a 44-year-old scion of the most storied family in Mexican industry, is a key architect of a new deal that would be the biggest step yet toward establishing Vitro as a major international player.  He's heading Vitro's tender offer of $20 a share, or $251.4 million, to buy Anchor Glass Container Corp., Tampa, Fla.  The bid represents the first time a Mexican company has attempted a hostile takeover of a U.S. concern.  Vitro, which owns 1.4 million of Anchor's 13.9 million shares outstanding, kept up the pressure on Anchor early last Friday, extending its tender offer to Sept. 14.  Vitro also said that about 4.8 million Anchor shares had already been tendered.  Later that day, Anchor's board again recommended that stockholders reject Vitro's offer.  It said Anchor is talking to several other companies about a "possible transaction."  Despite the opposition, Mr. Sada insists that with Mexico's recent opening to imports and foreign investment, Vitro has no choice but to see the bid through.  "The country and the concept of industry are changing," Mr. Sada maintains says.  "We have to be bigger, more efficient and more international."  Others in Monterrey's close-knit industrial community agree.  "Vitro recognizes that Mexican companies must now choose between being either a giant or a subsidiary of a giant," says Lorenzo Zambrano, director general of Cementos Mexicanos, Mexico's leading cement producers.  Cementos has also chosen to beef up, announcing this week a $44 million purchase of a cement company in Houston.  "Everyone is wishing Adrian and Vitro the best, because we all know that's the way of the future," says Mr. Zambrano, who is a distant relative of Mr. Sada.  It's really not surprising that Mexico's first cross-border hostile takeover would come out of Monterrey and be crafted by a Sada.  This is one of Mexico's most prosperous and Americanized cities, with scores of television satellite dishes cocked toward the north and one downtown street corner occupied by both a Showtime Pizza Parlor and a McDonald's.  And Sadas have been in the thick of making Monterrey the center of Mexico's heavy industry since the 1890s, when brothers-in-law Francisco Sada and Isaac Garza started a small brewery.  The company grew vertically, producing glass for bottles, steel for caps and grain for brew.  Today, Vitro not only makes bottles for beers such as Carta Blanca and Corona, but also windshields for Ford Motor Co. and fine crystal that sells in Macy's and Neiman Marcus.  Lately, Vitro has been seeking to expand capacity as a result of growing exports and increased demand at home caused by government price controls and a vibrant underground economy.  Four months ago, Mr. Sada was approached by friends who run closely held Latchford Glass Co., Huntington Park, Calif., about a possible purchase of Anchor.  In genteel Mexican business circles, handshake deals are more common than hostile offers.  "We thought maybe we would go to {Anchor} with a friendly deal," says Mr. Sada.  Lesson No. 1 in doing business north of the border came when Mr. Sada consulted Vitro's seasoned team of Wall Street advisers, which include Lazard Freres & Co. and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  "They said, 'Try a tender offer,'" says Mr. Sada.  Even if Vitro gets control of Anchor, it will face a formidable turnaround job.  Anchor had a loss of $10.3 million in the second quarter, and the glass industry as a whole is strained by competition from plastic containers.  "We think we can improve the product by modernizing the plant," says Federico Sada, president of the containers division and Adrian's younger brother.  One of only a handful of Mexican companies exporting technology, Vitro plans to invest as much as $80 million a year to overhaul Anchor's facilities.  Vitro would also remove Anchor's top managment in favor of Latchford's.  Vitro's technological bent is a legacy of Adrian Sada Sr., an eminently practical engineer who remains the group's chairman.  Once, at a product presentation for Vitro's refrigerator line, visitors were taken aback when the chairman rolled up his sleeves, opened a toolbox and repaired a faulty unit.  The elder Mr. Sada's common-sense approach also helped Vitro avoid the over-indebtedness and ill-conceived diversifications that nearly destroyed some of the big Monterrey conglomerates when oil prices crashed in 1981.  "Before Mexico's economic problems, Vitro was criticized as being too conservative," Adrian Jr. says.  "But by {taking on} less debt and sticking to our core business, we came out of the crisis in better shape."  Although Vitro was squeezed by a foreign debt that reached a peak of $750 million in 1982, the company never posted a loss and has reduced its indebtedness to just $15 million.  While his sons have been on the acquisition path, the elder Mr. Sada has been in bed recovering from a coronary bypass operation three weeks ago.  "He really wants to come back to the office, but we tell him it's too soon," Federico Sada says.  Dealmaking is more up Adrian Jr.'s alley anyway.  After obtaining an M.B.A. from the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School of Finance, he went to work at Banpais, a small bank owned by the Vitro group.  He became chief executive officer when he was only 32, turning Banpais from a local lender with three branches and 300 employees to Mexico's fifth-largest bank with 135 branches and 5,000 employees.  Then, in 1982, the Mexican banking system was nationalized.  Adrian Jr. went to work in Vitro's corporate sector and has emerged as a rising star of the Monterrey industrial scene.  When Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.), whose family is revered in Mexico, visited Monterrey this year, Adrian Jr. was picked to host a dinner for the dignitary.  During last year's presidential campaign, the younger Mr. Sada also entertained Mexico's new president, Carlos Salinas de Gortari, whose market-oriented reforms gave rise to Vitro's historic bid.  The Bank of Italy ordered Banca Nazionale del Lavoro to shore up its capital following an international scandal involving $2.64 billion in unauthorized credits to Iraq.  Central bank and Treasury officials are also considering a plan that would inject at least one trillion lire ($700 million) in new capital into BNL through another Treasury-controlled institution, Istituto Mobiliare Italiano, or IMI.  After the disclosure that BNL's Atlanta branch had guaranteed billions of dollars of export credits to Iraq without the approval of BNL's U.S. headquarters or from Rome, the central bank ordered BNL to recalculate its minimum required capital, this time doubling the weight accorded to loans made in foreign currency.  Before the Atlanta scandal, Bank of Italy had already told BNL to raise some two trillion lire in new capital by 1992.  Now, analysts estimate that the bank will need to raise at least 300 billion lire more.  Banking officials are said to be considering having IMI, a credit institution that also sells mutual funds and which is owned by the Treasury, to subscribe to between one trillion and three trillion lire of subordinated loans to BNL. IMI could wind up taking a stake in BNL, which is currently 74.5% owned by the Treasury.  Banking officials declined to confirm details of the IMI plan, saying only that "all possible options are under consideration."  Meanwhile, some holders of BNL's letters of credit are facing payment delays as bank officials weigh whether they must honor the guarantees.  Hertel AG retained the Atlanta law firm of Glass, McCullough, Sherrill & Harrold last Friday to help it collect $2.4 million on a letter of credit that BNL is thus far refusing to honor, according to Thomas J. Harrold, a partner in the firm.  Hertel, a German tool and machinery maker, has a contract to provide tool and dye equipment to Iraq's state-owned Machinery Trade Co. in Baghdad.  Hertel has had a revolving credit facility with BNL for about a year.  Mr. Harrold said that although letters of credit generally must have two signatures, the Hertel letter of credit in question bears only one -- believed to be that of Christopher P. Droghoul.  Mr. Droghoul is the former branch manager of BNL in Atlanta who was suspended when the irregularities came to light in early August.  Mr. Droghoul and his attorney thus far have declined to comment.  Separately, a small Alabama company that holds a letter of credit said BNL officials Friday disbursed $1.7 million in funds after weeks of delays.  The Alabama concern has a $14 million contract to build a machine-tool factory for Machinery Trade.  The small Alabama company said BNL Atlanta on Aug. 8 suddenly stopped paying on a letter of credit after having disbursed about $7 million during the past year.  An additional $800,000 is currently overdue to the Alabama concern.  Company officials said that over the weekend it made out checks to employees and creditors who hadn't been paid in several weeks.  It said its suppliers are "nervous" and are considering delaying shipments for the Iraqi project.  As expected, Treasury Minister Guido Carli on Friday appointed Giampiero Cantoni chairman of BNL, succeeding Nerio Nesi, who resigned Thursday night.  In addition, Paolo Savona was named director general of BNL, succeeding Giacomo Pedde, who also resigned Thursday.  Mr. Savona begins his new job today, but Mr. Cantoni's nomination must be confirmed by Parliament before he can take his new post.  Approval isn't expected for at least several days.  Mr. Cantoni, a Socialist entrepreneur turned banker, has headed Istituto Bancario Italiano, a Milan bank owned by another state bank, since 1982.  A graduate of Milan's Bocconi business school and a friend of Socialist leader Bettino Craxi, he also teaches marketing at Bocconi, and is owner of a small electrical appliance company outside Milan.  The Milanese banker made headlines last year because of his opposition to an accord between IBI's owner, Cassa di Risparmio delle Provincie Lombarde (Lombardy Savings Bank), and Spain's Banco Santander, which gave the Spanish bank's Banco Jover unit a 30% stake in IBI.  Paolo Savona's fame lies more in his writings about economics and his frequent speaking engagements at conferences and seminars.  A professor of economics and chairman of a small Sardinian bank, he is close to the tiny Republican Party and can count on political backing from them and from the dominant Christian Democratic Party.  Meanwhile, BNL's outgoing chairman said that the scandal surrounding the Atlanta branch, which has been accused of financing exports of arms, could have international political implications.  "I'm convinced that in the next few days, new facts will emerge," said Mr. Nesi in an interview carried on Italian state radio.  In a letter to Mr. Carli that was made public over the weekend, the former BNL chairman bitterly criticized the government's handling of the BNL affair, accusing Mr. Carli, as representative of BNL's major shareholder, of failing to speak out on his behalf.  He also accused Mr. Carli, a former Fiat SpA director as well as a former governor of the Bank of Italy, of seeking to privatize BNL and other state-owned banks.  Mr. Carli declined to comment.  Thorn EMI PLC, London, said it sold its Kenwood kitchen appliances division to the unit's management for #54.6 million ($84.7 million) in cash and a #1.9 million subordinated note.  Thorn announced in June that it was seeking buyers for the unit, as part of the parent's strategy to focus on its core rental, music and lighting businesses.  Commuters hurrying to work from South Station can't avoid walking past an Au Bon Pain cafe no matter how hard they try.  There's one inside the station, and one across the street at 1 Financial Center.  There's another two blocks away, at 176 Federal St., another two blocks away from that, at 75-101 Federal St., and still another two more blocks away, at 14 Milk St.  "We like to say you can toss a football from unit to unit," says Louis Kane, cochairman of the fast-growing chain best-known for its gourmet sandwiches, freshly squeezed orange juice and freshly baked French bread, croissants and muffins.  Au Bon Pain Co. is among the latest to embrace the unconventional strategy of saturation marketing.  The idea, relatively new to the U.S., is to group outlets tightly in urban and other high-traffic areas.  Au Bon Pain has clustered 16 cafes in downtown Boston alone -- with many less than 100 yards apart, and one group of five shops operating on different floors of Filene's department store.  The chain is so confident of the success of saturation marketing that it now plans to export the strategy to other cities, where it has only a handful of units so far.  It will open more than 15 stores a year in cities 500 miles or less from here, including New York, Philadelphia and Washington, D.C.  In New York, it's focusing on downtown and midtown, where there are already three Rockefeller Center outlets.  While putting too many sites too close together can cannibalize sales -- as it has modestly at some Au Bon Pain locations -- proponents say the advantages outweigh the drawbacks.  Clustering shops can reduce advertising expenses, make for easier supervision and attract customers from the competition.  "The concept of saturation marketing makes perfect sense," says Richard Winger, a vice president at Boston Consulting Group, a management consulting firm.  "It's the developing of brand identity that gives {companies} that extra push.  When you think of croissants {in Boston}, you think Au Bon Pain."  It's too soon to tell whether saturation marketing will catch on as the latest marketing trend.  Apparently only a few other companies have tried it seriously.  BayBanks Inc., a second-tier regional bank here, has nonetheless managed to become a leader in retail banking by saturating the city and suburbs with automated teller machines.  In downtown alone, it has 75 machines -- almost three times as many as its major competitors.  "We're every place," says Donald Issachs, a spokesman for the bank.  "And the public loves it."  Benetton S.p.A., the Italian clothing company, was among the first in the U.S. to adopt the strategy, using saturation marketing to become a major player in the mid-1980s.  Some New York neighborhoods sprouted three or four stores carrying only Benetton clothes and promoting slightly different themes or fashions.  While good for Benetton, the strategy alienated some store owners, who operate the shops independently.  Some Benetton dealers, in fact, have sued the company, charging that their sales dropped after other Benetton-only shops opened nearby.  Indeed, some merchants question the merits of saturation marketing.  McDonald's Corp., for example, won't put its restaurants too close together because it doesn't want them to compete with each other.  "We're not coming in, looking at 20 square blocks and saying, 'Where are we going to put the next one?' We're interested in building sales at existing restaurants.  That's one of our strategies for growth," says Chuck Ebeling, a McDonald's spokesman.  Au Bon Pain concedes that its strategy has limitations.  Saturation wouldn't work for Au Bon Pain in suburban or residential areas because it's not a "destination restaurant" that people will drive to.  Instead, the strategy works best in high-density, downtown locations, where shops can intercept the hordes of impulse customers with little time to shop or eat lunch.  In addition, the company acknowledges that there can be too much of a good thing.  While it will open some more shops here, it expects most of its growth in other cities.  Au Bon Pain was formed about a decade ago when Mr. Kane, owner of the original Au Bon Pain, merged his two stores with a cookie company owned by Ronald Shaich, now co-chairman.  The new closely held Au Bon Pain didn't immediately embrace saturation marketing.  Like many new fast-food businesses seeking to expand rapidly, Au Bon Pain turned to franchising after opening a handful of shops here.  It franchised several units along the East Coast and in the Midwest, and more in airports around the U.S.  But it found that some franchisees were a headache to deal with.  At the same time, it discovered that the more company-owned shops it opened in downtown Boston, the better it did.  As a result, it bought out some of the franchisees and for several years has concentrated instead on saturation marketing here.  The company now has 70 stores -- 51 company-owned and 19 franchised -- with average sales of more than $1.25 million a year and about 10,000 customers a week.  "Why do we do this craziness?  We do it because we continue to make money at it," says Mr. Shaich.  "In the morning, people probably don't walk more than 50 feet for breakfast and they won't walk more than a block for lunch.  So if the walls of the market are a block, then we have to be in each of those mini-markets."  Cannibalization has been limited so far, the company says.  The Au Bon Pain at 75101 Federal St., for example, recently saw sales drop 5% in the two weeks after a new Au Bon Pain opened a couple of blocks away.  But, even though the new store had sales of about $60,000 in its first four weeks, sales at the older shop quickly recovered to the normal $100,000 a month.  Customers of that store -- mostly workers at two nearby banks -- apparently tried the new Au Bon Pain, but then came back to the first store because it was closer and more convenient for them, says Marianne Graziadei, general manager of the store.  Even when sales don't fully recover, the gains at new stores more than offset any marginal loss at existing stores, the company maintains.  Sales at the Au Bon Pain at Summer and Hawley streets have fallen 5% since a new store opened a block away four months ago.  Still, the new store's projected yearly sales of $850,000 more than offsets the $75,000 drop at the older store.  Moreover, if the new store hadn't been opened, another restaurant likely would have taken the location -- and a competitor would be getting the additional sales, says Mr. Kane.  The danger of cannibalization is further offset by other benefits of saturation marketing.  "We've never spent a penny on advertising," boasts Mr. Shaich.  Yet the awareness level of the chain in Boston is "phenomenal," he says.  This awareness, of course, stems from the proximity of the stores, says Marc Particelli, senior vice president at Booz, Allen & Hamilton Inc., a management-consulting firm in New York.  "It's like having outdoor billboards on every block; the stores are a substitute for advertising."  The company also benefits from close supervision.  Regional managers can walk from store to store, visiting as many in one day as managers of scattered chains might visit in a week.  "Our guys live in our stores," says Mr. Kane.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Exabyte Corp., proposed initial offering of 2,850,000 common shares, of which two million will be sold by the company and 850,000 will be sold by holders, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Montgomery Securities.  Health Concepts IV Inc., offering of 140,000 common shares, via Gilford Securities Inc. and holders.  The Canadian government has hired consultants to examine the ramifications of selling the post office to the private sector, said Harvie Andre, the minister responsible for Canada Post Corp.  Mr. Andre said selling the post office is the logical next step now that the corporation is making a profit.  Canada Post had net income of 96 million Canadian dollars (US$80.8 million) for the fiscal year ended March 31 on revenue of C$3.41 billion.  It was its first profit in 30 years.  Sale to the private sector may lead to "a more efficient, more effective postal service," Mr. Andre said yesterday in a television interview with Canadian Broadcasting Corp.  A spokesman for the Canadian Union of Postal Workers, said a sale will lead to "inferior service" and job losses.  James Peterson, opposition Liberal Party member, said it is "laughable" to think the private sector could provide a better national postal service.  Since it took office in September 1984, Canada's Progressive Conservative government has sold a number of goverment companies including Air Canada, the country's largest airline.  The New York Stock Exchange said it would list the shares of two companies this week.  Synovus Financial Corp., Columbus, Ga., will list under the symbol SNV.  The banking and data processing firm has traded over the counter and until recently was known as CB&T Bancshare Corp.  Healthsouth Rehabilitation Corp., Birmingham, Ala., will trade with the symbol HRC.  The medical rehabilitation services firm has traded over the counter.  On the American Stock Exchange this week, Keane Inc., Boston, will begin trading with the symbol KEA, when it moves from the over-the-counter market.  It is a software company specializing in project management, design and applications development.  One issue was newly listed on the National Market System of the Nasdaq over-the-counter market.  Brite Voice Systems Inc., Wichita, Kan., started trading with the symbol BVSI.  It makes interactive voice processing and audiotex systems.  Canadian production of market pulp dropped 8.1% in July from a year earlier as the industry operated at 99% of capacity.  The Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, an industry group, said Canadian mills produced 624,000 metric tons of market pulp in July, compared with 679,000 metric tons in July 1988.  A metric ton equals 2,204.62 pounds.  Market pulp is wood pulp sold on the open market to producers of paper, sanitary and other products.  The statistics exclude pulp consumed at the producing mill or shipped to another mill that is affiliated with the producing mill.  Canada is the world's largest producer of market pulp.  The July 99% operating rate compared with 97% in June and 108% a year ago.  For the first seven months of this year output was 4,204,000 metric tons compared with 4,257,000 metric tons a year ago.  Total market shipments in July were 508,000 metric tons compared with 628,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Shipments to all markets were down.  Canadian producer inventories at the end of July were 384,000 metric tons, a 20-day supply, compared with 268,000 metric tons, a 13-day supply, at the end of June.  Producer inventories a year ago were 338,000 metric tons, a 16-day supply.  On the eve of the mayoral primary in New York City, race relations have moved to center stage.  The explosive issue, which many have tried to keep from dominating the campaign, now seems likely to determine whether Mayor Edward I. Koch has a chance to return for an unprecedented fourth term.  Pollsters say the race-related killing of a black youth in the Bensonhurst section of Brooklyn last month has served as the lightning rod for the campaign.  It has galvanized blacks to turn out to vote for Manhattan Borough President David Dinkins, who is black, in greater numbers than they otherwise might have.  And it has put Mayor Koch on the defensive.  In the final days of campaigning, the indefatigable mayor -- who fought his way back into the campaign after spotting Mr. Dinkins a huge lead -- has been forced to explain why he has had such poor relations with many in the black community since he was first elected in 1977.  At a Manhattan synagogue late last week, Mr. Koch addressed the question by denying responsibility for the city's racial tensions and asking the audience whether they thought the death of the black youth, Yusef Hawkins, would have been prevented had Mr. Dinkins been mayor.  A few people shook their heads, no.  "That's what they're trying to convey." he said.  "It bothers me that there is racial intolerance by whites against blacks, but it also exists by blacks against whites]"  It was vintage Koch to try to be conciliatory but to come across argumentative instead.  During the past 12 years, at forums such as this and in other appearances, he has used a combination of brashness and schtick, coming across as dazzling, inspiring or infuriating, but never dull.  Mr. Koch began the race as an underdog who was widely blamed for a municipal scandal and the city's slow response to the AIDS and homelessness crises.  It seemed to many, as well, that the city was simply tired of the outspoken and often outrageous style that had made the mayor so popular in the first place.  His revival began this summer, as voters focused on the race as a two-man affair between Mr. Dinkins and Mr. Koch.  A series of television ads depicting Mr. Koch as a flawed but able mayor seemed to hit the right note.  Political analysts said that Mr. Koch picked up the bulk of previously undecided voters, as well as those defecting from other candidates.  But as the racial divisions have taken attention away from other questions of public policy and decision-making ability, Mr. Koch's vulnerability on race appears to have stalled his ascent in the polls.  Even those who praise his management ability say the race issue may be his political Achilles heel.  They point out that although Mr. Koch marched for civil rights in Selma, Ala., in the 1960s, he alienated many black voters by opposing recent protest marches through Bensonhurst as "counterproductive."  "I don't think Ed is racist but I do think he is insensitive on matters of race," says Felix Rohatyn, the Lazard Freres & Co. investment banker who heads a board overseeing the city's finances.  "If he wins, he will have to make a serious effort to bind the city socially."  Further benefiting Mr. Dinkins is his extensive support among the city's major unions, which will provide an army of workers on election day to get out the vote.  The Koch campaign, whose only major union endorsement came from the policeman's union, does not have similar vote-delivering operations.  The latest Daily News/Eyewitness News tracking poll gives Mr. Dinkins 48% of the vote, with 39% for Mr. Koch.  "Dinkins's support is so far more firm than Koch's," says Lee Miringoff, director of the Marist Institute of Public Opinion, which has been tracking the race all year.  Mr. Miringoff added that Mr. Koch does not appear to have gained white voters as a result of his stance on the demonstrations that followed the Bensonhurst killing.  Coming into the weekend, Mr. Koch's advisers gave the slightest edge to Mr. Dinkins.  "Bensonhurst has helped Dinkins," said Mr. Koch's media consultant David Garth.  "He is beating it to death."  The racial issue first came up for Mr. Koch in 1977, when he unofficially broke with his liberal past and campaigned in favor of the death penalty and against what were perceived as programs helping inner city blacks.  Since then, even as he garnered black majorities in his re-election campaigns, he dueled with black leaders over the closing of a Harlem hospital, over whether police had acted brutally against blacks, and over his well-publicized charge that Jews would be "crazy" to vote for Jesse Jackson as president.  "I think Ed saw back then that he could make political capital out of the backlash against the free-spending sixties," said Haskell Ward, a former state department official who served as Mr. Koch's first black deputy mayor until 1979.  "He started using code words like attacking 'poverty pimps' and 'poverticians.' But what he was really doing was telling whites he could be tough with the black community."  Mr. Garth said that Mr. Koch has toned down the rhetoric this campaign but that he is unfairly trapped by his reputation.  "Ed Koch says 'I am for motherhood and apple pie,' and that's considered cynical," Mr. Garth complained.  "But if Dinkins says, 'I will bring the city together,' that's sincere."  Mr. Dinkins's organizational edge should compound Mr. Koch's problems.  At the Brooklyn office of the United Federation of Teachers, 75 phones stood ready Saturday for an all-out blitz of union members on behalf of Mr. Dinkins.  Next door, where the Dinkins campaign rents space from the UFT, 30 more phones were being manned by a multi-racial group of volunteers, each with computer printouts spread out listing every Democratic registered voter in specific election districts.  Robbin Moore, a teachers union staffer, said that by Primary Day each of the approximately 70,000 UFT members who are registered Democrats will be contacted about four times by telephone.  "The biggest problem has been the answering machines," she said.  "They're killing the phone operation."  Originally it was thought no candidate might receive the required 40% of the vote to avert a runoff.  Now it appears both Mr. Koch and Mr. Dinkins could go over that threshold.  Two other Democratic candidates, city comptroller Harrison J. Goldin and former transit system chairman Richard Ravitch, lag the field badly.  Historically, winning the Democratic Party nomination has been tantamount to winning the election, since Democrats in the city outnumber Republicans by roughly five to one.  This year, however, the winner will most likely face former U.S. attorney Rudolph Giuliani, who is favored to defeat Ronald Lauder in the Republican primary.  Mr. Giuliani, also running on the Liberal Party ticket, is expected to mount a serious challenge whether or not Ed Koch is on the ticket.  And if Mr. Koch defeats Mr. Dinkins tomorrow, analysts expect large numbers of blacks to defect to Mr. Giuliani, which could produce another interesting political scenario in New York: an unprecedented alliance between black voters and the Republican Party.  GPG PLC, a British financial-services group, said it agreed to sell three U.S. units to their respective managements.  The units are Forstmann-Leff Associates Inc., an investment-management group; GM Capital Corp., a property-investment concern; and Fenchurch Insurance Group Ltd., an insurance brokerage.  The sales require shareholder approval.  Under the sale agreement, Forstmann-Leff's management will acquire the company for $25 million plus 5% of non-voting shares in the company and a deferred unspecified cash consideration.  The GM Capital management will acquire the company for a "nominal" initial consideration plus a deferred consideration based on a detailed formula which reflects the valuation of the group's property portfolio, GPG said.  Fenchurch's management will acquire the business for an initial payment of #30.5 million ($47.3 million), with #30 million of that sum in cash and the remainder in an interest-free unsecured note.  U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills decided to demand an inquiry by the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade into Norway's decision to steer a highway contract away from a U.S. company.  Amtech Corp. of Dallas has complained that the Norwegian government decided to award the contract, for automated electronic toll-road equipment, to West Germany's Siemens A.G. and a Norwegian firm even though the city of Oslo had decided to award it to Amtech and its Norwegian partner.  If a GATT inquiry upholds the U.S. government complaint that Norway has violated the GATT procurement code in this case, the Norwegian government would have to correct its "unfair trade practices" or face possible U.S. trade retaliation, Mrs. Hills said.  Caution reigns.  After spending the week before Labor Day sitting by beaches pondering what to do next, many money managers are pulling in their horns.  Even if they've lagged behind the overall stock market -- and an estimated 70% of them were behind the market's 27% rise through August -- most money managers' gains are nevertheless impressive.  With economic uncertainty mounting again and stock prices near record highs, it's no wonder portfolio managers are deciding to lock in their gains and sit tight for the rest of the year.  "This is no time for heroics," says Hugh Johnson, chief investment officer at First Albany Corp.  "If 1989 ended today, most managers would have returns as good as any they've seen since 1958."  Last week's stock market action certainly reflects the new caution.  On Tuesday, the first day back on the job for many professional investors, trading was sluggish and prices weak -- a clear indication of waning confidence.  On Wednesday, Barton Biggs, chief investment strategist at Morgan Stanley, advised investors to sell 10% of their portfolios, especially high-priced issues in the airline, hotel and entertainment industries.  The advice wasn't especially original, but it triggered a sell-off that helped produce the Dow Jones Industrial Average's first weekly decline since June.  But some money managers already had a head start on caution.  Brett Brubaker, of Abraham & Sons in Chicago, says he began backing off from a fully invested position in June when the Dow industrials hit 2500.  With a gain so far this year of less than 25%, he's trailing the overall market performance.  But if prices go higher, he'll reduce his stock holdings, now at 85% of his portfolio, even further.  "If the market goes up quite a bit from here, I'm prepared to underperform," he says.  Mr. Brubaker thinks the economy is weakening, and will continue to do so unless interest rates are reduced.  Given that outlook, he says stock prices are simply too high.  "The market today concerns me more than it did in the summer of 1987" before the crash that October, he says.  "After the crash everyone was predicting a recession, but I didn't see that.  We were fully invested by December of 1987.  We went out on a limb then because the limb wasn't very far off the ground.  But you can't say that today."  Much of the money that Mr. Brubaker still has in stocks is invested in technology issues, which many money managers have shunned.  But Mr. Brubaker believes computer and electronics industries have learned some hard competitive lessons in the past few years and are in better shape to prosper in a downturn than are most other industries.  "Technology has been just like the Rust Bowl," he says.  "They've had to learn how to run their businesses or they didn't survive."  He points out that four years ago only about 10% of such companies he followed used "just-in-time" inventory control techniques, but today at least 50% cut costs with this method.  Ed Macheski, who runs Macheski Asset Management in Wilton, Conn., also began turning cautious before last week.  A month ago, he began raising 20% to 40% cash in various customers' portfolios.  "Maybe I was a little early, but when I sit back and say to myself, 'What have I done for my clients?' and I'm up 25% for the year so far, that's a damned good number.  I'm comfortable with that."  Mr. Macheski's strategy is to reduce stock holdings to what he calls "bedrock investments" -- International Business Machines, General Motors, Eastman Kodak and some telephone and oil stocks.  He's already sold Walt Disney, Procter & Gamble, Kellogg, Coca-Cola, Merck and several other food and health care issues.  "It's hard to sell some quality issues," he says.  "Coke and Kellogg are great companies, but at 20 times earnings, that's a pretty fair price."  James Awad, president of BMI Capital in New York, isn't changing his strategy.  But he is counting on a changing market to bring his firm's lagging performance -- a gain of about 23% -- up to par.  BMI's strategy is to buy shares of companies that are growing faster than the average for the 500 concerns in Standard & Poor's index, that have a below-average ratio of price to per-share earnings and whose prices are below what they would be if the companies were taken over.  Most such stocks belong to smaller concerns and trade on the American Stock Exchange or in the over-the-counter market.  And those stocks have lagged behind the performance of larger issues.  "Much of the market activity this year has been driven by underinvested portfolio managers," says Mr. Awad.  As the market continued to surprise them by rising through the year, these managers had to keep committing more and more cash to stocks.  "What they did was buy stocks where they could get a lot of money to work very quickly, which were the large, well-known stocks," he says.  But as the market now begins to retreat -- perhaps as much as 6% from current levels, he predicts -- Mr. Awad believes portfolio managers will quit throwing money at big stocks and start seeking better bets in smaller stocks.  "Instead of looking at companies where they can put a lot of money to work, people are going to focus on where the values are," he says.  "I expect to see the Value Line, Nasdaq and Amex {indexes} outperform the S&P 500 and Dow Jones industrials for the rest of the year.  If the market develops the way I see it developing, we should have an excellent year."  Of course, confidence hasn't gone completely out of style.  Jack Orben, chairman and chief executive of Associated Family Services, a New York-based firm that handles more than 250 portfolios for individuals and organizations, wouldn't be surprised if stock prices fall a little in the near future.  But if they do, his firm will use the 7% or so in cash it's holding back to buy more stocks.  "We're a bit more sanguine than most money managers," Mr. Orben concedes.  "If you had been in our investment committee meetings you'd have found people feeling that the economy is in a relatively cooled state, the Federal Reserve is under leadership that seems to be very levelheaded and whose actual efforts have been fairly calm.  We like that."  Although the performance of each of the firm's portfolios varies according to the client, a model portfolio representing the firm's "best investment thinking" is up 37% through August, says Mr. Orben.  It's tempting to lock such gains in place, but Mr. Orben and his colleagues also are tempted by a possible capital gains tax cut.  "It's kind of a Catch-22," says Mr. Orben.  "We may feel some stocks have reached their full valuations and want to sell them.  On the other hand, most individuals don't like paying taxes, and if we sold them now and six or seven months from now got a lower capital gains rate, it would be even worse.  We're kind of dodging the capital gains bullet, so we're content to hang in there with our portfolios and see what Washington is going do."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Stock prices rebounded from an early futures-related sell-off to close with slight gains.  Restructuring rumors drove Woolworth up 3 to 71 3/4, a 52-week high, and helped save the Dow Jones Industrial Average from a string of four losses last week.  Down 22 points early in the session, the industrial average rose on light buying by bargain-hunters to close 2.66 points higher at 2709.54.  Just 154,090,000 shares traded on the New York Stock Exchange, compared with 160.2 million Thursday.  But the market broke its nine-week winning streak, the longest string of weekly gains since 1965.  For the week, the Dow industrials lost 42.55, or 1.5%.  Speculative buying also boosted Eastman Kodak, which went up 3/4 to 49 7/8 on 1.7 million shares.  Recurring rumors about the company's patent-infringement case against Polaroid and possible interest in the company from investor Carl Icahn fueled the advance, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Meanwhile, the Dow Jones Transportation Average dropped 7.29 to 1473.68, bringing its decline for the week to nearly 3.5%.  The selling in airline stocks continued.  AMR, the owner of American Airlines, fell 1 5/8 to 81 on 1.5 million shares; UAL, the parent of United Airlines, lost 1 1/2 to 280 1/4; USAir Group eased 1/8 to 48 1/4; and Southwest Airlines slipped 1/4 to 27 3/4.  Tobacco stocks fell in the wake of a Senate panel's approval of legislation banning smoking permanently on all domestic flights.  Philip Morris lost 1 5/8 to 162 5/8, American Brands dropped 1 to 76 3/4, and UST slid 1/2 to 27 1/4.  Loews, the parent company of Lorillard, eased 3/8 to 119 7/8.  Exxon went up 1/8 to 44 3/8 on 1.7 million shares.  Many money managers bought oil stocks last week in expectation of higher energy prices in the coming months.  Texaco rose 1/4 to 51 1/4, Mobil climbed 1/2 to 57 1/8, Amoco firmed 5/8 to 49 3/8, and British Petroleum advanced 3/4 to 59 7/8.  Valero Energy, cited as a rumored takeover target, advanced 1 1/2 to 18 1/4 on 1.5 million shares.  Business Week magazine reported in its "Inside Wall Street" column that management is expected to take the company private at about $29 a share if a bid should emerge.  Ohm, also mentioned in the column, gained 1 1/2 to 14 3/4.  Business Week reported that big investors have started to accumulate the stock on speculation that Ohm's management is preparing to sell the company.  Melville rose 7/8 to 52 5/8 on 1.4 million shares, including two blocks that accounted for more than one million of the total.  The company said it bought back the blocks as part of a continuing stock-purchase program, linked to its establishment earlier this year of an employee stock ownership plan.  Windmere rose 1 3/8 to 18 3/4, its highest level since worries over the impact of political unrest on the company's manufacturing operations in China triggered a selloff in late May.  The latest gains came after S.G. Warburg raised its investment rating on the stock.  A unit of National Mutual Life Association of Australasia Ltd., an Australian insurance and finance company, said it has bought CMB Investment Counselors Inc., a fund-management concern specializing in fixed-interest securities.  A price wasn't publicly disclosed.  Meridian Global Funds Management Ltd. said the CMB purchase will boost its funds under management to more than 9 billion Australian dollars (US$6.88 billion).  CMB, based in Los Angeles, has about US$2 billion of funds under management.  About 80% of the funds are in fixed-interest investments and 20% in equities, Meridian said.  CMB also will take over management of about US$1 billion of assets from Integrity Life Insurance Co.  National Mutual bought Integrity from New York-based Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. last year.  The company said the CMB purchase is its "first proposed acquisition in the U.S."  Meridian, which was established by National Mutual last year, has fund managers in London, New York, Tokyo, Hong Kong and Melbourne, Australia.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNCIPALS  Alaska Energy Authority -- $100 million of power revenue bonds, first series (Bradley Lake Hydroelectric Project), tentatively priced by a John Nuveen & Co. group to yield from 6.30% in 1990 to 7.33% in 2018.  The bonds are rated triple-A.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of Remic mortgage securities, offered in nine classes by Goldman Sachs & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-63, backed by Fannie Mae 10% securities, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $22.8 billion and its total issuance to $34.9 billion since the program began in April 1987.  The coupon on all classes was 9.4%.  No pricing details were immediately available.  @ EUROBONDS  Frends II B.V. (special purpose vehicle) -- $380 million of floating-rate notes backed by leveraged buy-out loans via Continental Capital Markets Ltd., consisting of $328 million of Class A-1 senior secured notes paying three-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.75 point; $13.5 million of Class A-2 unsecured notes paying Libor plus 1 point; $38 million of unrated Class B notes paying 3.5 to 4.5 points over Libor.  All three tranches due Dec. 31, 1997, but will prepay as underlying loans amortize.  Offshore Logistics Inc., Lafayette, La., said it reached a preliminary agreement to acquire the Gulf Coast helicopter operations of Omniflight Offshore Inc., a subsidiary of Omniflight Inc., a closely held Charleston, S.C., concern.  Offshore Logistics, which leases vessels and helicopters to the offshore oil drilling industry, said the acquisition is expected to involve cash, assumption of lease obligations and warrants for about 200,000 shares of its common stock.  Offshore Logistics has about 17.6 million shares outstanding, fully diluted.  The acquisition would increase Offshore Logistics' fleet to 146 aircraft from 128, said George M. Small, vice president and chief financial officer.  He said the acquisition would increase annual operating revenues by about 9%, which he estimated could approach $100 million for the year ending June 30, 1990.  Selective Insurance Group Inc., based in Branchville, N.J., said it bought back 1,278,000 of its shares from Ranger Insurance Co. for about $23.3 million, or $18.25 a share.  Ranger, a Houston property-casualty insurer, began investing in Selective two years ago and eventually accumulated a 9.7% stake in the firm.  Ranger, a unit of American Ranger Inc., a privately held, insurance-holding company in Hartford, Conn., said it ultimately will use the money to expand or diversify.  Selective, also a property-casualty insurer, said the buy-back decreases its shares outstanding to 12.5 million.  ROCKEFELLER GROUP is seeking to sell 40% to 80% of the family-owned concern to outside investors for $1.3 billion to $2 billion, sources said.  It is the latest effort to raise cash by family members whose inheritance is tied up in real estate and other corporate holdings.  The assets include Rockefeller Center and 80% of Cushman & Wakefield.  ---  Bank regulators proposed a minimum capital standard of 3% for national banks.  The plan would come as a relief to the thrift industry, which under the new S&L bail-out law must meet the same capital rules.  ---  Campeau will submit a restructuring proposal to directors tomorrow that includes plans to sell the Bloomingdale's chain.  Campeau confirmed that Bloomingdale's chief may lead a management buy-out of the unit.  ---  Banks can package their own loans and underwrite them as securities, an appeals court ruled.  If upheld, the decision could make banks more competitive in securities markets.  ---  The British Coal Board agreed to sell its extensive U.S. real-estate portfolio, including the Watergate complex in Washington, for over $800 million, sources said.  The buyers include several U.S. real-estate firms.  ---  Plessey was acquired by GEC and Siemens after a nearly 10-month fight.  The $3.1 billion acquisition is the latest in what is expected to be a wave of mergers in European electronics.  ---  United Air's pilots were told by their union leader that they face pay cuts of up to 10%, less overtime and fewer vacations to help finance their $6.75 billion bid for parent UAL.  ---  Sir James Goldsmith received two legal setbacks in the U.S. as he scrambled to get Britain to extend the Oct. 7 deadline for his $21.1 billion acquisition of B.A.T Industries.  ---  WCRS Group appears close to an accord that would give 50% or more of its world-wide advertising unit to Eurocom, a big French agency. ---  Striking Eastern Air pilots dumped the head of their union, who had urged them to abandon the picket line and return to work, and replaced him with a more militant leader.  ---  Italy's biggest bank, BNL, was ordered to shore up its capital following a scandal involving $2.64 billion in unauthorized credits to Iraq.  ---  Avon Products said it is "exploring the possibility" of selling its two fragrance subsidiaries, a move that analysts generally applauded.  ---  Crowthers McCall Pattern sued Reginald Lewis, claiming his buy-out and sale of the firm two years ago caused its slide into Chapter 11.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 154,090,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2709.54, up 2.66; transportation 1473.68, off 7.29; utilities 215.98, up 1.32.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3328.83, up 12.72.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.52, off 0.33; spot index 129.45, up 0.08.  Dollar: 147.20 yen, up 0.57; 1.9950 marks, up 0.0150.  Jack Futterman, 55 years old, was named chairman and chief executive officer of Supermarkets General Corp., succeeding Kenneth Peskin, 49, who resigned.  A spokesman said he couldn't elaborate and neither Mr. Futterman nor Mr. Peskin returned telephone calls.  Mr. Peskin assumed the top job in June 1987, when the company was taken private in a management-led leveraged buy-out.  He had been with the company since 1965.  Mr. Futterman, who joined the company in 1973, had been vice chairman, overseeing the Pathmark division, where he was a senior vice president.  Mr. Futterman, a registered pharmacist, has a background in drugstore merchandising and has been president of the Supermarkets Drug Store Merchandising division.  CONVICTIONS FOR FRAUD against the SBA nearly double last year's record total.  Fifty people have been convicted of defrauding SBA programs in the fiscal year that ends this month, up from 28 in all of last year.  About half of the cases involve the agency's minority procurement program, and a third involve SBA loan programs.  One Indiana woman applied for an SBA-backed loan while on a prison-release program, falsely claiming she had no criminal record despite 12 convictions for violating federal financial laws.  One reason for the rise: SBA Inspector General Charles Gillum, who took over in mid-1987, has taken a more aggressive stance than his predecessors.  He persuaded Congress to allow the SBA to audit agency-licensed small-business investment firms less frequently so that it could spend more time checking loan programs, which have about 15 times more money at risk.  Congress agreed, says a congressional aide, because in the investment program SBA auditors "generally know who the bad actors are."  ---  TOUGH QUESTIONS face Kyo Jhin, President Bush's nominee to head the SBA's Office of Advocacy.  Senate confirmation hearings late this month will focus on his political fund-raising and his financial disclosure statement, which shows extensive assets.  Mr. Jhin, who has spent his career in education, has said that in his unsuccessful run for the Maryland House of Delegates in 1986, he also raised campaign funds in California, New York and Pennsylvania.  ---  DRUG DEALS have taken on a new meaning for some entrepreneurs, says the Washington, D.C. Area Council on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse.  Over the past two years, several area small-business owners have been arrested after using cocaine as partial payment for real estate and other purchases.  The council says the buyers were emboldened to pay with drugs because they also used cocaine, which in the short term can cause a feeling of self-confidence.  ---  AN INTERNAL CLASH roils behind new rules on liquidating venture-capital firms.  Following a critical audit by the agency's independent inspector general, SBA head Susan Engeleiter says such liquidations will be monitored closely by top officials to make them "more efficient and effective."  The audit criticized the liquidation of Royal Business Funds Corp., which defaulted on its SBA loans in 1982.  The SBA had trouble selling Royal's assets and for a few years operated a ski resort once held by the concern.  But some outraged SBA officials still disagree with the auditors' charge that the separate company set up by the SBA to handle the liquidation was illegal.  The SBA will ask the Justice Department to resolve the dispute.  "If the operation was legal," fumes one SBA employee, "their whole case falls apart."  "They accused us of Monday morning quarterbacking, but that is by definition what auditors do," counters a staffer in the inspector general's office.  ---  SMALL TALK: About 75% of small businesses had profits under $50,000 or lost money in 1988, says a survey of its 35,000 members by the Boston-based Small Business Service Bureau; similar results are expected this year . . .  Small businesses grouse they still must comply with the Section 89 employee-benefits law even though Congress has barred enforcement of it in 1990, a situation one wag calls "Catch 89."  UNUM Corp. said it will make a Dutch auction tender offer for five million shares, or about 12.3%, of its common stock outstanding at a price between $37.50 and $43 a share.  UNUM will select a single per-share purchase price for the self-tender based on the number of shares tendered and the prices specified by the tendering stockholders.  The offer, which will begin today and expire at midnight Oct. 6, unless extended, won't be conditioned on any minimum number of shares being tendered, the insurance holding company said in Portland, Maine.  UNUM said its board also approved an increase of 2.5 million shares in its stockrepurchase program, bringing the total number of shares authorized for repurchase to 17.5 million, including the five million shares to be purchased under the selftender.  As of last Thursday, UNUM had bought back 9,414,152 shares.  Bio-Response Inc. of Hayward, Calif., said it believes a filing to place the company in bankruptcy-law proceedings is imminent.  Bio-Response develops commercial applications of products derived from mammalian cells.  The biotechnology company said that, after discussions with holders of certain outstanding convertible subordinate debentures and the trustee under the governing indenture, it believes the possibility is remote for any arrangement with debenture holders that permits the company to operate without entering bankruptcy proceedings.  The company said that more than 95% of its debentures outstanding was tendered for redemption by the company on Sept. 1 at an aggregate redemption price of about $22.4 million, and that the company doesn't have sufficient financial resources to satisfy its payment obligations to debenture holders.  President Carlos Salinas de Gortari reaffirmed his vow to sell state-owned businesses to the private sector, saying it is the only way to free resources for Mexico's pressing social needs.  "Are we going to use resources to buy 20 or 30 airplanes needed to modernize the Mexicana fleet or to resolve problems of potable water in poor neighborhoods?" he said in an interview in the Mexico City daily Excelsior.  Mexicana de Aviacion, the state-owned airline, was recently sold to private investors as part of Mr. Salinas's plan to streamline a bulky, government-dominated economy.  He said the government doesn't plan to sell strategic industries like Pemex, the government petroleum monopoly, or electrical power generation.  Leftist opposition parties have criticized the sale of state-owned companies, saying the nation's wealth is being turned over to Mexican and foreign investors.  The state should participate in the economy "but as a partner, not as a substitute for initiative," said Mr. Salinas, a 41-year-old economist who took office in December.  U.S. Banknote Co. said it is extending to Sept. 22 its offer for International Banknote Co. to allow additional time to discuss the merger with the Justice Department's Antitrust Division.  Closely held U.S. Banknote has offered $7 a share, or $126 million, for as many as 14.9 million, or 78.6%, of International's shares outstanding.  On Sept. 8, the previous closing date, about 15.7 million, or 82.4%, of the shares outstanding had been tendered.  In trading on the American Stock Exchange Friday, International Banknote closed at $4.75 a share, unchanged.  Under a previously announced amendment to its merger agreement, U.S. Banknote said that either company can terminate the transaction if it isn't completed by the closing date.  U.S. Banknote added that the closing date could be extended as far as next Oct. 15 to allow it to continue talks with the Antitrust Division and to complete its financing arrangements.  The two concerns, based in New York, print stock certificates and currency.  Consumers Power Co., a unit of CMS Energy Corp., said it is offering to purchase shares outstanding of five series of its cumulative preferred stock, $100 par value.  The offer and withdrawal rights will expire at 5 p.m. EDT, Oct. 6, unless they are extended.  The company will offer to buy the shares of certain series of preferred stock through a procedure known as a Dutch auction.  Consumers said it will offer to buy: as many as 400,000 series $4.50 shares for prices ranging between $55 and $60; as many as 470,000 Series $7.45 shares for between $80.50 and $88; as many as 375,000 series $7.72 for between $83.50 and $91; as many as 480,000 series $7.76 shares for between $83.75 and $91.50; and as many as 290,000 series $7.68 shares for between $83 and $90.50.  Morgan Stanley & Co., will act on behalf of Consumers Power as dealer manager for the purchase of these shares.  Morrow & Co. will be the information agent.  EAST GERMAN REFUGEES POURED into Austria in an exodus to the West.  Thousands of East Germans began crossing the Hungarian border after Budapest removed the frontier barriers to allow about 7,000 refugees to leave camps for the West.  The decision made Hungary the first East bloc government to help the citizens of another Communist nation escape from their homeland.  The refugees traveled into Austria, en route to West Germany.  The long-awaited emigration of East Germans to West Germany is the largest since the Berlin Wall was built in 1961.  East Berlin criticized the decision, saying Budapest had "directly interfered" in its internal affairs.  Bonn hailed the move as "humanitarian."  ---  GORBACHEV WARNED of "dangerous consequences" from internal conflict.  While dismissing warnings of impending chaos and assuring the Soviets that his restructuring program was proceeding as planned, the Kremlin leader cautioned against recent labor strikes, saying "we shouldn't tolerate the huge economic losses."  Speaking on Soviet television Saturday after his summer vacation, Gorbachev skirted the issue of ethnic conflicts in the Soviet Union, but cited "an atmosphere of anxiety" caused by speculation about "the threat of a coup, even a civil war."  Maverick Soviet politician Yeltsin said on CBS-TV that his country faces continuing economic and social decline and can learn from U.S. democracy.  ---  The Bush administration is willing to send military advisers to Peru and Bolivia to help combat narcotics trafficking, Bennett said.  But the White House drug policy director, speaking on ABC-TV, denied reports that the administration had a secret plan to send soldiers on drug-fighting missions in the two Andean Mountain nations.  Colombia's government will extradite three more reputed cocaine traffickers wanted in the U.S. on money-laundering and drug-smuggling charges, a Bogota official said.  One suspect was sent to Atlanta last week.  Colombian troops, meanwhile, raided about 40 ranches believed owned by drug traffickers and seized property.  --- Exxon Corp. will be required to complete the cleanup of an Alaska oil spill next spring or pay the U.S. to finish the work, EPA chief Reilly said on NBC-TV.  Nearly 11 million gallons of oil were spilled March 24 in Prince William Sound after the Exxon Valdez tanker ran aground.  The company is pulling out cleanup workers this week.  ---  The White House said Bush is seeking to recruit business executive and former Republican Party aide Frederick Malek to run next year's economic summit with Western allies.  The 51-year-old Malek resigned as a top Bush campaign adviser last fall while denying allegations of anti-Semitism.  ---  Reagan was reported in "excellent spirits" following surgery Friday to remove fluid from the surface of his brain.  The hourlong operation was conducted at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn.  A spokesman for the 78-year-old former president said the problem stemmed from a July 4 incident in which Reagan fell from a horse.  ---  The House is prepared to forge ahead on a wide-ranging bill to bar discrimination against the handicapped.  The Senate passed the bill, 76-8, late Thursday.  The legislation requires employers to make "reasonable accommodations" for the handicapped, in hiring and other ways.  ---  Mourners in South Africa buried victims of last week's election violence, and anti-apartheid activists prepared a mass march to protest alleged police shootings and the reported deaths of 29 civilians during the parliamentary balloting.  A police official was quoted as pledging to block the demonstration planned for next Sunday.  ---  Syria and its Moslem allies attacked three gateways into a Christian enclave north of Beirut, and Christian commander Gen. Michel Aoun accused the U.S. of allowing Damascus to annex Lebanon.  In the capital, police said at least four people were killed and 17 wounded in artillery duels across the sectarian dividing line.  ---  The nation's prison population increased by a record 46,004 inmates in the first six months of the year, for a total of 673,565 men and women incarcerated, the Justice Department reported.  The six-month jump was higher than any annual rise recorded during the 64 years that the government has counted prisoners, the department said.  ---  Boris Becker of West Germany won the U.S. Open tennis championship, defeating Czechoslovakia's Ivan Lendl, three sets to one in New York.  On Saturday, West German Steffi Graf successfully defended the women's singles title by beating Martina Navratilova of the U.S., two sets to one.  PPG Industries Inc. said it will close an insulated-glass fabrication plant at Lincoln, Ill., and a similar plant in Marshall, Minn.  The closings result from a continuing decline in demand for glass-edge insulating units, which are used mainly in residential construction, Pittsburgh-based PPG said.  The product is called glass-edge because two pieces of glass are bonded together at the edge with adhesive rather than being bound together with a metal strip.  An air space between the glass sheets provides the insulating quality.  The Lincoln plant employed 180 people last year, prior to layoffs in 1989.  All production there will end within two weeks, the company said.  The Marshall plant has 74 working employees and 94 people on layoff, but most of the 74 will be dismissed within a month, the company said.  Employees are being offered assistance in finding new jobs, PPG said.  Striking Eastern Airlines pilots dumped the head of their union, who had urged them to abandon their picket line and return to work, replacing him with a more militant leader.  Capt. Jack Bavis, a 23-year Eastern employee who led the pilots union there since 1986, was recalled by the master executive council of the Eastern unit of the Air Line Pilots Association late last week.  He was replaced as unit chairman by Capt. Skip Copeland, an ALPA veteran considered more of a hardliner.  "He's a hawk," asserted a union source about Capt. Copeland.  "Jack Bavis wasn't adequate to the task of carrying forward the pilots message that we're not going to give up, we're not going to go away."  Neither Capt. Bavis, nor Capt. Copeland returned phone calls seeking comment.  Capt. Bavis' days apparently became numbered after an Aug. 6 teleconference in Miami during which he told pilots he'd advised the union's board to consider returning to work and accept the pilot jobs that then remained available at Eastern.  Struck by all but 200 of its 3,600 pilots March 4, Eastern has been luring some pilots back and gradually replacing others with new hires.  Thus, the number of jobs open to strikers who might return has been shrinking steadily.  The Miami pilots were outraged at Capt. Bavis' suggestion, and started the move for his recall several days later.  Most pilots still insist they won't work for Eastern as long as its parent company, Texas Air Corp., continues to sell off assets and tries to turn the carrier into a smaller operation.  Capt. Copeland is thought to be more in tune with the thinking of Eastern's rank-and-file pilots, who are willing to remain on strike and continue their attempts to force a sale of the carrier to a sympathetic buyer.  As a result of the pilots' strategy, the issue between them and Eastern long ago became a fight for control of the airline, rather than a traditional economic labor-management dispute.  The ALPA pilots nearly engineered a buy-out by an investment group led by former baseball commissioner Peter V. Ueberroth last April, but it collapsed at the last minute.  Bids by other potential buyers never materialized, although one, Chicago futures trader Joseph Ritchie, says he is still interested and has pilots-union support.  Failing a buy-out, pilots say they are hoping something will materialize from heavy lobbying efforts on Capitol Hill, although it is unclear what kind of action Congress could take.  In the meantime, Texas Air says Eastern isn't any longer for sale, and is trying to resurrect a smaller carrier with about 800 flights a day, down from a pre-strike level of more than 1,000.  It is currently making about 600 flights daily.  Eastern has so far hired about 1,000 replacement pilots.  In the week following Capt. Bavis' statement, about 300 pilots crossed the picket line, bringing to about 650 the number of defectors since the strike began.  The total of new hires and crossovers is just about the number of pilots Eastern says it needs to fly its smaller schedule.  Separately, both the pilots union and Eastern confirmed they'll begin today their first negotiating session in six weeks under supervision of a federal mediator.  People on both sides, however, caution that the resumption of talks doesn't necessarily imply progress.  Regular contact is required under airline labor law.  During one recent round of talks, hope glimmered briefly and then faded.  Eastern's contract with its pilots expired last year, but remains in effect until the two sides negotiate a new one or the federal mediator declares they are at an impasse.  Officially, the current pilot walkout is in sympathy with striking Eastern machinists, not over the pilots' own pact.  "Look, Daddy.  A bull."  A young reader, glancing at a drawing in the business section of a local newspaper, so summarized the state of the stock market while on his summer's-end vacation.  He didn't, however, address the more delicate question of whether any stocks remain attractive.  Thus, it seemed appropriate to check with the priesthood of value investors -- those who insist on buying a dollar's worth of stocks for 80 cents, or less.  "We're really groping for stock ideas," says Scott Black, president of Delphi Management.  A number of value investors say they are boosting the cash level in their portfolios, in some cases sharply.  "People who are truly conservative -- if they are investing today -- are bending their standards," one big investor asserts.  Nonetheless, value investors say a few stocks still look sweet.  Some, though not all, are buying from two depressed groups: healthy thrifts, which have been tarred by the industry's crisis, and cyclical industrial stocks, which are cheap because of recession fears.  Others are buying what Mr. Black calls "oddball situations," out-of-the-way and little-known companies.  Glenn Greenberg, managing partner of Chieftain Capital Management, likes Cedar Fair, an amusement park partnership with a happy choice of a stock symbol (FUN).  Cedar Fair has just installed a Magnum XL-200, a 72-mile-an-hour roller coaster it says is the world's biggest, at its park in Sandusky, Ohio.  The company's president is so enamored of the business that he built a home almost on the park grounds.  Better yet, the stock, based on 1989 earnings estimates of $1.50 a partnership unit, has a price-earnings multiple of 8.  The Magnum XL, Mr. Greenberg notes, "takes you up to 205 feet and drops you all the way down."  In other words, according to value investors, it's like the stock market.  With the exception of the months before the 1987 crash, they say it's never been tougher to find stocks.  Donald Smith, a disciple of early value investors Benjamin Graham and David Dodd, says, "The only attractive areas" are those that have been immune to takeover speculation.  He finds three: "ugly cyclicals," such as General Motors and steel stocks; utilities, such as Gulf States Utilities, Entergy and Long Island Lighting; and thrifts trading at discounts to book value, such as FirstFed Michigan.  Nearly everyone, these days, says he's interested in "value."  Mr. Black calls it "the most misused word in the English language."  Purists buy at discounts to conservative measures of asset value or at low P-Es, and are content to hold stocks for several years.  They shun market timing -- buying a stock on a bet that it or its group will come into favor.  "The operative word is absolute value," says Charles H. Brandes, president of Brandes Investment Management.  If cellular stocks trade at 30 times earnings, many people would say that one at 20 times earnings is cheap.  Mr. Brandes -- an absolutist -- would call it dear.  He says stocks should offer a return well ahead of bonds to compensate for the increased risk.  With triple-A bonds yielding 9%, he looks for stocks with a P-E of 6 to 7.  Among his picks: Ford Motor, which has one of the lowest P-Es of any big, healthy company, and healthy savings and loans that have high levels of equity, mundane loan portfolios and low prices relative to book.  United Federal Bancorp trades at 13.  Its tangible book value is 18 a share, Mr. Brandes says.  Its loan portfolio consists of single-family homes in Pennsylvania.  "No construction loans.  No junk bonds," Mr. Brandes says.  "You're essentially buying cash at a discount."  The voguish practice of "tactical asset allocation" -- switching in and out of stocks and bonds based on formulaic strategies -- isn't part of the value investor's playbook.  Most consider such tactics a distraction from fundamental value.  Nonetheless, value investors are gradually moving into cash because they are running out of stocks that meet their standards.  Robert Lange, a low P-E fan who is co-manager of Lindner Fund, likes Norsk Hydro, the big Norwegian energy, fertilizer and metals concern, for its natural gas reserves.  But, because of a shortage of such ideas, his cash position is 19%, up from 3% earlier in the year.  Stephen Farley, president of recently formed Farley Capital, says, "I am advising a pension fund that is 100% in cash.  I think there are some great companies that we will be able to buy at lower prices."  Michael Price, president of Mutual Shares Corp., says his cash position is "25% and moving north."  Including his stakes in liquidating assets and other special situations, Mr. Price says the nonstock portion of his portfolio is closer to 50%.  Among his stocks, Mr. Price likes Time, a long-term holding and Wall Street darling -- and not generally popular among other value investors.  He says if the stock was worth $200 a share to failed suitor Paramount, it's worth almost that much even after Time's merger with Warner.  "If you're a die-hard Graham-and-Dodder it's almost impossible," Mr. Price says.  "If you start moving a little bit {from Graham and Dodd} you can make cases for some stocks, but you don't want to move much."  The Federal National Mortgage Association said it has set up special teams to help thrifts decide whether to sell or to securitize their mortgage holdings to meet tougher capital requirements.  Fannie Mae's new marketing push targets small and medium-sized savings and loan associations nationwide that have had little or no experience with the secondary market, according to Dale P. Riordan, Fannie Mae's executive vice president for marketing.  The federally chartered, publicly traded company operates a secondary market for home loans, buying loans and securitizing most of them -- that is, packaging most of them into securities for sale to investors while holding a portion in its own portfolio.  The teams will start work Sept. 25 in Fannie Mae's five regional offices in Atlanta, Chicago, Dallas, Los Angeles and Philadelphia.  To drum up business, Fannie Mae will begin an advertising campaign in trade publications and has set up toll-free telephone numbers in each of the regional offices.  The teams will analyze thrifts' mortgage portfolios to determine the best course of action to put the institutions in compliance with the new capital standards, which will be phased in beginning later this year.  Under the new savings and loan bailout law, thrifts that don't meet the new capital requirements must submit by February a plan showing how they intend to reach compliance.  The new capital standards could significantly boost business for Fannie Mae and its secondary-market rival, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., as thrifts take action to reduce risk and increase liquidity by selling or securitizing their mortgage portfolios.  To meet the new standards, many thrifts are considering the sale of branches, stock offerings or mergers.  The secondary market provides another option, Mr. Riordan said.  Mr. Riordan estimated that the value of whole mortgage loans at thrifts with tangible net worth of 1.5% or less might total as much as $100 billion.  At this point, however, "it's hard to tell how much extra business is there for Fannie Mae," Mr. Riordan said.  One of the new teams' tasks will be determining the volume of business and identifying potential new products.  Mr. Riordan estimated that about 30% of the nation's thrifts are Fannie Mae customers in any year.  Under the new S&L bailout law, the amount of capital a thrift must maintain is linked to the amount of risk in its lending.  The required capital will average about 8% of risk-adjusted assets, but the legislation established a minimum of at least 3%.  Currently, nearly 900 S&Ls with $500 billion in assets would fail the 3% capital test.  Freddie Mac, as the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. is known, began a year and a half ago to court thrifts that need to restructure to meet risk-based capital requirements, according to Michael Salb, Freddie Mac's Northeast regional vice president.  In the past seven months, he said, the regional office has completed transactions totaling $2.5 billion that were "designed solely to meet risk-based capital requirements."  The company, he said, has already identified many other thrifts that will need help in restructuring.  Fannie Mae said that initially two or three team members will be assigned to each regional office and that the number could grow to seven or more in each office if demand accelerates.  Altogether, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy about one of every four mortgages originated in the U.S.  Canfor Corp. said it retained New York's Salomon Brothers Inc. to seek potential buyers of its lumber-product operations in northern Alberta, which include a plywood plant and three sawmills.  Peter Bentley, Canfor chairman and chief executive officer, wouldn't estimate the value of the assets, though he said they should fetch "a very significant dollar amount."  Last year, the facilities produced about 440 million board feet of lumber, or 37% of the forest-products concern's total, and 70 million square feet of plywood.  Mr. Bentley said Canfor has received "some expressions of interest" in the operations, but there haven't been any formal discussions with potential buyers.  He said he expects the unit of New York-based Salomon Inc. to begin circulating an information package within a few days.  He said Canfor, with 1988 sales of 1.08 billion Canadian dollars (US$910.4 million), decided to seek buyers for the assets because Canfor's existing capital spending commitments elsewhere would make it "imprudent" to spend the funds needed to integrate pulp and lumber production in northern Alberta.  Canfor and its partner, Japan's Oji Paper Co., announced plans to spend C$1 billion to build a newsprint mill and expand pulp output at jointly owned Howe Sound Pulp & Paper Ltd. Canfor is also spending C$150 million on environmental-improvement measures at its pulp and paper mills in Prince George, British Columbia.  3Com Corp., Santa Clara, Calif., said it will report a profit for its first quarter, rather than the loss it had expected.  The computer-networking products maker said it estimated "positive earnings per share" for the quarter ended Aug. 31.  Sales were put at about $89 million.  The company posted profit of $7.1 million on sales of $82 million the year earlier.  The company had said it might post a loss because of lower prices and disappointing sales in June and July. 3Com attributed its reversal to good August sales and a good response by customers to new products.  Separately, 3Com said Friday that its board adopted a stock-purchase rights plan, which declares a dividend distribution of one common stock purchase right on each common share outstanding.  Each right will entitle a holder to buy one-half share of common at an exercise price of $50.  Shareholders will be able to exercise the rights after a public announcement that anyone has acquired 20% or more of 3Com's common stock without board approval, or after a public tender offer for 20% or more of the stock.  IMA Holdings Corp. again extended its $28-a-share tender offer for 94% of the shares of American Medical International Inc.  IMA, an investment group that includes the Pritzker family of Chicago and First Boston Corp., extended its $3.35 billion offer for the hospital chain until 12:01 a.m. EDT Sept. 28.  It was to expire today.  This was the third extension of the offer, originally set to expire Aug. 9.  IMA didn't give a reason for the delay and a spokeswoman said that further information wasn't available.  The offer is for as many as 68.8 million of American Medical's common shares.  IMA said that as of Thursday, it had received tenders for about 40.4 million shares, including shares issuable upon conversion of convertible debentures.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, American Medical shares fell 25 cents each to $24.375.  The tender offer extension was announced after the close of trading.  John Wiley & Sons Inc. said that certain assets of its nursing and health-publishing program were sold to Delmar Publishers Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  Wiley, a New York publisher of scientific, technical and college textbooks, said it also agreed with another publisher to sell books and editorial packages from its remedial mathematics and occupational programs.  The amount of the sale wasn't disclosed.  The transaction is subject to a definitive agreement.  A company spokesman said the businesses were being sold because they are "specialized and don't fit our global strategy."  Delmar, an Albany, N.Y., publisher of educational textbooks and reference books, is an affiliate of Thomson Corp., formerly known as International Thomson Organisation Ltd.  Price Stern Sloan Inc. said the Scottish investment firm backing a proposed management buy-out of the company's U.K. subsidiary has withdrawn its current offer "due to the loss of a potential partner."  Price Stern Sloan, a publishing company, didn't identify the Scottish investment firm or elaborate on the offer, and company officials weren't available for comment.  In a company statement, L. Lawrence Sloan, chairman and chief executive officer, said that although the company will continue to pursue a sale of the U.K. operation, "significant cuts will be made in all areas in an effort to bring about profitability."  He added that the failure to sell the unit in the third quarter, as previously expected, will have an adverse effect on financial results this year.  Poor results at the subsidiary have put a drain on company-wide earnings.  Last year, Price Stern Sloan had a net loss of $772,000 on sales of $56.5 million.  A U.S. bankruptcy trustee has named Neal Batson, an Atlanta lawyer, as an examiner to investigate whether Southmark Corp.'s management mismanaged the company and misled investors before it sought bankruptcy-law protection.  Southmark, a Dallas-based real estate and thrift concern, requested that an examiner be appointed to investigate the allegations made in several shareholder lawsuits, which charge that two former executives, among others, defrauded investors and engaged in transactions that benefited them personally.  Mr. Batson's appointment is subject to approval by an Atlanta bankruptcy judge.  Mr. Batson, a partner with Alston & Bird, said he is expected to seek court approval to name his law firm as his counsel.  Southmark filed under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code in July in an effort to restructure about 1.2 billion in debt.  Under Chapter 11, a company continues to operate but is protected from creditor lawsuits while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debts.  Two weeks before a provincial election, the Quebec government, as expected, gave the go-ahead to a 200 million Canadian dollar ($168.6 million) pipeline from Sarnia, Ontario to Montreal.  The pipeline, to be built by the Soligaz consortium, will transport Western Canadian natural gas liquids to the petrochemical industry here.  The project was first proposed four years ago and until recently the Quebec government had insisted that the Canadian government help pay for the project.  However, Quebec Energy Minister John Ciaccia said the federal government won't participate in the financing.  The Quebec government will lend C$150 million to Soligaz.  Other financial details weren't available.  Soligaz officials couldn't be reached for comment.  The members of the Soligaz consortium are: Soquip, a Quebec government agency, with a 31.5% stake; Noverco Inc., a Montreal natural gas concern, 31.5%, Petromont Inc., a Montreal subsidiary of Union Carbide Corp.'s Union Carbide Canada Ltd. of Toronto, 31.5%; and SNC Group Inc., a Montreal engineering concern, 5.5%.  Mr. Ciaccia said construction will begin in mid-1990 and is expected to be completed in 1992.  He said Soligaz will spend an additional C$210 million to build storage, distribution and other facilities in Montreal.  Tektronix Inc., Beaverton, Ore., reported a loss of $1.9 million in its first quarter ended Aug. 19.  In the year-ago period, the electronics concern had net income of $7.4 million.  Sales in the recent quarter fell 2% to $294.1 million from $301 million.  Tektronix said it had started the quarter with an unusually small backlog of orders.  Also, new products in the pipeline, including a graphics workstation, semiconductor test equipment and lab instruments, haven't begun to contribute to sales yet, the company said.  Results were lower than expected but weren't too surprising, said Stephen Balog, analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  The loss is part of a long pattern of disappointment, he said.  Tektronix's traditional markets -- measurement instruments such as oscilloscopes -- aren't growing much, Mr. Balog said, and the company's attempts to find new markets haven't been successful.  In composite trading Friday on the New York Stock Exchange, Tektronix closed unchanged at $21.25 a share.  International Holding Capital Corp. said in Honolulu that it is discussing the acquisition of all its shares outstanding with a potential investor.  International Holding, the holding company of International Savings & Loan Association Ltd., said it is discussing a merger in which the investor would pay all cash for International Holding's stock.  The company said it expects that price per share, if an agreement is reached, to exceed book value.  The sale wouldn't bring about significant changes in management, operations or personnel, the company said.  Selection Is Limited  On Leftover '89 Models  BUYERS who have waited for bargains at the end of the model year will find slim pickings on some products.  With less than one month left in the 1989 model year, generous rebates and the certainty of higher prices on 1990 vehicles have already resulted in a shortage of many popular models.  Supplies vary by region, but among the scarcest are Mercury Grand Marquis, Ford LTD Crown Victoria and Buick LeSabre cars, plus the least expensive Jeep Cherokee sport-utility vehicles.  "We haven't had LeSabres for maybe a week or so," says Joseph A. Barry, a dealer in Newport, R.I.  "In fact, I bought a few from other dealers because we ran out of them."  Volvo 740 sedans are in short supply, along with 240 station wagons, so there's not much discounting.  "At this point dealers have relatively little financial incentive to let them go at what customers used to think of as year-end clearance prices," says a U.S. spokesman.  The wallflowers of the 1989 model year are easy to spot: In most cases, just look for the vehicles with the biggest buyer incentives.  Chevrolet recently doubled rebates on some S-10 trucks to $1,000, and Sterling Motor Cars will begin advertising today rebates as high as $5,000.  There also are lots of Pontiac Grand Prix coupes, Oldsmobile Toronado luxury cars and Suzukis of almost any size and style.  Quirky Infiniti Ads  Arouse Curiosity  INFINITI'S CAR ads without cars are generating lots of questions from consumers.  Nissan Motor Co.'s new luxury division has fielded some 31,000 calls since its esoteric ads began appearing in auto enthusiast magazines last January.  Ads feature rocks and trees, but no cars, partly to "create curiosity and interest," says Peter Bossis, the division's marketing director.  A national campaign using some of the same ads began Aug. 28 in general-interest publications.  Infiniti runs different toll-free phone numbers in the two campaigns to track respondents.  Among the most frequent questions: When do the cars go on sale (Nov. 8), what's the price ($38,000 for the Q45 sedan and $23,500 for the M30 coupe), what are the colors and where's the nearest dealer.  "No one has called up and flat-out asked what an Infiniti is," says Robert Blinick, senior vice president for Hill, Holliday, Connors, Cosmopulos, the cars' ad agency.  But some people do want to know why they should wait for Infiniti when luxury cars from Toyota Motor Corp. and Honda Motor Co. are already on sale.  Mr. Blinick says Infiniti's operators suggest callers delay their decision until they've taken a test drive in the new Nissan cars.  "Bona fide prospects" are divided into three groups, says Mr. Blinick: An "A" prospect drives "the right kind of car," meaning a European or Japanese luxury model, and plans to buy in the next three months.  "B" prospects meet one of the two criteria; "C" prospects satisfy neither.  But all get the same "fulfillment packages" in the mail: a slick brochure and four letters.  One thing callers don't automatically get is a video of the cars in action, says Mr. Bossis.  That goes only to prospects in a separate, direct-mail campaign.  These are people "who haven't raised their hand" and indicated they want to know about Infiniti, he says.  "You have to work harder with them, show them a little bit more."  Car Makers Focus More  On Service Advisers  THAT PERSON with the clipboard who greets customers at dealer service departments has a lot to do with how owners feel about their cars.  The job of service adviser is one of the most pressured and thankless at any dealership.  But it's also becoming "one of the most important," says Lee Miskowski, general manager of Ford Motor Co.'s parts and service division.  Ford and several other auto makers are working to upgrade the image and skills of these front-line employees.  This is critical for success in the increasingly competitive U.S. market, according to the recent Customer Satisfaction Index survey by J.D. Power & Associates.  The market research firm found that "excellent service advisers correlate with higher (customer satisfaction) rankings."  And what constitutes excellence?  Mainly the ability to deal with grumpy owners, understand their problems and translate those complaints into technical language for the mechanics.  Now, Plush Pickups  Are All the Rage VAN CONVERSION companies find a growing business in dressing up the lowly work truck.  Starcraft Corp.'s pickup conversions are up 20% to 25% in the 1989 model year to about 1,000 trucks.  The Goshen, Ind., firm plans to spend "a lot of time on trucks next year to more finely tune packages to age groups and regions," says Don Cuzzocrea, chairman and president.  Centurion Vehicles Inc., of White Pigeon, Mich., divides customers for fancy pickups -- which can sport equally fancy price tags -- into two broad categories: younger male buyers who hanker after "trick trucks" with "lots of chrome on the outside," and older, more affluent buyers with $200,000 boats and $40,000 horse trailers to tow, says Vice President Stephen J. Pasquale.  More sophisticated customers choose what Mr. Pasquale calls "Cowboy Cadillacs."  They're luxury trucks with such amenities as leather-wrapped steering wheels and wood consoles -- sometimes fitted with color TV sets -- tucked between reclining bucket seats.  Child World Inc. reported a widened loss for the second quarter, ended July 29, despite a 9.4% sales gain.  A spokesman for the Avon, Mass., toy retailer, which normally records more than half its sales and all its profit in the fourth quarter, said it continues to expect a profit for the full year.  For the second quarter, Child World reported a loss of $5.1 compared with a loss of $2.6 million the year before.  Sales rose to $136.6 million from $124.9 million.  The retailer said that comparable-store sales rose 2.9% in the second quarter, "stimulated by our new merchandising programs including the World of Nintendo, clearance programs and a new store layout" designed to feature seasonal merchandise.  Child World blamed higher interest costs and advertising expenses for the widened loss.  For the six months, it reported a loss of $10.3 million compared with a loss of $7 million.  Sales rose 9.7% to $268.3 million from $244.5 million.  Roger D. Benson, an independent investor, raised his stake in GTS Corp., Houston, to 13.6% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Benson said he holds 367,000 GTS common shares, including 194,500 shares purchased Aug. 24 through Aug. 31 for about $1.20 a share.  Mr.Benson, of Norwalk, Conn., also intends to ask for a seat on GTS's board.  No reason for his boost in stake was mentioned in the filing.  A spokesman for GTS couldn't be reached for comment.  If you're going to invest in new stock issues, does it matter where they are traded?  Take a quick look at some new statistics, and you might jump to the conclusion that the answer is yes.  The statistics show that initial public offerings traded in the Nasdaq over-the-counter market have outperformed new issues on the New York Stock Exchange and the American Stock Exchange for much of the past 20 months.  The numbers were compiled by the National Association of Securities Dealers, which oversees trading in the OTC market, and published in a newsletter sent to companies whose shares are traded through the computerized Nasdaq trading system.  Individual investors may be hearing about the statistics from hungry brokers eager for almost any piece of news that might help lure customers back into stocks.  And the numbers will surely add fuel to the heated competition for stock listings among the three stock markets.  But analysts caution that there's more to picking a winning IPO than simply figuring out where a new stock is going to be traded.  "Life is seldom that kind," says Norman Fosback, who edits several investment newsletters from Fort Lauderdale, Fla.  Even Gene Finn, NASD's chief economist, says it would be dangerous to draw too many conclusions from the statistics his staff compiled.  Investors don't buy markets, he says, "they buy companies.  Markets can provide better or worse liquidity or more or less competitive conditions, but it's really the company's {fundamentals} that determine the ultimate values."  Robert Natale, editor of Standard & Poor's Emerging & Special Situations newsletter, agrees.  He says investors should be more concerned about "the quality of the underwriting, rather than whether {the stock} is going to be listed on an exchange."  Skeptics contend that the risk-riddled IPO arena is no place for small investors, who they say are often at a disadvantage compared with larger institutional buyers.  Investment advisers tell those who are fearless enough to shop in the IPO market to ignore the hyperbole -- and not to look for simple answers.  The NASD statistics cover the period from the beginning of 1988 through the end of last month.  For each market, NASD compiled indexes that included every new issue since 1986.  Over that period there were 323 IPOs on the Nasdaq National Market System, while the New York Stock Exchange had 120 new issues and the American Stock Exchange had 69.  The NASD then tracked each group's weekly price performance.  The initial price used for each issue was its closing price at the end of the first week of trading -- a statistical choice that eliminated the sharp price increases that can accompany the start of trading in a new issue that is priced too low at its offering.  For the full 20 months, the statistics show that the Nasdaq IPOs rose 44%, while the new issues on the Amex surged 52% and those on the Big Board gained 18%.  Over the same period, the Nasdaq Composite Index was up 41%, while the Amex index was up 46% and the Big Board composite gained 41%.  But it is only in the past three months that the new issues on the American exchange have taken the lead.  Until June, when the Amex composite first broke through the high it hit before the 1987 crash, the Nasdaq issues had a clear lead.  Through June 9, Nasdaq IPOs were up 46%, while those on the Amex were up 43% and those on the Big Board had gained 15.5%.  Since June 9, however, the Amex issues have raced ahead.  They have gained 6%, while the Big Board issues have increased 2% and the Nasdaq IPOs have slipped 1.5%.  Analysts say there are all sorts of reasons why the IPOs on one market might outperform those on another over a particular period.  For one thing, smaller stocks have outperformed larger issues for much of the span covered in NASD's statistics.  So, that probably helped the new issues on the OTC market, which are generally smaller than those headed for the Big Board.  Another factor is that IPOs on the OTC market have tended to sprout in industries that are currently in favor on Wall Street.  For instance, Network General, a maker of computer networking software and up 145% from it $8-a-share February offering price, went public just after such issues caught fire.  Often, IPOs on the OTC market are also faster-growing companies.  By comparison, many of the recent new issues on the listed exchanges are spinoffs of giant companies, says Mr. Fosback, the Florida newsletter editor whose publications include New Issues.  Those IPOs are "big, relatively stodgy companies that never were looked upon as your classic, jazzy IPO," he says.  "So, you wouldn't expect huge run-ups in {their stock} prices."  Moreover, Mr. Natale, the S&P newsletter editor, suggests that some new issues on the OTC market may perform better because they receive continued attention from their underwriters after the IPO is completed.  The companies that back an IPO on the OTC market typically are among the stock's market makers.  And the stock may be more heavily promoted by the firm's brokers and get more attention from securities analysts at the underwriting company than some new stocks traded on exchanges.  OTC market makers maintain orderly trading in a stock by buying and selling shares when imbalances occur.  On exchanges, the job is handled by one securities company, known as the specialist, who probably wasn't involved in the IPO.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index gained 1.63 to 471.31.  For the week, the composite was nearly flat, while the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index lost 1.2% and the Dow Jones Industrial Average dropped 1.5%.  The Nasdaq 100 Index improved 2.91 to 445.31, while the Nasdaq Financial Index eased 0.07 to 468.66.  Volume was a little more than 130 million shares.  MCI Communications led the OTC most active list with a 1 3/8 point gain to 41 5/8 on volume of more than 4.7 million shares.  The stock, which rose 7% for the week, benefited from positive recommendations from Morgan Stanley and Prudential-Bache Securities.  Campeau fell 2 1/8 to 15 7/8.  The company is proposing a financial restructuring plan that includes selling its Bloomingdale's department stores division.  The plan is designed to reduce some of the company's mountainous debt.  International Holding Capital, the Honolulu-based holding company of International Savings & Loan Association, surged 4 to 23, its second 52-week high in as many days.  International Holding said it is in talks to be acquired.  A slew of biotechnology stocks were higher.  Xoma gained 1 1/4 to 23.  Genetics Institute rose 1 1/4 to 28 1/2.  Shearson Lehman Hutton recommended both stocks.  Amgen also rose 1 1/4 to 42 3/4.  Cetus gained 1/2 to 17 1/8 and Chiron finished at 26 1/4, up 1/2.  But Biogen slipped 1/4 to 13 3/4.  Amcast Industrial Corp. said in Dayton, Ohio, that it sold its cast products group, consisting of three iron castings plants, for $11.3 million.  The buyer is Advanced Cast Products Inc., a new company formed by management of the cast products group and certain outside investors, including Citicorp.  Sale of the business, which has annual sales of $30 million, will have "no financial impact" on Amcast, said L. W. Ladehoff, chairman and chief executive officer.  Proceeds will be used to reduce debt and to continue purchases of Amcast common stock, he said.  The sale is part of a restructuring of Amcast from a foundry concern to a manufacturer of flow control products and engineered parts for auto, aerospace, construction and general industry use, Mr. Ladehoff said.  The company previously sold or closed a number of iron foundries.  A San Diego court ordered the appointment of Pace Group Inc., a consultant to the health-care industry, as receiver for Greater San Diego Health Plan.  The court also scheduled a hearing on Friday.  Greater San Diego Health Plan is an individual-practice association health-maintenance organization with a network of 26 hospitals and about 1,500 physicians.  On Friday, the California Department of Corporations filed suit against Greater San Diego Health Plan, seeking dissolution of the HMO and appointment of a receiver.  The suit also seeks an order approving transfer of the firm's health-care contracts to an Aetna Life & Casualty Co. program known as the Choice Healthcare plan.  The suit comes about a month after Western Health Plans Inc., which runs the Greater San Diego Health Plan, said it reached an agreement to transfer the HMO's subscriber base and other assets to a venture made up of Aetna's life insurance unit, Partners National Health Plans and a group of seven San Diego area hospital systems.  If the transaction is completed, Western Health Plans said, it won't be an operating company.  Rafael Adorno paid $3.30 recently to cash a paycheck at the E.G.I. Check Cashing storefront in lower Manhattan.  Mr. Adorno, a young New York bluecollar worker, explains that he willingly paid the hefty fee because he doesn't have a bank account.  Mr. Adorno isn't an oddity.  An estimated 22% of adults don't have a bank account, according to the American Association of Retired Persons.  Instead, they rely on costly check-cashing outlets and money orders to manage their finances.  Consumer advocates claim that many of these people would like to have a checking account but lack the minimum sum required to open an account or else can't maintain the necessary minimum balances.  Free checking for low-balance customers vanished with free gifts of toasters when Congress lifted interest rate ceilings on bank deposits in the early 1980s.  As banks raised rates to attract savings deposits, they could no longer afford to provide checking free of charge to low balance customers.  In the New York City area, many banks require a $3,000 minimum balance to qualify for free checking.  As the pricing of basic financial services has risen, consumer groups have tried unsuccessfully to get Congress to force all banks and thrifts to offer low-cost checking services to low-income consumers.  Efforts to tag this requirement to major banking legislation, such as the $166 billion thrift rescue bill this year, failed.  This fall, however, consumer groups will mount a major legislative drive to get Congress to mandate that all banks and thrifts offer low-cost checking.  Two Democrats, Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio) and Rep. Richard Lehman (D., Calif.) have introduced bills, and hearings are scheduled to begin next month.  "This will be a high priority for this subcommittee," says Scott Nishioki, staff director for the consumer affairs and coinage subcommittee of the House Banking Committtee.  Ken McEldowney of Consumer Action, a San Francisco group, says, "The banks always say, 'We're not a utility,' when they make the argument that they shouldn't be required to offer low-cost checking.  But after the thrift bailout legislation, it's a lot harder to make that argument.  It's time for them to give something back to the community."  Under the proposed legislation, banks and thrifts would be required to offer accounts that could be opened with $25, require no minimum balance, allow the depositor to write 10 free checks a month and charge a "reasonable" fee.  A key point in the debate will be determining just what types of accounts currently are available to low-income persons.  A study by the Better Business Bureau of Metropolitan New York, just released, finds that the cost of checking accounts varies widely.  At the high-cost end of the spectrum, for instance, is one Bank of New York account -- its Investor's Choice money market account.  That account isn't intended to be used as a transactional account, so it allows three free checks a month but charges $20 for each additional check written.  And Roosevelt Savings Bank's Money Market Extra account requires a $10,000 minimum balance.  But one conclusion that can be drawn from the Better Business Bureau survey is that low-cost checking accounts -- in New York, at least -- are far more available than many critics suggest.  The Better Business Bureau's study looked at 117 checking accounts offered by 31 banks.  It found that 15 banks offer a total of 16 non-interest bearing accounts and one interest-bearing one that meet the proposed federal definition of low-cost checking.  The cost of these non-interest bearing accounts ranged from no charge to $10.50 a month.  Moreover, the big New York banks -- including leaders Citibank, a unit of Citicorp, Chemical Bank, a unit of Chemical Banking Corp., Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co, a unit of Manufacturers Hanover Corp., and Chase Manhattan Bank, a unit of Chase Manhattan Corp. -- offer checking accounts that meet the proposed federal definition.  It is estimated that there are 2.1 million households in the New York region that earn less than $25,000 a year and currently aren't in the banking mainstream.  Both Citibank and Chemical Bank, the two banks with the biggest market shares in New York, offer nearly identical accounts to appeal to this group.  The accounts require $1 to open, charge a fee of $4 a month, have no minimum balance and allow six monthly withdrawals via checks or automated tellers free of charge. {To discourage more affluent customers from using such accounts, the banks charge 75 cents for each additional check.}  Pamela Flaherty, Citibank's Northeast division executive, says it now has 20,000 low-cost accounts, up sharply from 15,000 last January, out of more than one million retail consumer accounts.  Mrs. Flaherty says the marketplace rather than Congress should determine what products banks should offer.  But if Citibank only responded to the marketplace, it would never offer products such as low-cost checking, which Mrs. Flaherty says is a money-loser.  Low-cost accounts are offered basically a "quasi-public service," Mrs. Flaherty says.  "We have such a high profile that it's probably appropriate for us."  Peggy Miller of the Washington, D.C.-based Consumer Federation of America, a proponent of federal legislation on low-cost accounts, says she is unfamiliar with the Better Business Bureau's methodology, but nevertheless says the results, if they hold up under scrutiny, represent "a major improvement.  It's wonderful.  I had heard that the New York banks were trying to move quickly on this issue."  If anything, she says, the New York survey buttresses the argument for legislation: "This refutes the banks' past arguments.  It shows that they can afford to do this."  The Consumer Bankers Association, a Washington, D.C.-based trade group, applauds the Better Business Bureau study, too.  Joseph Belew, executive director of the group, says, "It's good.  It means that as institutions have adapted to interestrate deregulation they have recognized that there is a legitimate need on the part of some people for low-cost checking.  I very strongly think that this is a bogus issue."  One facet that the Better Business Bureau survey didn't explore was the banks' identification requirements for opening such accounts.  Mr. McEldowney of Consumer Action said a survey of California institutions last May found that a number of institutions that offer low-cost accounts required a credit card as one of two forms of identification to open an account.  Mr. McEldowney argues that it is highly unlikely that someone who lacks a checking account would have a credit card.  He says the May survey found a "general lack of availability of low-cost accounts.  It's been fairly consistent over the years.  Only about 25% to 30% of the institutions offer low-cost accounts, and these are generally smaller savings and loans without much market penetration."  Thomas Howe, senior vice president for products and services at Fleet/Norstar Financial Group Inc., a large Northeast banking company, disputes such assertions: "We have eight different banks, and each one has some sort of life-line checking.  We see banks in all the markets that we're in offering some form of this service."  He says studies have suggested that the true costs of servicing a checking account amount to about $100 a year.  "We are certainly not making money on these accounts," he adds.  Though more banks appear to be offering low-cost checking, few, if any, appear prepared to support the legislation.  "We certainly don't like the specifics of such accounts dictated to us," he says.  Even though there are cheaper alternatives through banks to check cashers and money order firms, consumers won't necessarily automatically take advantage of them.  Consider Mr. Adorno, the young New Yorker who paid $3.30 to cash his paycheck.  Mr. Adorno shrugs his shoulders when asked why he doesn't use a bank instead and says, "The lines at the bank are longer."  Bankers say they don't know why so many people use check-cashers and money orders instead of low-cost checking accounts.  Alan Silberstein, senior vice president and head of Chemical Bank's consumer business in New York, says, "Pricing isn't an issue.  Whether it's a desire to keep exact after-tax income hidden from family members or whatever, I don't profess to understand.  Beyond that, in spite of our best efforts, a lot of folks find banking very intimidating."  Japan's imports of manufactured goods totaled $51.06 billion in the first half of 1989, exceeding the $50 billion level for the first time, a semi-governmental trade promotion agency reported.  The Japan External Trade Organization also said that overall imports in the first half amounted to $102.4 billion, topping the $100 billion mark for the first time.  Esterline Corp. said it agreed to buy six commercial aerospace and defense operations from a privately held New York investment firm.  Esterline said it will pay $147.5 million for six units owned by the firm, Dyson-Kissner-Moran Corp., and for Dyson's 23% stake in Esterline.  The six operations are units of Criton Technologies, which Dyson acquired in 1982.  Esterline, a maker of factory-automation equipment, also will assume $3 million of Criton's debt as part of the transaction, the company said.  The new operations will help Esterline diversify and balance its exposure to the capital-goods and semiconductor industries' cycles, said Wendell Hurlburt, Esterline president.  Criton Technologies' management took over management of Esterline in 1987.  Esterline then managed Criton under contract with Dyson.  Under the agreement, Dyson will retain two Criton operations while Esterline will acquire six units: Armtech Defense Products Co. of Coachella, Calif., Hytech Finishes Co. of Kent, Wash., Korry Electronics Co. of Seattle, Midcon Cables Co. of Joplin, Mo., Republic Electronics Co., Hauppauge, N.Y., and TA Manufacturing Co. of Glendale, Calif.  The six units have annual sales of about $110 million and operating earnings of more than $15 million, Esterline said.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Esterline's share price closed unchanged at $12.25.  The Chicago Board of Trade's chairman and vice chairman are among the six directors whose firms held short positions while the exchange's board was forcing Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. to scale back its soybean holdings in July.  The CBOT's action sent the commodity's price tumbling, which created profits for investors holding short positions.  The names of the six were disclosed at a Senate Agriculture Committee hearing on the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, which oversees the commodity exchanges.  The CFTC recently said it didn't find any conflicts of interest among the CBOT directors.  The CBOT vote was 16-1, with three directors not voting, to order Ferruzzi, an Italian grain merchant, to liquidate its huge position in the July soybean futures contract.  None of the directors who voted had a personal stake in July soybeans, the agency said.  Most of the positions of the six directors were for customer accounts that were being serviced by directors' firms.  But three of the directors' firms, including that of CBOT Chairman Karsten "Kash" Mahlmann, held substantial short positions in firm accounts.  Mr. Mahlmann's firm, Stotler & Co., held a short position of 110,000 bushels of soybeans.  Mr. Mahlmann didn't vote because the chairman casts a ballot only in the case of ties.  He participated in the discussions leading up to the vote, however.  L.I.T. America, the firm that employs Patrick Arbor, the CBOT's vice chairman, had a 420,000-bushel short position for customer accounts.  Cargill Investor Services, a unit of Cargill Inc., Minneapolis, held the largest short position by any firm associated with a director, totaling 910,000 bushels.  CBOT Director Hal P. Hansen is president of Cargill Investor.  A Senate aide said the panel "simply raised the question in order to clear the air."  He noted that "the CFTC has performed interviews and has found no reason to feel there was wrongdoing."  Nevertheless, the disclosures come at a time when many farm-state senators are particularly sensitive to the furor the CBOT move caused in their home states.  The CBOT's action forced down soybean futures prices 5% on the day of the order.  That price plunge benefited traders who had a short position in the July futures contract because they could buy back contracts for less than they sold them.  That allowed them to end their delivery obligation and pocket the price difference.  Other directors whose firms held short positions were: Donald G. Andrew, Shearson Lehman Hutton; Lester Mouscher, Lee B. Stern & Co.; and Irwin Smith, Rosenthal-Collins.  Over the weekend, none of the Board of Trade directors could be reached for comment.  Separately, President Bush named Margot E. Machol to membership on the CFTC, taking the term of Robert R. Davis.  Ms. Machol had been a member of the Federal Trade Commission last year.  Her confirmation is likely to become a lightning rod for senators' anger over the CFTC.  For example, at the committee's hearing, Sen. Thomas Daschle (D., S.D.) told CFTC staffers, "Each time I hear of the CFTC's involvement in something I'm less impressed about their judgment."  DWG Corp.'s chairman, financier Victor Posner, reiterated his intention not to sell Arby's Inc. to a group of franchisees that offered more than $200 million for the restaurant concern.  Arby's, a unit of Miami-based DWG, "is not for sale," Mr. Posner said in a letter sent Friday to all franchisees.  He said he sees no reason to sell because he is "extremely pleased" with the company's operating results under current management.  Two weeks ago, R.B. Partners Ltd., consisting of eight of Arby's largest franchisees, made their offer for Arby's Inc., which is the marketing, franchising and service company for the 2,100-store restaurant chain.  In his letter, Mr. Posner also said he doesn't intend to sever his relations with AFA Service Corp., the marketing arm of Arby's that is owned by franchisees.  As the pace of mergers quickens in Europe's $170 billion electronics industry, a question echos in stockbrokers' offices and industry boardrooms: Who is next?  "There's a broad recognition that partnerships are necessary" to compete internationally, says analyst Piers Whitehead of Robert Fleming Securities Ltd. Now, he says, it is just "a question of who is going to be next to crack."  One of the industry's biggest, Britain's Plessey Co., cracked Friday.  After nearly 10 months of takeover warfare, the country's second-biggest electronics company conceded defeat to two bigger rivals General Electric Co. of Britain and Siemens AG of West Germany.  The bidding partners said they had won control of 62.1% of Plessey's shares outstanding, and hoped to scoop up most of the remainder this week under their #2 billion ($3.1 billion) takeover offer.  But there are plenty of merger candidates left, as industry players rush to reshape their businesses in anticipation of a unified European market after 1992.  "The consolidation phase isn't over" in European electronics, says Paolo Fresco, senior vice president, international for U.S.-based General Electric Co., which isn't related to Britain's GEC.  "There is still excessive fragmentation in the market, and I expect there will be more" mergers, he says.  In defense electronics, three players -- N.V. Philips of the Netherlands, and Thorn EMI PLC and Racal Electronics PLC of Britain -- have hung "For Sale" signs on various of their defense units.  Intermittent takeover speculation about a fourth player, Britain's Ferranti PLC, is reviving as London traders place bets on whether Siemens or GEC will add to a 2% Ferranti stake that they will get with their Plessey purchase.  Plessey acquired the stake last spring.  GEC Managing Director Lord Weinstock declined to comment on plans for the Ferranti holding.  In data processing, too, "a big bout of restructuring" is about to start, says Kevin Morgan, an electronics-industry analyst at the Science Policy Research Unit of Britain's University of Sussex.  Slowing sales, strategic errors and slumping profits have hit three of Europe's biggest computer companies, making potential merger candidates of Norsk Data AS of Norway, Nixdorf Computer AG of Germany, and Ing.C.  Olivetti & Co. of Italy.  A fourth company, the International Computers Ltd. unit of Britain's STC PLC, has said it is seeking partnerships on the Continent.  Hostile bids for any of these companies are unlikely, however, as all have big chunks of their stock locked up with friendly investors.  Other electronics markets, already washed once by the merger wave, will see further change, analysts predict.  In refrigerators, washers and other big household appliances, U.S.-based GE and Britain's GEC have been shopping jointly since since April to buy a European household appliance-maker as one possible way to expand their joint venture in that field.  Further consolidation is also expected in computer software, mobile communications and semiconductor manufacture.  Already, mergers have transformed much of the struggling electronics industry.  Since 1985, the Continent's telephone-exchange manufacturing industry has shrunk to seven big players from 11.  Mergers have likewise thinned the ranks of European-based semiconductor makers to eight from 13.  Driving most of these older mergers was a conventional need for pooling resources, expanding market share, and cutting costs.  The latest mergers, however, have extra urgency: besides anticipating 1992, they are responding to new opportunities opened up by European deregulation, says industry consultant Matthew Whitcombe of BIS Mackintosh Ltd. Morever, he says, slowing sales growth in some electronics sectors is also forcing mergers.  Another new wrinkle, analysts say, is the coming of Japanesese companies.  Though they will likely avoid big takeovers, several Japanese electronics giants are currently investigating small and medium-sized purchases in Europe, says Mamoru Miki, managing director of Cores Europe Ltd., a unit of Cores Corp., a Tokyo-based consulting firm.  Toshiba Corp. and Panasonic Ltd. are among the Japanese concerns hunting in West Germany to invest in companies strong in next-generation video technology -- so-called high definition television -- to ensure themselves a European foothold in that field.  And Sony Corp. considered joining the Plessey battle, as a possible investor in the British company's semiconductor business.  But there are already plenty of other predators in Europe, without the Japanese.  GEC and Siemens, fresh from their Plessey victory, are likely buyers.  Though Siemens hasn't an immediate target in mind, says the German company's acquisitions strategist Jochen Mackenrodt, it needs to expand its currently "weak" French and British operations with investments or acquisitions there.  And GEC's Lord Weinstock doesn't rule out further purchases: "The shape of GEC has never been static," he told journalists Friday.  For at least the next few weeks, however, executives of the two companies are likely to be preoccupied with digesting Plessey.  This week, they plan meetings in London to discuss further details of the takeover, such as exactly how they will split the bill.  Despite the two companies' 50-50 partnership, Siemens will end up paying more than half the acquisition price because GEC already controls some Plessey businesses through an earlier GEC-Plessey joint venture.  The 10-month Plessey battle ranked as the fiercest in European electronics.  As the two biggest players in the British market, GEC and Plessey had a long history of contract rivalry and animosity.  A takeover attempt by GEC in 1985-86 failed, and when GEC enlisted Siemens last November as its partner for a renewed bid, Plessey mounted a ferocious defense.  It lobbied and sued to block the bid, and even attempted a "Pac-Man" counterattack on GEC.  But once the British government cleared the takeover last month, the end came faster than expected.  On Thursday, the first date GEC and Siemens had set for counting Plessey shares tendered to them, the bidders found they were just 1.4% short of the 50% shareholding needed to declare victory.  On news of that Friday morning, further shares rushed into their nets.  By the end of the day, the bidders controlled 62.1%, and Plessey conceded defeat.  Dollar demand is still bubbling, so traders say the surging U.S. currency is heading for another run-in with central banks.  So far this year, the dollar has survived major monetary nations' aggressive efforts to weaken it.  But central banks aren't expected to stand back and let the dollar take flight to sharply higher levels.  "They're definitely not going to throw in the towel.  They're going to keep fighting it," says Lawrence Krohn, an international economist at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  From the looks of things, central banks may be on the battlefield for some time.  Currency analysts say the dollar may break through major resistance at two marks and 150 yen shortly, as it continues to draw strength from the healthy pace of U.S. economic growth and the relatively high U.S. interest rates that lure capital flows to dollar-denominated investments.  In late afternoon New York trading Friday, the dollar was at 1.9950 marks, up from 1.9800 marks late Thursday, and at 147.20 yen, up from 146.63 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5375, down from $1.5512.  In Tokyo Monday, the U.S. currency was trading lower late in the morning following intervention by the Bank of Japan.  After the intervention pushed the dollar to around 147.45 yen, it recovered and fluctuated at levels just below the opening quote of 147.75 yen; that was up from Tokyo's Friday close of 146.62 yen.  The dollar remains well above ranges of 1.70-1.90 marks and 120-140 yen, which are the bands the major monetary nations are widely believed to consider sufficient for a stable foreign-exchange market and the correction of global trade imbalances.  But officials from major industrial nations are set to meet in Paris Wednesday at the headquarters of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, and some currency analysts say the group may use the gathering as a chance to get its intervention act together.  Those nations, known as the G-10 although there are 11, are the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain, France, Canada, Italy, Switzerland, Belgium, Sweden and the Netherlands.  Officials from major monetary nations also will meet in Washington at the end of the month.  "Any time they get together, they might convince everybody that the program is not working as well as it could be" to hold the dollar down, says Charles Daley, chief dealer at First Pennsylvania Bank, Philadelphia.  "We're worried about them being even more serious this time {about selling dollars}.  The fear is there," he adds.  The Bank of Japan was seen selling dollars in Tokyo Friday around 146.75 yen, and traders suspect the Federal Reserve unloaded dollars secretly in New York at around 146.40 yen and 1.9800 marks.  On New York's Commodity Exchange Friday, gold for current delivery settled at $359.40 an ounce, down 80 cents.  Estimated volume was a light two million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $357.75 an ounce.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it lowered the senior debt rating of this Santa Monica, Calif., independent oil refiner to double-B-minus from double-B.  The ratings concern also lowered Tosco's preferred stock to single-B from single-B-plus, and Tosco International Finance N.V.'s subordinated stock to single-B from single B-plus.  S&P said the action "reflects the sharp jump in debt leverage from Tosco's diversification into the volatile fertilizer business."  About $537 million in debt and $184 million in preferred stock is outstanding for Tosco, S&P said.  All issues are removed from CreditWatch, where they were placed March 21.  ---  BIBB Co. -- Moody's Investors Service assigned a B2 rating to the proposed senior subordinated note issue of this Macon, Ga., textile company, formerly known as NTC Group Inc. Moody's also raised the rating on the 13 7/8% senior subordinated notes, due 1999, of NTC Group to B2 from B3.  The notes are now obligations of Bibb.  The rating agency said its decisions are based on Bibb's improved and more diversified textile operations, its high leverage, and the potential for additional leverage from possible future acquisitions.  The changes affect about $160 million of debt.  Qintex Group said it has commitments for $400 million in bank financing for its $600 million acquisition of MGM/UA Communications Co.'s United Artists studio and other assets.  The Australian company said it expects to complete the acquisition by the Sept. 30 deadline.  Qintex said it is negotiating with about ten investors for the private placement of $500 million of common and preferred stock to fund the remaining acquisition costs and for working capital.  Through a unit, Qintex holds a 43% stake in Qintex Entertainment Inc., a Los Angeles entertainment company.  Qintex Group agreed to buy the United Artists studio and other MGM/UA assets in April.  But rumors circulated that Christopher C. Skase, chairman of Qintex Group, was having trouble arranging the financing for the deal.  A Qintex executive denied the rumors.  Qintex Group said Friday that after it completes the acquisition of the MGM/UA assets, the newly acquired entity will change its name to Qintex America Inc.  The entertainment arm will conduct business under the name of United Artists.  The company added that Qintex Entertainment will merge with Qintex America.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S TREASURY  @ Today  $14.4 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ Today  Alco Health Distribution Corp. -- $175 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  @ Tuesday  Connecticut Light & Power Co. -- $75 million of first and refunding mortgage bonds, via competitive bidding.  GTE South Inc. -- $100 million of first mortgage bonds, via competitive bidding.  Texas Utilities Co. -- offering of five million common shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  @ One Day This Week  Bruno's Inc. -- $125 million of convertible debentures, via Robinson-Humphrey Co.  Dial REIT Inc. -- offering of 1.5 million common shares, via Alex Brown & Sons Inc.  Isomedix Inc. -- offering of 1,605,430 common shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Johnston Coca-Cola Bottling Group Inc. -- $100 million of senior notes, and $200 million of notes, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  Merry-Go-Round Enterprises Inc. -- offering of 3,350,000 common shares, via Alex Brown.  Stewart & Stevenson Services Inc. -- offering of 1.4 million common shares, via Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  United Healthcare Corp. -- offering of 2.5 million common shares, via Alex Brown.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Tuesday  Tennessee -- $84 million of Series O home ownership program, alternative minimum tax (AMT),via competitive bid.  Mississippi -- $68.5 million of Series 1989 capital improvement general obligation bonds, via competitive bid.  North Carolina -- $50 million of various public improvement bonds of 1989, 1991-2005, via competitive bid.  @ Wednesday  Indianapolis -- $66 million of 1989 Series A gas utility system revenue bonds, via competitive bid.  Pennsylvania -- $60 million of Series 1989 improvement bonds, via competitive bid.  @ One Day This Week  San Antonio, Texas -- $640 million of gas & electric revenue refunding bonds, via a First Boston Corp. group.  Washington Public Power Supply System, The Bonneville Power Administration -- $450 million of nuclear Project No. 1, No. 3 refunding revenue bonds, 1989 Series A, via a Goldman Sachs group.  New York -- $260 million of State of New York Mortgage Agency revenue bonds, including capital appreciation bonds, via a Bear, Stearns & Co. group.  New Jersey -- $256 million of Housing Finance Authority revenue bonds, via Merrill Lynch.  State of Washington -- $200 million of general obligation college savings bonds, via a Security Pacific Bank group.  Rhode Island -- $200 million of housing revenue bonds, comprises $150 million of fixed rate Series 1B & 1C bonds and $50 million of short-term bonds, via Goldman Sachs.  California -- $195 million of Riverside Co. hospital project revenue bonds, via a First Boston group.  Florida -- $133 million of Tampa International airport revenue bonds, via a Smith, Barney Harris Upham & Co. Inc. group.  Pennsylvania -- $120 million of Cambria County Industrial Development Authority Resource Recovery project revenue bonds, comprises $72.5 million of fixed rate and $47.5 million of variable rate bonds, via a Morgan Stanley & Co. group.  Illinois -- $115 million of certificates of participation, via Bear Stearns.  Ohio -- $108 million of Ohio Edison for Beaver County revenue bonds, via Morgan Stanley.  Illinois -- $80 million of Lake County Forest Preserve district land acquisition development bonds, via a Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  Virgin Islands -- $80 million of Virgin Islands Public Facility Authority revenue bonds, via Bear Stearns.  California -- $61 million of Redding California electric system revenue certificates of participation, 1989 Series A, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  California -- $60 million of South Coast Air Quality Management District refunding revenue bonds, via a Stone & Youngberg group.  @ Indefinite  Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, and $100 million of consolidated bonds, 66th Series, both via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  Debate is heating up among researchers, patients, drug companies and regulators over what criteria should be used in declaring a drug is effective against acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Today that debate moves to the National Academy of Sciences Institute of Medicine in Washington, D.C., for two days of testimony and discussion that could lead to a new consensus on drug development for AIDS.  For traditionalists in the Food and Drug Administration, the gold standard for a drug's worth has been that it could reduce deaths and extend patient survival.  But many patient advocates, now joined by certain researchers, argue that clinical trials should consider other criteria than life or death -- for example, quality of life or absence of certain symptoms.  Withholding FDA approval until a survival advantage is proved can lengthen a clinical trial past the life expectancy of certain patients, they argue.  Already, as a part of their evaluation of a drug, researchers measure a spectrum of patient symptoms and laboratory tests that are strongly predictive of patient survival or deterioration in AIDS.  Among those most widely used as prognostic markers are levels of white-blood lymphocytes, known as T4 cells, which plunge as patient immunity erodes; and levels of a viral protein known as p24, which rise as the AIDS infection spreads and the disease progresses.  The drug AZT, made by Wellcome PLC of Britain, was approved in 1987 after conclusive survival benefits were shown.  But at a July summit meeting of AIDS activists and researchers at Columbia University in New York, John S. James, publisher of an AIDS treatment newsletter in San Francisco, pointed out that collecting data on deaths threatens to stretch development time for the next anti-viral drug out at least two more years.  His concerns struck a responsive chord among federal scientists who noted the debate touches not just AIDS, but other diseases as well.  "We in the cancer institute have been moving away from using death as an endpoint," said Samuel Broder, director of the National Cancer Institute.  "But for many, only a difference in survival is convincing proof of efficacy."  Still, he said activists might take heart from the evolution of standards in cardiac and vascular disease.  "There was a time when it wasn't accepted that reducing blood presure could save lives," he said.  "Now we know you don't have to wait for a stroke or heart attack to occur" to document benefits of treatment.  Australia's chief antitrust regulator said in Canberra Friday that he has "the strongest reservations" about the possible sale of any Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd. brewing assets to rival brewer Elders IXL Ltd.  Bond Corp. is considering various corporate restructuring proposals to reduce its debt, including one from Elders that might include Elders buying part of Bond Corp.'s Australian brewing operations.  Bond Corp. also has U.S. brewing operations.  Separately, Paul Keating, Australia's treasurer, said Friday a fall in domestic interest rates now would be "premature" and would spark an increase in economic demand.  Bob Baxt, chairman of the Trade Practices Commission, said in a statement about Bond and Elders that "On the face of it, it is difficult to conceive of any such deal which wouldn't breach sections of the Trade Practices Act.  "On what we presently know about the various beer markets, the commission would almost certainly have to oppose any strengthening of (Elders') existing position."  Mr. Baxt said the entry of a new brewer, on the other hand, "would probably stimulate competition."  There is speculation that another local brewer or a foreign company might want to buy some of Bond Corp.'s brewing assets.  Separately, late Thursday, the National Companies and Securities Commission, Australia's corporate regulator, launched a formal investigation into some of Bond Corp.'s business activities.  In Friday trading at Sydney, Bond Corp. plunged 4 cents, to a five-year low of 39 cents, on turnover of five million shares.  Among Bond Corp.'s associated companies, Bell Group Ltd. fell 3 cents, to 55 cents, and Bell Resources Ltd. lost 3 cents to 82 cents, but Bond Media Ltd. rallied 4 cents to 26 cents.  Australian shares Friday bounced back from Thursday's sharp fall to close firmer as positive sentiment returned to the volatile market.The All-Ordinary Share Price Index rose to 1758.2 from 1751.1 Thursday.  Thursday's 1.4% drop was the biggest single fall in the index since May 25.  Mr. Keating, the nation's treasurer, said that the government's tight monetary policy has already produced some slowing in the economy, but "it is clear that the time hasn't yet arrived for a fall in interest rates."  In a speech to the government's Economic Planning Advisory Council, Mr. Keating said any fall in rates would cause a blowout in Australia's current-account deficit and see demand rise again.  Mr. Keating said recent economic indicators are consistent with the government's forecast of continued investment and employment growth in the second half of 1989.  But "quite a sharp" slowdown in spending is expected in the first six months of 1990, with a slowing in employment growth and production, accompanied by a strong lift in export volumes.  "The overall picture then is one of an economy with quite a deal of momentum but which is slowing as expected," Mr. Keating said.  @ ----  Friday's Market Activity  Stock prices dropped in Tokyo for the fourth day in a row.  London stocks closed firmer but well below intraday peaks.  At Tokyo, the Nikkei Index went up in the morning with the help of arbitrage index buying but failed to sustain the momentum in the afternoon as steels and high-priced, smaller-capitalization issues came under pressure, traders said.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues was down 36.75 points at 34115.81 at the end of the day.  The index lost 118.75 points Thursday.  In Tokyo Monday, the Nikkei index had slid 66.16 points to 34049.65 by midmorning.  Friday's volume on the First Section was estimated at about 800 million shares, up from 634 million Thursday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues, 568 to 408, while 143 others remained unchanged.  The market's retreat was apparently the result of investor uncertainty about the direction of exchange rates and fear of higher domestic interest rates, said Shigeru Akiba, head of equity trading at UBS Phillips & Drew International.  At London, The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index, the broadest measure of the market, closed up 8 points at 2423.9, but down from a high of 2435.7.  The index touched an intraday low of 2223.0.  The market opened sharply firmer on rumors of a large program trade and renewed speculative buying.  The index's peak was just 8 points off its all-time closing high of 2443.4.  However, an outbreak of profit-taking, and a weak Wall Street opening, forced a retreat.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 30-share index closed at 2003.7, up 4.6.  Volume was the week's most active at 791.3 million shares, up from 508.9 million Thursday.  Many dealers said the market still appears poised to test its historic high on the back of continuing takeover and merger rumors.  As well, the absence of any extremely negative corporate-earnings news last week helped to relieve fears of softening corporate profits, dealers said.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Paris, Frankfurt, Amsterdam and Stockholm, lower in Zurich and Milan and mixed in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Share prices were mixed in Manila and higher in Hong Kong, Singapore, Wellington, Seoul and Taipei.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 7 Sep 6 Year  @ U.S. ...................... 320.5 321.4 + 25.1  @ Britain ................... 724.1 717.2 + 32.6  @ Canada .................... 431.2 432.8 + 17.4  @ Japan ..................... 1518.0 1526.1 + 6.9  @ France .................... 550.9 546.7 + 24.4  @ Germany ................... 259.7 259.9 + 24.9  @ Hong Kong ................. 1935.8 1931.0 - 4.6  @ Switzerland ............... 236.3 237.1 + 36.6  @ Australia ................. 349.6 355.1 + 20.4  @ World index ............... 527.2 530.2 + 6.6  Tired of unprofitable bond deals, U.S. investment houses in Switzerland are playing to their natural strength: U.S. equities.  The market for options denominated in Swiss francs on such U.S. blue chip stocks as Philip Morris Cos., Upjohn Co., and Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co. is booming, fueled by strong demand from Swiss retail and institutional investors anxious to get in on Wall Street's rally.  The Swiss units of such U.S. firms as Bankers Trust Co., Morgan Stanley & Co., Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. have led the way, bringing the pace of new issues up to about half a dozen a week from none just six months ago.  "When it started we were all a bit cynical," says Alex Bridport, managing director of Shearson in Geneva.  "But there's a lot more underlying strength than one had hitherto realized."  Bankers Trust brought out the first issue on a U.S. company, launching 75,000 Merck & Co. warrants on April 6.  Each warrant entitled the owner to buy common stock later at $60.50 a share, a 15.5% premium to the share price that day.  The Merck deal, and the 45 or so that have followed, are pure gambles on the strength of U.S. stocks.  The investor bets that a stock will climb while he holds the warrant.  The technique has proved attractive to Swiss money managers not afraid to run the risk that the stock price stays the same, or worse, drops, rendering the warrant worthless.  "It's enthusiasm for the dollar and enthusiasm for the U.S. market," says Guy Huet, managing director of Morgan Stanley in Zurich.  "Investors are making money on these issues."  So far, though, most of the profits have come from trading the options, not exercising them.  Because they aren't considered securities, Swiss dealers are free to trade without incurring the federal turnover tax, which sharply restricts liquidity in other Swiss markets.  Similar warrants have started to appear in the United Kingdom and West Germany, but those markets lack breadth and depth largely because of Switzerland's experience with warrants on Japanese shares, dating back about three years.  In Switzerland, the average option issue on a U.S. company's stock totals about 75,000 warrants with a 20-month life.  The deals may be relatively small but their architects don't hesitate to defend them.  "A market that has grown as quickly as this is not something that can be laughed at," says Bankers Trust General Manager John Murphy.  "The only thing 'Mickey Mouse' about this market is the deal we did for Walt Disney Co."  Most U.S. investment houses retreated a year ago from underwriting straight Swiss franc bonds, partly because they were unable to gain on Switzerland's big three banks and because high rates drove up borrowing costs, chased away investors and cut profitability.  Morgan Stanley's Mr. Huet doesn't seem to regret not being active in underwriting straight bonds.  It's a sector that lately "hasn't given much joy to participants," he says.  Getting the deal right is the key.  Unlike warrants on Japanese stocks, deals for U.S. companies aren't really "covered" by the ownership of underlying shares.  Instead, underwriters use what they call a "dynamic hedge."  Each is different but usually involves a combination of stock option purchases arranged by the home office in New York.  How profitable the issues are "depends on whether we're right in our hedge," says Goldman Sachs Finanz AG Director Mats Joensson.  "It's still too early to say but we believe they will be profitable, obviously, otherwise we wouldn't do them."  Shearson's Mr. Bridport says there are real risks in managing the deals because "the book on hedging these things hasn't been written yet . . .  The only way to hedge perfectly is to buy all the equity and to sit on it."  That, however, is expensive.  Instead, most houses tell potential investors that they "hold an equity interest that is sufficient to cover the delivery of the necessary shares should all outstanding warrants be exercised."  Zurich's Bank Julius Baer, in cooperation with Salomon Brothers, has specialized in marketing warrants on baskets of shares.  The first was issued Aug. 16 in the pharmaceutical sector, and included Pfizer Inc., Syntex Corp., Upjohn Co., and Warner-Lambert Co.  Syndication manager Raymond Baer says the idea is to "bundle possible takeover targets."  He adds: "It gives investors a good chance with very little money to participate in a potential takeover."  Mr. Baer has also handled the food and oil sectors, while others have followed with retail stores and pollution control companies.  A handful of warrants are listed on the Zurich Stock Exchange but few issuers find it profitable to meet the bourse's capitalization and share deposit requirements.  The Basel bourse appears set to list most of the deals, but in the event of a change of heart issuing houses say they will use a Luxembourg listing as they have already done on occasion.  Mead Corp. is having a good year, but operating profit for the third quarter and full year will be lower than the exceptionally high earnings a year earlier, Burnell R. Roberts, chairman and chief executive officer, said.  Mr. Roberts estimated that the forest-products and electronic-publishing concern will earn between 80 cents and 85 cents a share from operations in the third quarter, down from $69.6 million, or $1.06 a share, a year earlier.  Divestiture of a major unit last year and purchase of another business at year end that dilutes current year earnings are the primary reasons for the expected lower operating profit, he said.  However, the company also is incurring training and marketing expenses in preparation for a major plant addition and is launching costly advertising programs to promote a new color-copying technology, he said.  Demand for the company's key products is good, Mr. Roberts said.  Additional industry capacity for certain grades of paper have resulted in a slight weakening in some prices, he said, but the comparison is against strong price levels in the early months of 1989.  Third-quarter per-share profit will include a gain of 25 cents from sale of a small unit, Mr. Roberts said, making net income $1.05 to $1.10.  Year-earlier net was $170.5 million, or $2.56 a share, including a gain of $100.9 million, or $1.50 a share, from Mead's sale of its 50% interest in Brunswick Pulp & Paper Co.  Sales for the current quarter will be about $1.2 billion, up from $1.17 billion the year earlier, Mr. Roberts said in an interview.  First-half net was $114.8 million, or $1.77 a share, down from $138.8 million, or $2.13 a share, a year earlier.  However, the 1988 profit included a 17-cent-a-share gain from sale of assets, and 33 cents a share from Brunswick Pulp's operations.  Sales for the half rose to $2.34 billion from $2.25 billion, despite the loss of Brunswick's volume.  Mr. Roberts said it's too early to make a good estimate of fourth-quarter results, but that operating profit for the full year is unlikely to equal the $240.8 million, or $3.70 a share, of 1988.  Including gains on sale of assets and a charge related to a discontinued insurance business, Mead's 1988 net income was $352.7 million, or $5.37 a share.  Mr. Roberts said the company expects sales for the year of about $4.65 billion, compared with $4.46 billion in 1988.  At the end of 1988, Mead purchased Michie Co., a publisher of legal materials, for $226.5 million, which was far in excess of book value.  The acquisition will help strengthen Mead's computerized legal-information business, Mr. Roberts said, but amortization of the difference between purchase price and book value is reducing 1989 profit.  The company estimates that the acquisition will reduce Mead's profit 25 cents a share this year, with 16 cents of that already absorbed in the first half.  Sales of Mead Data Central, the company's electronic-publishing business, will exceed $400 million this year, up from last year's $307.6 million, said Jack W. Simpson, president of the unit.  Acquisition of Michie accounted for about $35 million of that, but continuing businesses are showing a revenue rise of almost 20%, he added.  Operating profit is rising more rapidly than revenue, he said.  Mead's paper group profit this year will benefit from greatly improved results at its Chillicothe, Ohio, mill, Mr. Roberts said.  The company has made sizable investments in recent years to improve the plant's efficiency.  Profit hadn't been satisfactory for a number of years, but is showing marked improvement this year, Mr. Roberts added.  However, a major plant at Escanaba, Mich., has been operating with slightly lower efficiency recently because of protracted labor negotiations, Mr. Roberts said.  The plant has been operating without a contract since June 1.  While there has been no work stoppage, and Mr. Roberts said he doesn't expect one, the plant hasn't been operating quite as smoothly as it did previously.  Escanaba is one of the company's largest and most profitable facilities.  Mead's paperboard and packaging sales continue relatively strong, but operating profit is lower than a year ago, Mr. Roberts said.  The company took some downtime at a containerboard plant to install new equipment, and startup has been more difficult than anticipated, he said.  Also, the the rising dollar is reducing profits in Europe, Mr. Roberts said.  Mead has a sizable packaging products business in Europe, which is supplied mainly by Mead's U.S. coated paperboard mill.  The rising dollar makes U.S.-produced material more expensive for European plants, and prices are higher for European-produced board, reducing profit margins for the European packaging business, he said.  The company's $550 million coated paperboard expansion project at Mahrt, Ala., is proceeding on schedule and on budget, Mr. Roberts said.  About 25% of the construction has been completed, and the plant is scheduled to start operating in the 1990 fourth quarter.  Training personnel to operate the plant will reduce Mead's 1989 profit 16 cents to 18 cents a share, Mr. Roberts estimated.  General Motors Corp.'s Oldsmobile division, struggling to reverse a three-year sales slide, is offering to take back any of its 1990 models within 30 days or 1,500 miles if a customer isn't happy with the vehicle.  Oldsmobile officials said customers who return a 1990 model will receive the purchase price as a credit toward another new Oldsmobile.  Customers won't be offered their money back.  The move is part of Oldsmobile's effort to halt a market slide that has cut the division's annual sales to an estimated 640,000 in the current model year from one million vehicles in 1986.  Through the first 11 months of the 1989 model year, Olds sales are down 7.4% to 587,534 cars from 634,322 a year ago.  A measure of Oldsmobile's diminished position is that next year, despite introducing several new or restyled models, including the first new mid-sized sedan in eight years, the division officially expects to boost 1990-model passenger car sales by only about 5% to 675,000 cars.  The new 1990 Cutlass Supreme sedan and the year-old Cutlass Supreme coupe are expected to have combined 1990 model-year sales of only about 176,000 vehicles, Oldsmobile officials said.  That's not enough to assure that the Doraville, Ga., plant that builds the models will run at full capacity for the year.  Oldsmobile also wants to sell about 35,000 plastic-bodied Silhouette minivans, officially classified as trucks.  But J. Michael Losh, division general manager, conceded he isn't certain Olds will be able to get that many minivans from the North Tarrytown, N.Y., factory, which also is building versions for GM's Chevrolet and Pontiac divisions.  The new trade-in program, which Mr. Losh announced at a product preview here, is an expansion of programs that Oldsmobile, GM's Pontiac Division and Chrysler Corp. experimented with during the past year.  Chrysler ran a money-back offer in Washington, D.C., last fall, but canceled it after 60 days.  Chrysler also offered trade-in programs in Denver and Chicago for much of the 1989 model year.  Chrysler allowed dissatisfied customers to return newly purchased vehicles for a Chrysler of equal value.  The company ended these programs last month and information from the two cities "is being collected and analyzed," a Chrysler spokesman said.  Oldsmobile is the first GM division to institute such a program nationally for all its models.  "We think this is a very major step for us," said Mr. Losh.  "We may be adding to it.  This is not a one-shot deal."  In addition, Oldsmobile said it will offer free roadside service to customers whose cars need towing, run out of gas or need a dead battery recharged.  The free roadside service program lasts for three years or 50,000 miles.  GM's Cadillac division already offers a similar roadside service program.  Oldsmobile plans to package the buy-back and roadside service programs with GM's existing three-year, 50,000-mile new-car warranty and market the combination as the "Oldsmobile Edge."  The Thai government is struggling with a program of privatization as its own bureaucrats and unions lead strong resistance to change.  For the past decade, the country's economic planners have called for costly state industries to be privatized and the government has had some modest success.  But Thailand's booming economy is being hampered by its overburdened infrastructure and poorly performing state companies, officials repeatedly warn.  Economists say the industries that planners are urging the government to privatize are where Thailand's powerful state labor unions are most deeply entrenched and where empire-building government bureaucrats have constructed their strongest domains.  A current study by the National Economic and Social Development Board, Thailand's central planning agency, urges the government to make a new push to sell state enterprises to increase efficiency, encourage wider ownership and develop the equities market.  In an earlier report, the agency estimated that the average return on investment of all concerns in the state sector between 1982 and 1986 was less than half that of the private sector, saddling the government with a significant debt burden.  Borrowing by government-owned enterprises accounts for almost half of Thailand's total external debt of $15.4 billion.  Moreover, government and private-industry officials say that many state-owned concerns are riddled with corruption.  They contend that government officials often subcontract with companies they own for services or goods at inflated prices.  And they allege that government-owned spare parts and fuel are routinely stolen and sold in large volumes.  The state sector is distorted by monopolistic practices, unrealistic pricing and bad planning, the critics add.  In the past year, the government has listed just one company -- Krung Thai Bank -- on the Securities Exchange of Thailand.  About 30% of the bank's equity was sold to the public.  Efforts to list other companies have failed in the face of turf wars and labor opposition.  It is Thailand's infrastructure, however, that most concerns economists pushing for more privatization.  They say that if the country's essential services are to keep pace with its burgeoning economic growth, it must spend billions of dollars to improve roads, ports, the rail system, water-treatment facilities and the electricity network over the next decade.  Because of the vast costs involved, economists say, privatization is the only answer.  The Electricity Generating Authority of Thailand is expected to spend 100 billion baht ($3.87 billion) during the next seven years to meet power needs.  Water treatment is expected to cost 75 billion baht during the next decade.  A rapid-transit system in Bangkok is expected to cost more than 40 billion baht, and new roads nationwide 50 billion baht.  Often, politically popular government pricing policies conspire to thwart modernization, as illustrated by two of the state enterprises that the government most wants to privatize: the Bangkok Metropolitan Transit Authority and the State Railway of Thailand.  A World Bank report notes that political pressure to keep fares low means that the Bangkok transit authority operates one of the biggest urban bus systems in the world on one of the lowest fare structures.  Privatization would result in much higher fares.  The report adds that the state railway is required to operate many local services at a big loss, which the government covers through subsidies, although after lengthy delays.  The railway is thus forced to borrow to meet interim needs, and the World Bank says the railway's interest expenses quadrupled between 1982 and 1987.  The government hopes eventually to privatize, either wholly or partly, 41 of the 61 remaining state enterprises.  The 61 enterprises have a combined operating budget larger than that of the national government itself.  Their revenue equaled 20% of the nation's economic output in 1988.  Yet the state enterprises aren't subject to budgetary review or oversight, says Phisit Pakkasem, secretary-general of the economic development board.  Some of Thailand's state-owned companies are highly profitable, such as Thai Airways International, whose pretax profit in 1988 rose 198% from a year earlier, to 6.55 billion baht.  And last year, Bangkok's Klong Toey port announced net income of 1.24 billion baht, up 128% from 1987.  But such profits, says the economic development board are very much the exception.  Wyman-Gordon Co. said it agreed to buy Allied-Signal Inc.'s KDI Composite Technology Inc. unit for an undisclosed amount of cash.  KDI Composite, a maker of composite structures for the aerospace, military and electronics industries, is based in Buena Park, Calif., and had sales last year of $15 million.  Crystal Oil Co. said it entered into a definitive agreement to purchase Vermillion Bay Land Co. for $93 a share, or about $24.5 million.  Crystal Oil is an independent oil and gas exploration and production company.  Vermillion is a Lafayette, La., concern that participates in oil and gas exploration and production on properties it leases.  The New York Stock Exchange said a seat sold for $525,000, down $25,000 from the last prior sale July 5.  Seats are currently quoted at $495,000 bid and $550,000 offered.  Taiwan's August consumer price index hit the year's highest level, according to a government report.  August's index stood at 106.39, up 0.83% from July's 105.51, the directorate general of budget, accounting and statistics reported.  The figure also represented a 3.3% rise from last August's 102.99.  Government officials said the month-to-month rise in the CPI was due mainly to the seasonal observance of Chinese customs calling for ceremonies offering sacrifices of vegetables, fruits, pigs and chickens.  A rise in housing prices also boosted the index, officials added.  The West German final cost-of-living index fell 0.1% in August from July and was up 2.9% from August 1988, the Federal Statistics Office said.  The change in the index was unrevised from the statistics office's preliminary calculations announced last week, which were based on only four of the 11 regional states.  The year-to-year rise was the lowest since March, indicating a slowdown in the country's inflation rate.  France's foreign trade deficit is likely to widen to between 40 billion French francs and 45 billion francs ($6 billion and $6.75 billion) in 1989 from 33 billion francs a year earlier, Finance Minister Pierre Beregovoy said.  Mr. Beregovoy's statement confirms previous private-sector forecasts for the deficit and represents an upward revision of the government's forecast for a deficit of about 35 billion francs.  Mr. Beregovoy attributed the anticipated deterioration to the high level of corporate investment in capital goods, which has swelled France's imports.  He stressed, however, that the expected deterioration doesn't mean that the government wants to slow corporate investment in the industrial sector.  For engineers, the 31-mile, $9.4 billion tunnel being built under the English Channel is the Indy 500 of construction projects.  "If you had to pick a project in the world you would like to lead, it would be No. 1 on all our lists," says Jack Agresti, a group vice president with Guy F. Atkinson Co. of South San Francisco, Calif.  So is the American who snagged the job boasting?  On the contrary; the reasons Jack Lemley gives for being named chief executive officer of Transmanche Link, the construction consortium building the tunnel, seem almost commonplace.  "I think I bring to the project a substantial amount of experience in major design programs," Mr. Lemley says.  "I just happen to have major tunnel experience with undersea tunnels and tunnel-boring machines."  He also just happens to be an American, attaching no significance to his nationality in heading up a group of five British and five French construction companies.  "Possibly the decision to go with an American was made because other people who were qualified were otherwise engaged," he says.  It is his combination of modesty and matter-of-factness, say those who know him, that make Mr. Lemley a good choice to deal with the complexities of the project, which already has been troubled by fractures in the undersea rock.  "None of the technology itself is mysterious," he says.  "But when you combine it all together, it is pushing the leading edge.  There hasn't been anything like it built."  The undertaking has also been beset by administrative squabbles.  At one point, the French engineering firms in Transmanche Link held a news conference to defend their work.  Transmanche Link once asked for an 11-month extension of the contract; Eurotunnel, the French-British consortium responsible for the project, granted a one-month delay.  Mr. Lemley says everything is on target to meet a June 1993 deadline.  A Eurotunnel spokeswoman says a higher cost estimate will be released soon.  "He's just super at handling that kind of thing," says Maj. Gen. George Robertson, director of military programs for the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, who has worked with Mr. Lemley.  "He's an engineer, not a lawyer.  He looks for reasonable solutions.  You can trust him."  Adds Mr. Agresti: "If he's got a difficult project, Jack can pull it off."  The 54-year-old Mr. Lemley was the only American considered for the top tunnel job, says Wendy Costigyan, a consultant for search firm Egon Zehnder International, who lured him away from his own company in Boise, Idaho, in May.  Before that, Mr. Lemley was president of the construction group of Blount Inc. in Montgomery, Ala., and before that, a senior vice president at Morrison-Knudson Co. in Boise.  He took over the tunnel project as part of a management shakeup in which the position of chairman and chief executive officer, previously held by Andrew McDowall, split in two.  Mr. McDowall became deputy chairman while Phillipe Essig, a former chairman of the French state-owned railway, became chairman.  Mr. Lemley has handled big and troubled projects before: He helped build a city for 70,000 people in the middle of the desert in Saudi Arabia, and was the original project manager for a much-delayed, much-over-budget New York City water tunnel that was beset by union conflicts, disputes among governments, litigation and technical problems.  Compared to that task, Mr. Lemley thinks the channel tunnel, though bigger, is simpler.  "The difficulties of this project have probably been blown out of proportion," he says.  "It's actually in pretty healthy condition."  The National Science Foundation has funded a new program aimed at increasing the number of black Ph.D.s in electrical engineering and computer science.  While initially involving only four students, the program is an attempt to revive the nation's flagging efforts to increase the number of black Ph.D.s in these fields, which play a critical role in high-tech industries.  Over the past dozen years, an average of only five black U.S. citizens a year have received electrical engineering and computer science doctorates; about 80 times as many white Americans have, the foundation reports.  In 1988, only one black American received a doctorate in computer science and 6 gained doctorates in electrical engineering.  In the same year, 548 white, 57 Asian and 11 Hispanic U.S. citizens received doctorates in those fields.  Holders of doctorates are generally among the high-tech industries' intellectual leaders, staff university faculties and play a critical role in setting research priorities for the nation.  The virtual absence of blacks from these ranks produces "a limitation of viewpoint and perspective," says Lynn Conway, an associate dean of engineering at the University of Michigan.  The National Science Foundation program, which begins this month, calls for North Carolina A&T, a historically black college, to place annually four of its electronics and computer technology graduates in doctoral programs at Michigan, Michigan State, Stanford and Duke universities.  The foundation has awarded NC A&T $2.5 million to launch the program and is considering expanding the effort next year to include several other historically black colleges.  The number of U.S.-born black Ph.D.s in electrical engineering and computer science peaked in 1979 and declined in recent years.  On the other hand, the number of Ph.D.s. awarded to foreigners, particularly Asians, has soared in the past decade.  Educators warn that unless something is done the situation is likely to worsen mainly because the number of blacks majoring in engineering is declining -- as well as the number of whites.  That's where NC A&T's program comes in.  Usually, blacks who do well in undergraduate electrical engineering and computer science programs take industrial jobs upon graduating.  "Our best students are not going on to graduate school," says John Foster, chairman of the Electronics and Computer Technology department at North Carolina A&T, which produces more blacks with bachelor degrees than all but a handful of other schools in the nation.  "The lure of industry is a big reason why."  Mr. Foster believes that the quickest way to increase the numbers of black Ph.D.s is to convince more of the most talented undergraduates to forego jobs with industry until they finish their graduate studies.  Many universities say they already scour the country for qualified black undergraduates to attend graduate school.  Since 1986, for instance, the University of California at Berkeley has sent faculty on recruiting trips to other universities with large black enrollments, offered to pay for promising applicants to visit Berkeley and promised full financial aid for students who qualify.  The effort has resulted in about a 40% increase in applications, but the number of blacks who actually attend Berkeley has stayed roughly the same.  The experience of blacks in electrical engineering and computer science contrasts sharply with other technical fields.  From 1978 to 1988, according to the foundation, 222 blacks obtained doctorates in biology, 141 in chemistry and 73 in physics and astronomy.  Students and faculty say that while programs such as NC A&T's will help, blacks still must clear a myriad of hurdles on their way to doctorates in electrical engineering or computer science.  First, there's the pressure that comes with being the sole black at professional conferences or in the lab.  "It was even worse than being in the U.S.," says Vincent McNeil, a black doctoral student at MIT who spent seven months last year in Japan with researchers at an NEC Corp. lab in Tokyo.  "People have this image of Japan being very racist.  You feel this burden.  I might be the only black person my Japanese co-workers might ever meet."  The absence of role models is another problem.  "There's such a small number of (black) professors," says Arthur Smith, a professor of electrical engineering at MIT, "it may as well be zero."  And finally, despite their accomplishments, some black students complain they aren't taken as seriously as white students.  "There's always someone nearby who thinks I've gotten my credentials without doing the work," says Greg Martin, a doctoral student at Georgia Tech.  Valerie Taylor, meanwhile, says she's still met with disbelief when she identifies herself as a doctoral student in electrical engineering at Berkeley.  "When a person doesn't know anything about you, they never assume you're getting a Ph.D.," she says.  "Their first reaction is to say you look too old to be in school.  Then when you tell them what you're doing, they look at you like you're kidding."  On the plus side, educators say that scholarships for black doctoral students are relatively plentiful so few should go begging for support, which usually consists of $1,000 a month, a tuition waiver and money for supplies.  The biggest cocaine bust in West German history began in early July when two Colombians retrieved a travel bag containing 6 1/2 pounds of cocaine from a locker at the Munich train station.  Pursuing a tip, police seized the pair and the drugs, with a street value in Munich of about $300,000.  But follow-up detective work and leads from the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration indicated this was a small advance sample.  The big shipment would come six weeks later by sea from Colombia's Medellin cocaine cartel.  Detectives had the dock staked out when the Don Juan V, a rusting Panamanian freighter, pulled into the port of Bremerhaven Aug. 21, loaded with 400 tons of quartz sand and 1,430 pounds of cocaine.  Police watched as the crew loaded 28 large sacks into a Volkswagen van.  Then they tailed it south for seven hours to Munich, hoping to nail the rest of the gang.  But the Panamanian driver spotted his followers and began trying to shake them, and police swooped in and arrested him.  They succeeded in seizing uncut cocaine with a wholesale value of 200 million marks ($100.6 million).  It was the second-largest seizure of cocaine on record in Europe, ranking behind a 2,200-pound shipment intercepted last year in Spain.  The arrests suggest drug shipments to Europe from the West are increasing.  The continent is ill-prepared, with a leaky assortment of seaports and airports, fragmented law-enforcement and the dismantling of what internal barriers there are already under way.  European police departments have increased the size of narcotics staffs.  More vice officers are being attached to embassies in Latin America.  Some are joining the U.S. in aiding the Colombian government.  But they are up against formidable odds.  According to Interpol, the international police organization based in Lyon, France, cocaine seizures in Western Europe last year jumped 87% from the year before to 15,150 pounds.  For the first time, the amount of intercepted cocaine exceeded heroin seizures in Europe.  But police and customs agents estimate that total shipments are at least 10 times the amounts intercepted.  Deaths from drugs of all types hit a record 2,535 last year in Western Europe.  That is nearly double the 1986 total, and authorities say the sharp jump probably reflects increased cocaine use.  Meanwhile, East bloc nations, including Poland, Czechoslovakia and the Soviet Union, are seeking Western help in battling their own growing drug problems.  Until recently, the multibillion-dollar cocaine industry has used Europe, with its under-regulated banking systems, primarily as a place to launder U.S. drug profits.  Now, while as much as 90% of the cocaine output still goes to North America, perhaps 10% or more may be aimed here.  "The primary reason is that the U.S. market is pretty well flooded," says Cornelius Dougherty, a DEA spokesman.  Street prices in the U.S. are at rock bottom, while South American output of cocaine hydrochloride, the coca leaf's finished product, is higher than ever, roughly estimated at about 400 metric tons for 1988.  Until now, cocaine use in Europe has been mostly associated with small circles in show business and the international jet set.  But a rising number of white-collar urban professionals with faster lifestyles and more disposable income may tend to broaden the market, as it did in the U.S.  Cocaine prices in Europe are at least double and often triple New York wholesale prices of about $8,000 a pound.  Generally, retail prices in Europe are lowest where supply is greatest, near the main entry points: the Madrid and Frankfurt airports and seaports in the Netherlands, West Germany and Spain.  As dealers take on costs and risks of transportation to places with tighter supply, retail prices multiply.  Thus, depending on purity, a gram of cocaine selling for about $50 in Portugal and the Netherlands may cost $170 in Switzerland or $200 in Austria.  So far, authorities have found little trace in Europe of cocaine's much cheaper street derivative, crack.  European officials are cheering efforts by the U.S. and Colombian governments to crush the cocaine cartels of Colombia but are skeptical that it will interrupt the flow for long.  They fear that if stamped out in Colombia the cocaine organizations would simply resurface in a neighboring country with new kingpins.  The European Community's plan to dismantle internal barriers after 1992 could make drug trafficking even easier, police fear.  If border checks are eliminated entirely -- which some leaders oppose for law-enforcement reasons -- then conceivably cocaine shipments could be driven all the way from Portugal to Denmark without the risk of customs checks at any of four national frontiers.  In addition, millions of passengers and staggering volumes of freight flow through Europe's big airports every year.  Shipping poses similar problems.  The port of Rotterdam alone handles 6,000 containers a day.  Every week thousands of private yachts cross the Atlantic Ocean to arrive at isolated coastal marinas.  Spain has emerged as a leading beachhead.  It offers the drug suppliers the convenience of a common language and a large community of Latin Americans, and it has ample coastline and extensive air links with South and Central America.  Last year, Spanish authorities seized 7,614 pounds of cocaine, far more than interceptions by any other European country.  Just last week, 4,000 policemen conducted raids in 40 Spanish towns, seizing drugs and arresting 400 persons.  In hopes of tightening control over inbound shipments, European countries are expected to transfer customs agents from internal to external EC borders after 1992.  But law enforcement officials argue that ultimately, Europe will have to create a pan-European drug-enforcement agency similar to the DEA of the U.S., even though that idea is certain to face tough political hurdles.  Regarding Martin Morse Wooster's Aug. 16 editorial-page article "The Economist Missurveys America": I was born, bred, raised and educated in the Midwest, and proud of it.  Never once has The Economist denigrated America or this region.  It has given this country fair coverage as events have dictated.  I plead guilty to one charge raised by Mr. Wooster: I am something of an Anglophile.  But I am also an Americanophile and so, I have discovered during the past eight years, are most of the British staff members.  They genuinely like it here and revel in experiencing new customs such as the Superbowl and the World Series.  However, this country, like any other, is not perfect, and when The Economist rightly points it out it is not done out of bias or condescension but in a spirit of fair criticism among friends.  The charge that The Economist is biased against Republicans or conservatives is absurd on its face.  Like all on the fringes of the political spectrum, right or left, Mr. Wooster's definition of news is that which conforms to his opinions.  It is not The Economist's job to confer respectability to viewpoints that cannot gain acceptance on their own merits.  If Mr. Wooster wants more coverage of his party line, he can go out and earn it.  R. Greg Bailey  Louis, Mo.  ---  As a longtime subscriber to The Economist, I can heartily ratify Mr. Wooster's sentiments.  If anything, he understates the varying shades of condescension, spite and venom displayed toward our country (and especially toward the conservatives therein) in "The American Survey" published regularly in The Economist.  It leads one to wonder if reporting of events in other countries is similarly biased and distorted.  But whereas Mr. Wooster seems to note principally errors of omission, there are also other kinds of errors.  For example, the following statement was made on page 23 of the April 29, 1989: issue ". . . by creating a huge budget deficit and a soaring dollar he (President Reagan) helped to engineer the trade deficits that remain the motive force of American protectionism."  The author of that quotation evidently does not understand the American system of government (only Congress, by failing to raise funds for expenditures only it can authorize, can create budget deficits) or else he intentionally falsifies the record.  In either case, in making such a false statement regarding one of the most important matters concerning our country, The Economist certainly does not live up to the reputation Mr. Wooster gives it of being "the best newsmagazine in the world."  William T. St.Clair  Irvington, Va.  ---  I have been a reader of The Economist since the time it was airmailed from London many years ago.  Mr. Wooster's article is mainly misleading but does contain two truths: 1.  He begins the article by saying "The Economist is the best newsmagazine in the world."  It is.  And, 2.  He ends by pleading that The Economist quote America's conservatives when they are intelligent and ignore them when they are dull.  It does.  Sarwar A. Kashmeri  Mt. Kisco, N.Y.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits rose to a seasonally adjusted 318,000 during the week ended Aug. 26 from 316,000 the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended Aug. 19 decreased to a seasonally adjusted 2,153,000, or 2.1% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,179,000 the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was also 2.1%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended Aug. 19 fell to 1,992,800 from 2,072,900 a week earlier.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  In his Aug. 10 Viewpoint column "Supreme Court's Cookware Case Was No Tempest in a Teapot," Michael Gartner claims that the right to sell Tupperware in a college dorm is a matter of free speech.  You'd think an editor and TV executive, and the Supreme Court, would know the difference between speech and non-speech, but they don't.  A college has the right to inhibit so-called freedoms of various kinds in order to enhance one freedom: speech.  Every spring I must evacuate my campus office to escape the exercise of pseudo-freedoms: the freedom to blare fraternity stereo rock into my office window; the freedom to sell beer on the slope by my window to 3,000 customers, and the freedom of the customers to drink it noisily and litter the cans.  I have had to put up with the freedom to occupy buildings (with or without arms and ammunition), break windows, commit arson (twice in my own hall), brandish knives, burn flags, build shantytowns, and other non-speech acts -- all in the name of free speech.  I want my ivory tower back, sans Tupperware and shanties.  Speech is what's in libraries, and nobody should have the freedom to make libraries and their surroundings non-quiet.  If Mr. Gartner wants to let Tupperware sell freely, he can give them carte blanche to solicit Tom Brokaw on the evening news.  Besides, Michael Gartner is hardly in the position to claim that commercial speech should be free -- he charges hundreds of thousands of dollars a minute for it on his own NBC network.  Richard L. Leed  Ithaca, N.Y.  You misinterpreted the results of Motorola's legal dispute with Nokia and Tandy ("Nokia Says Official Gives Mixed Response in Motorola Dispute," Aug. 14).  Our dispute with Nokia and Tandy arose earlier this year, when Motorola asked the U.S. International Trade Commission (ITC) to bar the import and sale in the U.S. of cellular telephones that infringe Motorola patents.  Judge John J. Mathias at the ITC clearly supported Motorola's request for temporary relief in the case, based on two Motorola patents that were found to be both valid and infringed.  Your story created the mistaken impression the judge issued a "mixed recommendation" because a third patent was found to be valid but not infringed.  While it's true the judge didn't find infringement on the third patent, this did not result in a "mixed recommendation" regarding our request for temporary relief.  Robert N. Weisshappel  Corporate Vice President and General Manager  North American Subscriber Division  Motorola Inc.  Arlington Heights, Ill.  The Bush administration backed a five-year, $2 billion program to develop a high-speed communications network and improve supercomputer hardware and software.  The administration's blessing for the plan was expected.  In June, five large government agencies asked the administration to increase spending on supercomputers and telecommunications.  The heart of the plan is a proposal to build a $400 million network to link the nation's supercomputers.  The U.S currently spends about $500 million a year on supercomputer software and hardware.  The administration plan is very similar to legislation introduced by Sen. Albert Gore, (D., Tenn.), chairman of the Senate science and technology subcommittee.  "The odds are now very good that we'll pass the legislation," Sen. Gore said.  Regarding Paul Gigot's Aug. 11 Potomac Watch, "After the Cold War: Bring Back the Gunboat": The prospect of nuclear and poison-gas threats from terrorist countries and groups makes me view the receding Cold War almost with nostalgia.  George Washington used ransom to release Americans from the Barbary Pirates.  While Thomas Jefferson did use military force in a similar situation later, I think the real point is options and preparedness.  As Mr. Gigot states, the new era required major changes in military strategy to react to the evolving world threats.  The range of effective responses a president will have to a particular situation will depend on these changes.  Washington had decades of personal experience leading military forces.  But as president of a newborn nation with no effective navy, he did not have the "gunboat diplomacy" option that President Jefferson later had.  In the early republic, many leaders were leery of a strong national military that possibly could be employed to install a monarchy or dictatorship.  Then as now a president needs to have appropriate military forces to be effective in this area of foreign affairs.  Morris A. Hicks  Farmington, Conn.  Tokai Bank Ltd. said it was assessed a tax penalty for failing to properly disclose a cash transfer to a London subsidiary after the 1987 crash.  A spokesman for the bank wouldn't specify the amount involved.  A Japanese newspaper, Asahi Shimbun, said Tokai had to pay a 250 million-yen ($1.7 million) penalty for failing to properly disclose a 580 million-yen transfer.  The bank is the fourth to confirm this week that it incorrectly reported profits.  The other three -- Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd., Fuji Bank Ltd. and Mitsui Bank Ltd. -- also were fined by national tax authorities.  All four banks transferred funds to overseas subsidiaries that were hurt by the crash of many of the world's financial markets.  Citicorp said it hired Mariano Bengoechea, formerly head of the Madrid Stock Exchange, as director of development for its European financial institutions group.  Mr. Bengoechea, 45 years old, will be responsible for developing additional global custody services for institutional customers.  Currently, such services include portfolio valuation, settlement and clearing assistance, and dividend disbursement.  Ian Cormack, head of the European institutions group, said Mr. Bengoechea would help the group "integrate global custody for institutions around the world."  Mr. Bengoechea, who helped develop the deregulation under way in the Spanish securities industry, will be based in London and report to Mr. Cormack.  Your Aug. 15 editorial "Congress's Paper Trail" and Mark Leidl's accompanying piece, "What Is Congress Trying to Hide?" illustrate an odd paradox: While members of Congress have dramatically increased the reporting burden on the executive branch and engaged in micromanagement through appropriations sleight of hand, they have failed to prevent (and in some cases contributed to) many of the major scandals of the past few years.  A solution to the problem that balances Congress's need to know with the executive's desire to avoid micromanagement is as follows:  1) Any member of Congress should be permitted to request any report from any executive branch department, provided that he or she personally reads the report (cover to cover) before requesting another.  2) For each requested report, the member of Congress must return to the appropriate executive department a personally prepared evaluation of the report, discussing both its content and conclusions.  While we are at it, the following would also help:  3) Every member of Congress must read, in its entirety, every item of legislation on which he or she intends to vote.  Overviews and summaries prepared by staffers are not acceptable.  Don Staffin  Edison, N.J.  Learning Block  The school year has begun again,  The kids are bused or biking --  And outside every empty school  The teachers are all striking.  -- Robert Gordon.  ---  Burning Issue  I can liven up a party  With this clever little stroke:  Casually, I ask,  "Do you mind if I smoke?"  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Daffynition  Tracking dog: garment scenter.  -- Walter Anthony.  Lloyd's of London reported record pretax profit of #650 million ($1.01 billion) for 1986, but the giant insurance market's senior executives warned that the flush conditions wouldn't continue.  Lloyd's reports its results about three years late to account for the filing of claims and litigation.  Profit represents the aggregate results of about 375 syndicates backed by investors.  Profit soared for 1986 chiefly because that year represented "a high point in one of the insurance industry's cycles," said Murray Lawrence, chairman of Lloyd's.  Insurance premiums were increased sharply that year.  Meanwhile, Mr. Lawrence said, "we had very few accidents and acts of God."  Those conditions have changed in subsequent years.  Intense competition within the insurance industry, coupled with unusual catastrophes, will cut deeply into Lloyd's profits for subsequent years.  The 1988 disaster on Occidental Petroleum Corp.'s North Sea oil rig will batter the results for that year.  The 1987 hurricane in England and northern Europe brought an avalanche of claims unmatched outside the marine insurance sector.  Another problem facing Lloyd's is the resignation of investors, or members.  So far this year, Lloyd's has had 1,760 resignations of a total membership of about 33,000, compared with 1,350 resignations in the comparable period last year.  "What matters is the capacity" to handle the variety of insurance risks that Lloyds takes on, Mr. Lawrence said.  "Overall, I don't expect capacity to be reduced."  However, fewer members will be called upon to provide the same insurance coverage.  Lloyd's said premium income for 1986 rose to #3.7 billion, up from #3.05 billion in 1985.  Low losses in aviation insurance in 1986 resulted in an underwriting profit of #229.3 million, up from #61.4 million in 1985.  Property and liability insurance, excluding marine policies, showed underwriting profits of #218 million, compared with a loss of #84 million in 1985.  Marine insurance experienced an improvement, showing an underwriting profit in 1986 of #260 million, up from #213.2 million in 1985.  Pessimism damped Lloyd's officials' near-term expectations for practically all business lines except automobile insurance.  However, the officials said they expected cyclical conditions to improve in the early 1990s.  Aviation insurance is under intense pressure.  The global airline premiums have dropped to about $400 million from about $1 billion in 1987.  Meanwhile, airline losses in 1988 rose significantly from the previous year.  Turning to marine insurance, Lloyd's officials voiced worry over the massive oil spill from the Exxon Valdez this year.  Derek Wills, chairman of Lloyd's underwriters association for marine coverage, said the disaster "has focused our attention on the massive exposures we face" for ecological damage.  Much of the liability for the accident, and similar catastrophes, falls on the providers of reinsurance that operate through Lloyds.  "We don't have a pocket deep enough to clean up the Western world," said Tim Holloway, who chairs Lloyd's underwriting association for non-marine insurance.  People go to great lengths to improve upon nature, like having Budweiser labels tattooed across their backs, or maps of Africa stenciled on their heads.  Ellen Caro has pictures of the New York Giants painted on her fingernails.  And when she is in a certain mood, she changes the display -- to sex scenes in silhouette.  Ms. Caro, the president of an all-woman executive-search firm in Wayne, N.J., has her nails done by Liz Fojon at a salon called Phenomanails, in Fair Lawn.  Ms. Fojon's naughty nails are a conversation piece, but she will gladly put a miniature of your mother on your thumb if you prefer, and people will still talk.  "You might say Liz rises to the occasion," says Ms. Caro, who is 39 and unmarried.  Her fingernails have "opened many doors, personally and professionally."  If many women (and surely some men) want their fantasies at their fingertips, an industry is there to serve them.  This year, nail salons are all over the place, particularly in store fronts that last season housed tanning parlors and that next year, who knows, may be filing for bankruptcy.  The armamentarium of a manicurist now goes well beyond emery boards and pink Hazel Bishop enamel, circa 1957.  For instance, Ms. Fojon drills holes in fingernails and screws jewels into the holes.  Prices have gone up accordingly.  Ms. Fojon charges $4 per nail for hand-painting and stone work, rather less than one might expect for a modern-day Michelangelo, a bit more than for a standard $12 manicure in an upscale clip joint.  Ms. Fojon charges $8 for a family portrait on one nail, which in New Jersey is getting up there in price.  Tamami Mihara, a fingernail artist at the Shu Uemura salon on the Upper West Side of Manhattan, has won competitions in the U.S. and in Tokyo for some of her exotic nail designs.  In Japan, tattoos are associated with gangsters, but fancy fingernails are amusing.  At the International Beauty Show in New York this year, Ms. Mihara nailed down second place for her "Dragon Lady."  She gave her subject, Marisol Fernandez, black nails festooned with jewels, feathers and bows.  The design makes it hard to do the dishes and, more inconvenient still, it took two weeks to execute, but it was a prize winner.  "You might go to a party wearing something like that," says Ms. Fernandez, who manages the salon.  Some ladies prefer a more understated look.  The very demure actress Sharon McNight, who appeared in the recent Broadway musical "Starmites," wears a simple inch-long, 18-karat gold fake nail on her index finger.  It catches the light and upstages the cast.  She has had it for 10 years (so this trend has been long in the making).  The bauble was presented to her by her costumers in San Francisco after she won an award for cabaret singing.  She puts it on with Krazy Glue.  Question is: Is this for everyone?  The over-made-up Brooklyn career girl might feel pretty on the F train in long fuchsia nails with cubic zirconia drilled in, not too close to the cuticle.  But how about the Park Avenue investment banker on her way to Wall Street in a taxi?  Vivian Behrens, a vice president (for makeup and fragrance) at Estee Lauder Inc., says that women today are more self-assured and consequently are returning to things feminine, which of course means nail polish.  "We all went through a stage where to wear nail lacquer was a sign that you were a dumb blonde," she says.  But now nail color "is one of the ultimate accessories."  No wonder salon sales of manicures and artificial nails will total about $1.5 billion this year, according to Geoff Geils, a marketing executive at Flowery Beauty Products Inc., a Greenwich, Conn., manufacturer of manicure tools.  It obviously isn't rich Connecticut ladies who are spending all that money.  "People who can't afford to buy groceries are putting on artificial nails," says Suzanne Scherb, a distributor of fake nails in Farmingdale, N.Y.  Which brings things back to taste and class.  Kenneth Battelle, whose Manhattan beauty salon, Kenneth, is very uptown, calls nail art "simply horrifying."  Women who decorate their nails "are the people who go to Atlantic City," he says.  But if his is the last word, it is hardly the last thing to be said about fingernails.  There are at least two hanging questions.  The first is one Ralph Nader might ask: Is all this artificial stuff safe?  The other is: What about just growing your own natural nails, from scratch as it were, till they are so long it's impossible to use your hands?  What's wrong with that?  Almost anything that can be stuck onto the end of a fingernail will be.  That includes liquid and powder overlays applied to the nail and shaped, tea-bag paper and Duco cement, even Miss Lee Press-On Nails for little girls.  It includes extensions made of plastic, silk, linen and Fiberglas that are attached with glue.  There is a gel bonded by ultraviolet light.  Jim Nordstrom, who runs Creative Nail Design, a Carlsbad, Calif., nail business, says that "a lot of spending that went into defense, to develop new high-tech coatings," has made its way into fingernails, as Tang and Teflon went from NASA to the breakfast table.  Unfortunately, however, fake nails can cause infections if moisture collects under them.  Ellen Gendler, a New York dermatologist, points out that some acrylics cause the natural nail to separate from its fleshy bed.  Fungal infections and allergic reactions can result.  New York is one of about 10 states where anybody can hang out a shingle and be a manicurist.  Although nail salons in states that don't license manicurists are visited by health inspectors when somebody complains, regulations are lacking to ensure proper sanitary procedures.  States, such as California, that license nail technicians and nail parlors conduct routine inspections.  Karen Lessler, the president of a trade group in New York that is pushing for a licensing law, says that requiring manicurists to have 450 hours' training would go a long way toward protecting consumers.  "You don't want clients contracting a staph infection or a fungus," she says.  You don't want them to feel they are taking their life in their hands.  Given the perils, it is probably a good thing that some women merely let their nails grow to the point that they stop traffic.  For them, the natural look is the thing, if talons can be called natural.  Berta Ponzo, the 32-year-old owner of Salon Crista in New York, says she doesn't believe in fake nails.  She cultivates her own horny substance -- nails actually are dead keratin -- extending 3 1/2 inches beyond her finger tips. (Fingernails typically grow about a quarter of an inch per month.) Ms. Ponzo says that when she flicks her wrist, the nails brush against one another and make music.  All it takes to accomplish this nail-growing feat, she says, "is a little conscious effort" and two years.  Also, she adds, "you have to really want it in your soul."  Dawn Granello, who owns the Night Shift nail salon on New York's Staten Island, believes that she "conquered something within" herself by growing her nails two inches past "the free edge."  She had other problems to surmount, too, such as raising four children with nails that make it hard to open a refrigerator door. (In fact, she bought the fridge with the door that would be easiest to deal with in her condition.) And she does have a success secret: "You don't use your nails, you learn to use your knuckles."  Long, attention-getting nails seem to give certain women a feeling of mastery.  "There's a feminine power" associated with growing long nails, according to Jerilyn Ross, who practices clinical psychology in Alexandria, Va.  "It's sort of witchy.  Witches in pictures always have long nails, and so do vampires."  Long nails can also be a handy distraction.  Ms. Granello, the salon owner, says many of her customers are overweight.  The attention they lavish on their nails gets them positive feedback and makes them feel better about themselves.  "People come over to the table when they are out with their husbands and boyfriends and compliment them on their nails," she says.  So men, at last, are why some women go to all this trouble.  "My fiance really likes my nails long," says Jill Jones, a 23-year-old Chicago hairdresser and part-time model with three-inch nails.  "But," she adds, "I wouldn't cut them if he asked."  Bindley Western Industries Inc. said it agreed to plead guilty to three charges and to pay a $500,000 fine to settle a federal investigation stemming from 1985.  The pharmaceuticals distributor also said that to bring the investigation to a conclusion, it agreed to accept vicarious liability for the acts of two former officers of the company, both of whom pleaded guilty to criminal charges in federal court in Atlanta in 1985.  The government's investigation revealed that the former officers committed unlawful acts while employed by Bindley, including receiving more than $1 million in kickbacks from various vendors.  Bindley said it pleaded guilty to two charges of mail fraud and a third charge related to the "technical" misreporting of sales of three bottles of pharmaceuticals in routine reports sent to the Drug Enforcement Administration.  The company said the fine will be reflected as an extraordinary charge of $500,000 against third-quarter earnings.  In the year-earlier third quarter, Bindley earned $755,000, or 12 cents a share, on sales of $300.4 million.  The company said the costs incurred in the four-year investigation were substantial and that future earnings are expected to improve as a result of the settlement.  In national over-the-counter trading, Bindley closed at $8.75, up 25 cents.  Congressional Democrats accused the Bush administration of hiding billions of dollars of costs in the president's new anti-drug strategy.  Sen. Joseph Biden (D., Del.), who led the attack, described the administration's $7.9 billion price tag for the next fiscal year as "misleading."  In hearings by the Senate Judiciary Committee, which he heads, Mr. Biden scolded White House Drug Policy Director William Bennett for not disclosing how much the administration assumes states would have to chip in.  Mr. Biden said that, according to his staff's estimates, the states would have to spend $10 billion to $12 billion in fiscal 1990 to meet the Bush plan's requirements and goals.  For example, the plan envisions massive drug-related arrests that would require tens of thousands of additional state prison cells, as well as more state police, prosecutors, judges and guards, Sen. Biden said.  Mr. Bennett acknowledged that the states would have to spend "several billion dollars" more in the coming year, but said he didn't have a more precise estimate.  He said the administration will "probably ask for more {federal spending} in 1991 and probably more again in 1992."  He added, "We cannot send the signal that the federal government can do it all; it can't."  President Bush has vowed not to raise taxes to pay for the drug war.  But the states are going to have "to cut an awful lot of existing services or raise an awful lot of revenues to make this work," Mr. Biden said in an interview.  The sun was just beginning to rise on F.W. de Klerk's "new South Africa" when the casualty figures from fresh police clashes with anti-apartheid protesters started escalating.  Eleven dead in Mitchell's Plain, four dead in Lavender Hill, two dead in Khayelitsha.  In all, church groups said 25 people died (police confirmed 12 deaths) and more than 100 were injured in the black townships around Cape Town Wednesday night and Thursday morning, just as white voters were returning Mr. de Klerk's National Party to power, albeit with a greatly reduced majority.  The promised "new South Africa" looked distressingly like the old one.  "Mr. de Klerk's president's seat sits now in a pool of blood," said the Rev. Allan Boesak, a prominent opponent of apartheid, the government's system of racial segregation.  "If he doesn't move quickly, nothing that he says, politically or otherwise, will have any meaning whatsoever."  One day after the election, the clock is already ticking away double-time on Mr. de Klerk's campaign promises to scrap the remnants of apartheid and to begin negotiations on a new constitution that will bring the black majority into national politics for the first time.  Expectations are high, both here and abroad, that Mr. de Klerk will move swiftly to carry out these reforms after he is formally elected president by the white parliament next week.  Should he delay, or outright renege, the election-night violence could turn out to be the prelude to another cycle of unrest, similar to the one between 1984 and 1986 that culminated in the government declaring the present state of emergency.  Also, the international sanctions that were prompted by the emergency, and which have severely strained the country's economy, would surely intensify.  Even though the National Party lost 30 seats in this week's election (it now has 93 out of 166), Mr. de Klerk called the results a "clear mandate" for his reform goals.  Pushing for even more extensive reform is the liberal Democratic Party, which increased its strength in the white parliament to 33 from 20 seats.  The pro-apartheid Conservative Party, which bitterly opposes any concessions to blacks, posted the biggest gains, winning 17 additional seats for a total of 39.  However, the Conservatives didn't do as well as they predicted they would, and most political analysts believe the party's support has peaked at about 32% of the white electorate.  "Seventy percent of the whites voted for parties favoring renewal and reform . . . and granting political rights," Mr. de Klerk said a news conference.  Still, he wouldn't say how, or where, he would begin, referring only to his party's five-year "action plan," a document filled with grand rhetoric but few specifics.  The plan is vague enough to leave Mr. de Klerk with two paths toward reform.  The first is the well-worn road of the National Party, which involves trying to co-opt the country's more moderate black leaders into separate political structures that would enable the whites to maintain control.  The second is a pioneering trail that accepts the inevitability of majority rule and negotiations with black movements, like the African National Congress, about genuine power-sharing.  Both, undoubtedly, lead to the risk of more resistance, the first from anti-apartheid activists, the second from right-wing white vigilantes.  The election results, which showed a trend to the left, combined with other pressures, may steer Mr. de Klerk toward the more adventurous path.  For everywhere he turns, he hears the same mantra of demands -- release, lift bans, dismantle, negotiate -- be it from local anti-apartheid activists or from foreign governments: release political prisoners, like African National Congress leader Nelson Mandela; lift bans on all political organizations, such as the ANC, the Pan Africanist Congress and the United Democratic Front; dismantle all apartheid legislation; and finally, begin negotiations with leaders of all races.  International bankers, who are coming under mounting pressure from anti-apartheid activists not to reschedule the $8 billion of South African foreign debt that starts falling due in mid-1990, are looking for signs from the government that it will begin acting on these demands.  And so are some members of the U.S. Congress, who say they are willing to give Mr. de Klerk a couple of months, perhaps until the beginning of next year, before pushing ahead with stricter sanctions measures.  Furthermore, when Commonwealth leaders gather in Kuala Lumpur Oct. 18, the African members -- as well as Australia and Canada -- will press British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher to abandon her anti-sanctions stand.  Internally, the many anti-apartheid organizations, under the umbrella of the Mass Democratic Movement, vow to continue defying apartheid laws and state-of-emergency restrictions.  The first flashpoint could come Oct. 7, when the umbrella group has scheduled a nationwide anti-apartheid conference to work out a position on talks with the government, should they ever occur.  "We won't accept the old way of being ruled in this country," says Jay Naidoo, general secretary of the Congress of South African Trade Unions, the largest black labor federation.  "We are taking our future into our own hands.  We will eliminate apartheid on our own.  They can either join us, or respond with violence."  Schering-Plough Corp. picked a former vice chairman of Johnson & Johnson to beef up a new $600 million-a-year combined over-the-counter drug and personal-care products business.  Named to the post was David E. Collins, 55 years old, who will be an executive vice president and a member of the company's operations committee.  At the time he left Johnson & Johnson in 1988, he was responsible for consumer products in the U.S., Canada, Europe, Africa and the Middle East.  Previously, he ran Johnson & Johnson's McNeil Consumer Products business when its highly successful Tylenol headache capsules were plagued by tampering incidents involving several poisonings of consumers.  The company's handling of that situation, and the subsequent recovery of the brand, has been widely praised.  The new Schering-Plough unit and the appointment takes effect Sept. 18.  Among the duties Mr. Collins assumes will be those of R. Lee Jenkins, 59, executive vice president for consumer operations and a director, who will retire at the end of the year.  Robert Luciano, chairman of Schering-Plough, said, "Apart from his handling of the Tylenol crisis, we think that he did a bang-up job with Tylenol in general, especially in dealing with competing products.  We think his skills are transferable."  Mr. Luciano said the intent of merging the over-the-counter unit, which includes Coricidin and Drixoral cold and decongestant tablets, and personal care products, such as Coppertone tanning products and Dr. Scholl's foot care products, is to increase the effectiveness of the company's marketing efforts.  "The channels of distribution are essentially the same," Mr. Luciano said.  "By combining the units, we will extend the professional sales expertise of our over-the-counter unit to the entire product line."  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was awarded a $447.7 million Army contract for 82 AH-64A Apache helicopters.  GTE Corp. got $66.6 million for support of the Joint Space Intelligence Center and for Army communications equipment.  TRW Inc. got a $64.5 million Navy contract for development of a space-based laser.  Boeing Co. was given a $57.8 million Air Force contract for KC-135 aircraft engines.  Northrop Corp. won a $35.6 million Air Force contract for pilot training.  United Technologies Corp. was issued a $28.1 million Army contract for three UH60 VIP helicopters for Saudi Arabia and Egypt.  Unisys Corp. was given a $27.2 million Air Force contract for computer systems.  International Business Machines Corp. won a $13.1 million Air Force contract for radar-warning receivers.  Contraves Goerz Corp. got a $10.3 million Air Force contract for the Advanced Radiation Technology Program.  Paul Gigot is on vacation.  Seagram Co. reported that net income for the second quarter ended July 31 rose 20% on the continued strength of its beverage business and results of Du Pont Co., in which it holds a 23.5% interest.  The Montreal distiller and beverage concern's profit grew to $198.4 million, or $2.07 a share, from $165.5 million, or $1.74 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Revenue climbed 4.6% to $1.30 billion from $1.25 billion.  Seagram credited the additions of Martell cognac and Tropicana orange juice, which it purchased in April 1988, for the improved results, as well as its other divisions.  Seagram is one of the world's largest distillers, with brands such as Chivas Regal Scotch.  Dividend income from Du Pont, a Wilmington, Del., chemical and energy concern, increased 11% to $57.5 million.  Unremitted earnings from Du Pont rose 15%, to $104.7 million.  The Du Pont dividend income is cash, while the unremitted earnings are those that Seagram has on its books.  Seagram closed at $79.875, down 87.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The Canadian Federal Court granted Mattel Canada Inc.'s request for a temporary injunction prohibiting GTS Acquisitions Ltd. from selling video games and related equipment under the Nintendo trademark.  Mattel Canada, a subsidiary of Mattel Inc., Hawthorne, Calif., was appointed in 1986 by Nintendo of America Inc. as exclusive Canadian distributor of Nintendo products, including video games, video game programs and cartridges and video machines.  Nintendo of America is a subsidiary of Nintendo Co. of Japan.  Mattel Canada's annual sales of Nintendo products have grown to 68 million Canadian dollars (US$57.6 million) since 1986 and account for about 60% of its total revenue.  In the U.S., Nintendo distributes video products through its own network of distributors and dealers.  GTS Acquisitions, incorporated in January, is a closely held company which started importing U.S. video games into Canada earlier this year.  The temporary injunction was issued pending a trial of Mattel Canada's claim of trademark infringement by GTS Acquisitions.  A Mattel Canada spokesman said the court's ruling would strengthen the company's efforts to prevent unauthorized imports of Nintendo products by other Canadian companies.  With its roads and airports saturated, Western Europe is undertaking a radical upgrading of its railroads.  And while national rivalries are hindering the effort to some extent, the first links of a continental network -- including a 31-mile tunnel under the English Channel -- are already under construction.  This transportation revolution promises to be a boon for Europe's once-beleaguered train-making industry.  Analysts say orders from investment in a high-speed rail system could run into tens of billions of dollars.  "Demand has picked up and new opportunities are flowing through," says Andy Chambers, engineering analyst at the Nomura Research Institute in London.  Competition will be fierce, however, and some smaller players could find themselves squeezed out of the market.  Even bigger companies are forging collaboration agreements to strengthen their positions.  The shift in train makers' fortunes has been so swift, and opportunities so numerous, that analysts find it difficult to gauge which companies will benefit most from a high-speed Euro-train network.  In general, they rate the prospects good for big concerns such as General Electric Co. PLC of Britain; Alsthom S.A., a unit of France's Cie.  Generale d'Electricite; West Germany's Thyssen-Henschel, a unit of Thyssen AG; and Italy's Fiat Ferroviaria S.p.A., a unit of Fiat S.p.A.  Ambitions for a European network have traditionally been weakened by national initiative and pride.  In different countries, manufacturers use different, often incompatible, track gauges and carriages.  West Germany, for example, has developed its own high-speed train, the InterCity Express, with little regard for France's "Train a Grande Vitesse," which has carried 100 million passengers over the past eight years on the Paris-to-Lyon link alone.  Consequently, the German trains have wider carriages than the French.  But nationalism may be giving way to Europeanism.  Last year, for instance, Spain announced plans to replace around 7,000 miles of wide-gauge track with the narrower track common in Europe.  Indeed, Spain recently took the decision to spend more than $29 billion on improving its rail system.  And now, the 12-nation European Community is on the brink of completing a high-speed rail strategy.  Last week, the EC transportation commissioner, Karel Van Miert, said the EC is close to proposing a policy on high-speed rail transport.  "The golden age of the railroad isn't dead yet," Mr. Van Miert said.  "We need to take greater advantage of the railroad's potential in Europe."  Some analysts believe the private sector will take on an increasing share of financing the railroad boom.  While the French and West German railroads are heavily subsidized by public funds, the British government is making tentative plans to privatize rail services, and is keen to attract private money into rail projects such as the Channel Tunnel.  In July, Eurotunnel, the Anglo-French group behind the construction of the Channel Tunnel, placed orders valued at #600 million ($930 million) for train engines and cars from several, largely European consortiums.  The purchases included contracts for 40 locomotives, 252 passenger cars and 252 heavy freight cars.  A group including Asea Brown Boveri Group, a Swiss-Swedish venture, and Britain's Hawker Siddeley Group PLC got the locomotives contract.  A second consortium, including Bombardier Inc. of Canada, France's ANF Industrie and BN Constructions Ferroviaires et Metalliques of Belgium won the passenger car contract.  The freight cars are to be built by an Italian consortium of Breda Construzion Ferroviarie, a unit of Finanziaria Ernesto Breda S.p.A., and Fiat Ferroviaria.  In Britain, companies with train-making divisions such as GEC, Hawker Siddeley, Vickers PLC and BREL Ltd., in which Trafalgar House PLC and Asea Brown Boveri each have 40% stakes, are already benefiting from soaring domestic demand.  And they are setting their sights on Europe's new high-speed network.  The boom is giving birth to joint ventures between engineering and electricity-industry titans.  GEC's train-making business this year linked up with France's much-larger Alsthom to compete for European rail contracts.  The new group is currently setting the pace in the European market, and has won contracts to provide 24 high-speed trains in Spain and 95 fast trains and 111 other trains for France.  On a smaller scale BREL has forged links with Asea Brown Boveri.  Recently, BREL won the biggest-ever U.K. contract for railway carriages, a #350 million order to build a new generation of trains for London's subway system.  In West Germany, six companies are involved in locomotive production -- Siemens AG; the Asea Brown Boveri West German subsidiary; and AEG AG make electrical equipment, while Thyssen-Henschel; Krupp Maschinen Technik, a unit of Fried.  Krupp G.m.b.H.; and Krauss-Maffei AG produce mechanical parts for locomotives.  Action Industries Inc. said John L. Preston has resigned as president, chief operating officer and a director to become president and chief executive officer of B&E Merchandising Corp., Livonia, Mich.  Action said Ernest S. Berez, its 64-year-old chairman and chief executive officer, will assume the additional titles of president and chief operating officer of the marketer of housewares and giftware promotional programs.  The company said there is no immediate plan to seek a new president.  It said its board hasn't met since Mr. Preston resigned, and therefore hasn't selected a director to fill the vacated seat.  Sudbury Inc. said it will form a joint venture with two Japanese companies that will make an investment in General Products, a Sudbury unit based in Jackson, Mich.  Sudbury declined to identify the Japanese companies or to disclose the size of their proposed investment.  However, Sudbury said the move is part of a restructuring plan started last year.  Cash received from the Japanese concerns will be used for debt reduction, the company said, one of the goals of the restructuring.  General Products, which has annual sales of about $80 million, makes machined auto and truck parts.  It has plants at Jackson, Mich., and Angola, Ind.  Following the transaction, General Products will continue to supply U.S. automotive and industrial markets, but also will be prepared to supply Japanese automotive producers, both in the U.S. and abroad, Sudbury said.  Sudbury, a producer of industrial products, had sales of $510.5 million in the fiscal year ended May 31.  The company grew rapidly through acquisitions between 1983 and 1987 but the restructuring has included the sale of certain units.  In national over-the-counter trading, Sudbury closed at $6.50, down 12.5 cents.  Data-Design Laboratories Inc. reported a net loss of $1.7 million for its fourth quarter, compared with net income of $1.97 million, or 29 cents a share, the year earlier.  The company, which provides engineering, research and technical services, said revenue for the quarter ended June 30 fell 4% to $26.9 million, from $28.2 million.  For the fiscal year, the company had a net loss of $12.2 million, compared with net of $7.3 million, or $1.10 a share, the year earlier.  In the latest quarter, Data-Design reported a gain of $1.2 million from a tax benefit linked to the losses.  For the year, the company took $1.1 million provision for losses on the sale of some assets and had a $3.3 million gain from a tax benefit linked to the losses.  Thomas C. Beiseker, president and chief executive officer, said the losses are a result of the write-offs and turnaround expenses at the company's Anaheim, Calif., printed circuit board manufacturing facility and costs associated with changing technology problems at another facility.  He also cited the effects of continuing product development costs at the Catel unit and losses associated with the company's engineering services business.  French government officials are preparing a limited reduction in the heavy charges French companies pay for health insurance, retirement and other social programs.  The so-called social charges are by far the French government's largest single source of revenue, representing more than 40% of all government income.  Although they vary depending on a company's size, business and location, they can add more than 40% to the cost of employment, making them a brake on hiring.  Employees themselves pay an additional 18%.  The government thinks it could boost employment by reducing the charges, but it faces a big problem.  With total private sector salaries estimated at 1.7 trillion French francs ($255 billion) a year, even a single percentage point reduction in social charges would cost the state 17 billion francs.  And officials fear that such a small percentage cut, while costly, wouldn't stimulate employment much.  A year ago, officials announced a program to exempt any company's first employee from all social charges.  Since then, they have been seeking a way to cut charges more broadly -- but without losing much revenue.  Ideas include limiting the reductions to the lowest-paid jobs, or limiting them to five to 10 people at each company.  But those ideas have come under fire as either too hard to administer, or unlikely to produce many lasting benefits.  Officials are likely to work over the weekend to develop new ideas or refine existing ones.  They say some form of reduced charges is likely to be included in an employment stimulation package to be announced next week.  But the cuts aren't likely to be large, and officials are divided about whether they really will stimulate much employment.  "There is a political will to do something to reduce the cost of labor," explains one government official.  "But the technical provisions don't yet exist.  We are working now to try to develop something that isn't too costly or too hard to administer, before the employment program is announced Wednesday."  The proposed charge reduction is the latest in a series of efforts by France's Socialist government to promote growth, employment and exports by improving the business climate.  The new measures have provoked heavy criticism from the Socialist party itself as too favorable to the rich.  Sources say, for example, that the government plans to reduce the tax on reinvested corporate profits to about 37%, from the current 39% (profits that aren't reinvested are taxed at 42%).  And officials this week announced plans to cut the value-added tax on luxury items, including cars, furs and stereo equipment, to 25% from 28%.  For nearly two hours, cars are pulling up to the former mule shed that serves as city hall.  A marquee across the street trumpets the reason: "Carnesville Welcomes Congressman Ed Jenkins]"  Years ago, the barber's son worked here as a country lawyer in the rolling hills of North Georgia.  Today, though, he is returning as an emerging national figure -- a chief spokesman for the Democratic Party's restive conservative wing and the primary congressional architect of its next major initiative: a proposal to cut the tax on capital gains.  If the rate is ultimately reduced, the chain-smoking, 56-year-old Mr. Jenkins will have bested the leadership of his own party, which has opposed President Bush's proposal to lower the rate.  By successfully reassembling the old coalition of Republicans and southern Democrats, Mr. Jenkins also stands to become the broker Democratic conservatives have been lacking for a decade.  The canny Georgian insists his aim is to strengthen rather than divide his party.  "It's important for members from the moderate-to-conservative side of the party to play an active role if the party is to rebound in national politics," he contends.  "We're closer to losing our majority than many people believe."  To be sure, even in this burg of 486 people, not everybody agrees with Mr. Jenkins on the merits of the capital-gains proposal.  "I don't think it's fair that a guy who's got plenty of money will have to pay less tax," says Jack Slaton, principal of the Franklin County High School.  But that reaction is mild compared to the deep splits the issue is causing among Democrats in Washington.  The Jenkins plan is embarrassing both the new House speaker, Thomas Foley of Washington, and Rep. Dan Rostenkowski of Illinois, the chairman of the tax-writing House Ways and Means Committee on which Mr. Jenkins serves.  "There's going to be tremendous grief over this issue when it's all said and done," says liberal Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.).  "It's very divisive."  The consternation Mr. Jenkins is causing in liberal ranks is a throwback to earlier days on Capitol Hill.  During the 1950s and 1960s, Southern barons ran the Congress.  In the 1970s, wily Southern Democrats like Louisiana's Joe D. Waggoner Jr. were still able to build coalitions with the Republicans.  But gradually, the power waned.  Southern Democrats still provided critical votes for some of President Reagan's early victories, but since 1982 they have had sharply diminished clout.  On the Ways and Means Committee, though, Mr. Jenkins has cobbled together a coalition of six Democrats and all 13 of the panel's Republicans, mustering a bare majority in support of the capital-gains reduction.  The Democratic leadership, caught by surprise, has had to back off its initial opposition to the president's proposal.  The result: A tax cut that almost no one foresaw two months ago seems likely.  Mr. Jenkins's emergence as a major player on national issues comes after a decade of low-profile achievements in the House.  For many years since he was first elected in 1976, he contented himself with small victories.  Thanks to him, farmers have a special federal program that provides seed money to prevent soil erosion.  A tax-free security issued by rural communities is known as the Jenkins Bond.  In recent years, he has broadened his interests.  In 1987, he served on the Iran-Contra committee.  Last year he championed the drive to give special protection to the U.S. textile industry.  This year, he ran unsuccessfully for majority leader, the second-ranking post in the House.  With his thick glasses and even thicker Georgia twang, Mr. Jenkins might strike some as more hayseed than high-flyer.  But as George "Boots" Ramsay, a Toccoa, Ga., attorney says, "He's a lot smarter than you think he is."  As a legislator, Mr. Jenkins is cunning and disarming, a quiet power whose forte is informally testing the attitudes of his colleagues on the House floor and finding ground for compromise.  "He's one of the real leaders, respected by all of us," says Rep. Charles Stenholm of Texas, one of Congress's premier Boll Weevil Democrats.  "He helps find that middle ground, a little bit to the right of center."  In public forums, he can be a persuasive speaker, with a trial lawyer's gift for debate and a story-teller's wit and timing.  His weakness, friends say, is that he lacks the killer instinct.  He might have won the job of House Democratic whip, the third-ranking post, but he refused advice to jettison his race for majority leader.  The arm-twisting part of the whip's job, he said, didn't fit his demeanor.  The majority leader's race was a loser for him as soon as former presidential candidate Rep. Richard Gephardt of Missouri entered.  But Mr. Jenkins stayed in to enhance his own reputation, and to advance the cause to which he is now most dedicated: increasing the visibility of the House Democrats, mostly from the South and West, who occupy the conservative, pro-business side of the party's political spectrum.  He's a frequent source of advice for conservative Democratic congressional candidates, and is often consulted by members who want tips on how to get along.  He commands respect from Republicans.  "He has the ability to pick the right issues and he knows how to deal," says Rep. Raymond McGrath (R., N.Y.).  "He brings a lot of people with him on this side."  One man who hopes Mr. Jenkins keeps on dealing in Congress is former Rep. Waggoner, the Louisiana Democrat who was a power broker for Southern causes on the Ways and Means Committee before he retired from the House in 1979.  Although he was far more conservative than Mr. Jenkins, and also more willing to front for Republican causes, Mr. Waggoner says, "I see more of my approach to government in him than anyone else there."  Toro Co. said earnings for its fiscal first quarter ending Oct. 31 will be "considerably below" those of the year-earlier period, as a result of recent steps the company took to improve performance.  While the company's pattern of quarterly earnings will be changed by the moves, Toro said it expects to record bigger sales in the latter part of the fiscal year, and still anticipates topping last year's record results.  In the year-ago quarter, the maker of outdoor maintenance and irrigation equipment earned $4.7 million, or 44 cents a share, on sales of $145.2 million.  Last year, in a move to boost its competitive posture, Toro said it began adjusting distribution "to more closely align with customer demand," that is, shipping products closer to the time when customers need them.  Toro said the first-quarter earnings downturn will be compounded by softness in sales of snowthrowers and its new practice of shipping riding mowers directly to dealers to avoid double handling and warehousing.  As a result, the company said some first-quarter sales will move into the third quarter because less time will be required between actual production and delivery to the dealer.  The company also said it expects sales and earnings in the second quarter to be "relatively flat" with the year-ago period also because of the later shipping dates.  However, it said that late season snowfalls could boost results.  Despite the weak first two quarters of fiscal 1990, Toro expects a record third quarter and is optimistic for prospects for fiscal 1990 and beyond: "We are comfortable with the analysts' earnings-per-share estimates that range from $2.30 to $2.40 for the year."  For the fiscal year ended July 31, Toro had record earnings and sales of $22.1 million, or $2.10 a share, on sales of $643.6 million.  The government ordered six Japanese construction firms involved in a multibillion-dollar airport project to disband their price-fixing cartel.  The order by the Fair Trade Commission followed a year-long investigation of the firms, which are supplying sand for the Kansai International Airport in western Japan.  The commission's action came just one day after a new round of U.S.-Japan trade talks ended in Tokyo.  U.S. officials had criticized Japan at the meetings for tolerating business collusion.  Mitsuo Omura, representing the eight-company Offshore Reclamation Construction Association, told a news conference in Osaka that the arrangement was "necessary and an appropriate method to smoothly carry out a big national project" like the Kansai International airport.  An official of Ohbayashi Corp, a major Japanese construction firm, said: "We will discuss the matter with other firms in a way to accept the commission's order."  The other firms involved are Kajima Corp., Aoki Corp., Takenaka Doboku Co., Saeki Kensetsu Kogyo, and Yorigami Construction Co., the commission said.  The newspaper Mainichi Shimbun said the six firms will have to pay a total of 320 million yen ($2.2 million) in surcharges, equivalent to 1.5% of the total sand supplied under the accord.  The construction of a sea wall, with a radius of nearly seven miles, was completed last October after nearly two years, and the area is now being filled with sand, according to airport officials.  It was the second such action by the commission in the past year.  It ordered 70 Japanese firms to pay 290 million yen in surcharges after finding that the firms engaged in illegal consultations over projects at U.S. military facilities at Yokosuka, southwest of Tokyo, last December.  Break a tooth on a bony chicken "filet" sandwich and the law in many states requires you to grin and bear it.  But a California Supreme Court ruling last week offers consumers some hope.  The court has cleared the way for a lawsuit by Patrice Evart, a Los Angeles stockbroker who says she broke a tooth after biting down on a bone in a hamburger at Donna Lee's Fish & Chips in Granada Hills, Calif., three years ago.  Consumers can already seek redress for nails, glass and other "foreign objects," but the law has long viewed chicken bones in pot pies and pits in cherry tarts as part of the give and take of daily life.  New York, for example, ruled against a plaintiff who found a prune pit in a jar of prune butter.  And North Carolina denied relief to a person who bit into a crystallized grain of corn in corn flakes.  In California, the legal precedent dates back to a 1936 state Supreme Court decision against a person who swallowed a chicken bone in a pot pie.  The court reasoned that it was "common knowledge chicken pies occasionally contain chicken bones."  When Ms. Evart sued about the bone in her hamburger, the case was dismissed by a trial judge, based on the 1936 case.  But last June, a California appeals court reversed the judge's ruling.  It held that a piece of bone in supposedly finely ground beef isn't something most consumers necessarily anticipate.  It also observed that consumers would have difficulty protecting themselves "short of removing the hamburger from its bun, breaking it apart and inspecting its small components."  The California Supreme Court agreed.  Now, Ms. Evart and her attorney, Michael Kushner, have a chance to try to convince a jury that she deserves $35,000 in damages.  "The food industry has been thumbing its nose at people for the last half century," says Mr. Kushner.  The new ruling, he says, finally offers injured citizens the prospect of relief.  But the National Food Processors Association and others warn of a "tremendous and unwarranted" increase in food-related litigation.  "This is going to have the trial lawyers in the state of California smacking their lips," says Linda Bulmash, a lawyer for Tip Top Meats & Deli, the Los Angeles meat processor whose beef allegedly started the whole thing.  John Rubinstein and Stockard Channing, the "opening" cast of A.R. Gurney's charmingly literate play "Love Letters," have already moved on from their one-week gig at the Promenade Theater, leaving the field clear for the next team.  With its rotating cast, "Love Letters" allows a roster of notable actors to portray the childhood-to-late-middle-age love affair of its two characters, the taciturn lawyer and politician Andrew Makepeace Ladd III and the emotionally volatile artist Melissa Gardner.  Audiences can play pot luck or mix and match as they choose from the promising casts to come.  They will include such marketable duos as Swoosie Kurtz and Richard Thomas, Jason Robards and Elaine Stritch, Jane Curtin and Edward Herrmann, Colleen Dewhurst and George Hearn, David Dukes and Kate Nelligan, and Joanna Gleason and Sam Waterston.  More than a stunt or gimmick, an everchanging "Love Letters" is a good idea.  While probably one of the most stationary plays ever staged, it offers both actors and audiences a chance to engage in a dying art form: the beautifully staged reading, where the spoken word is everything and where sympathy, affection and pain are crystallized in an almost imperceptible and private flicker of feeling across a motionless actor's face.  One has to watch and listen carefully, but Mr. Gurney and the director John Tillinger tell an affecting story with an unusual economy, streamlined and uncluttered, but not austere.  The two actors sit at a handsome mahogany desk, which sits on a tasteful rug of Oriental design.  On the table, two copies of the play rest on two lecterns, and there is an elegant blue glass pitcher, full of water, as you might see on the podium of a university stage when a particularly distinguished speaker is expected.  Next to that are two matching blue glass cups, from which the actors drink.  Two chairs face the desk.  I believe I have now listed every prop in the play.  And that restrained mise-en-scene is, of course, part of the point, the subtext, as it were.  Andrew and Melissa, you see, are of privileged backgrounds, from the kinds of homes in which you will find such tastefully understated decorations.  When they first begin their life-long correspondence in 1937, Melissa's mother has forced her seven-year-old daughter to write Andrew a thank-you note for his birthday present to her, a copy of Frank Baum's "The Lost Princess of Oz."  It isn't long before they are passing notes in grade school and nascent eroticism rears its head: Andrew wonders, "When it's warmer out, can I come over and swim in your pool?"  As the children grow into teen-agers, their romance ebbs and flows among the missed signals and rampant insecurities of adolescence.  They continue to write after being sent away to boarding schools, and their letters begin to reveal not only the flavor of their mutual dependency but also the ways in which their families help and cripple them as they mature, as people and letterwriters.  Mr. Gurney imparts, in the form of throw-away one-liners from the letters, vital information about the development of Andrew and Melissa.  Melissa gaily pretends that her parents' divorce and her mother's drinking are not all that terrible, and, in the manner of a desperately sad but socially ambitious teen-ager, she affects a nonchalance when she writes to Andrew that her mother's second husband "used to bother me in bed, if you must know."  Not surprisingly, Melissa is soon visiting a psychiatrist, which she brags to "Andy" about with teen-age self-importance.  At the same time we begin to see shades of a depressive personality disorder that will threaten to engulf the grown-up woman she becomes.  Andrew, on the other hand, is an obedient son whose conservative impulses are nurtured by his family.  His one act of rebellion is to be drawn to the bright light of Melissa's vivacity.  He ardently insists that they continue their correspondence when she wearies of it, because his father has instilled in him a deep love of writing.  His grandfather, he admits, urged him not to be first in his class, because "only the Jews are first."  "I told him not to worry," he impishly tells Melissa, "there are no Jews here."  "Love Letters" turns sober in its second half as the consequences of this aborted romance manifest themselves in Andrew's unsatisfying but socially correct marriage and, most tragically, in Melissa's divorce and emotional decline.  Mr. Gurney and Mr. Tillinger delicately expose the complex reasons for this crucial missed link in the lives of these two characters.  They are, essentially, two souls who reach out for each other across a gulf of human frailty, and their reaching out is an exhilarating, funny and, in the final analysis, moving event.  For the record, Mr. Rubinstein swerved touchingly between Andrew's need for caution and comfort and the necessarily stifling result of giving in to such a need.  As for Ms. Channing, it is difficult to imagine that anyone could be better (as good, maybe, but not better) in the role of Melissa.  Her doughy, sexy look and roguish spirit collided ruinously with Melissa's underlying instability.  As her life gets enmeshed with Andrew's, these two old pals care more and more for their correspondence with each other.  Unfortunately, it cannot save them from the unhappiness of their own mistakes.  In "Love Letters," Mr. Gurney illuminates a paradoxical human truth: Love can make all the difference, or it can make none at all.  Applied Biosystems Inc. said it expects fiscal first-quarter sales and earnings to fall below expectations because of stepped-up investments and a sluggish Japanese market.  The scientific-instruments concern said it expects sales for the period ending Sept. 30 to be at or near sales in the year-ago quarter, while earnings will be below year-ago levels.  Net income in last year's quarter was $4.4 million, or 32 cents a share, on sales of $36.4 million.  Although orders in most of the world should reach planned levels, the company said, Japanese orders are being held back because of delays in Japan's release of its national budget.  The impact of the situation on Applied's annual results can't be determined, the company said.  Earnings in the quarter will fall because of increased spending to support research, development and marketing, Applied Biosystems said.  The announcement follows a similar one in June, when Applied Biosystems said fiscal fourth-quarter sales and profit fell below expectations.  At the time the company also partly blamed government problems in Japan that delayed grant funds.  "We are adopting a more cautious outlook for Japan during the balance of the fiscal year," said Irvin D. Smith, president and chief executive officer.  Sony Corp., citing better-than-expected business in its electronic and record divisions, said it plans to boost its dividend 12% to 50 yen (34 cents) in the current fiscal year, ending March 31, from 44.60 yen last year.  The company intends to pay an interim dividend of 25 yen in December and a year-end dividend of 25 yen.  It is early morning on June 4 in Beijing, a moment of profound historic importance.  Tanks are rolling toward Tiananmen Square to clear the last of the democracy protesters.  For hours, troops have been shooting their way through angry, unarmed mobs.  Hundreds, perhaps thousands, of civilians already lie dead.  At this very moment, Harrison E. Salisbury, the intrepid former New York Times reporter encamped in the Beijing Hotel overlooking Tiananmen, is . . . asleep.  "I half awoke," he writes in his just-published account of the Beijing massacre, "and said 'oh f---]' and turned over.  It was that gooey kind of sleep that paralyzes you."  Mr. Salisbury might well be praised for his candor.  Few reporters would admit to sleeping through a massive military assault taking place just outside their window.  But the revelation does call into question the value of his insta-book, "Tiananmen Diary: Thirteen Days in June" (Little, Brown, 176 pages, $18.95).  Not only did Mr. Salisbury snooze through his subject's central event, but he was not even in China during the remarkable buildup to this summer's massacre: the poster writing, the huge demonstrations, the Gorbachev visit fiasco.  But none of this has deterred the 81-year-old author and his publisher from rushing out the first of what will be a slew of books about the dramatic student-led democracy movement and its bloody suppression.  Unfortunately, this offering provides few interesting insights into the tragedy, as Mr. Salisbury seems more concerned with reminding us of his own importance.  In one especially memorable flourish, the author, who speaks no Chinese, actually writes: "I think I know China as well as, if not better than, any member of the standing committee of the Politburo."  But even he is not in a position to give us the full truth about the massacre.  Death tolls can't be verified, since bodies and official records quickly disappeared.  Nor can anyone be certain to what extent the student movement later was manipulated by forces loyal to the now-ousted Communist Party Chief Zhao Ziyang.  What we do know is that hundreds of thousands of people were moved to take to the streets in an unprecedented challenge to Communist Party rule.  They called, for the most part, not for Western-style democracy, but for a minimum list of human rights: a free press, a responsive government, an end to official graft.  In official China's revisionist version of events -- endorsed, incredibly, by Henry Kissinger in a recent article -- the military crackdown was unavoidable.  That's the big lie.  It was obvious to observers actually present in Beijing that the state could have derailed the movement effectively early on, most easily by giving in to some of the most basic demands.  Indeed, the party missed several chances to co-opt the movement and make it its own -- blowing the only opportunity it has had in years to make itself relevant.  So why didn't the leaders resolve the standoff peacefully?  In Mr. Salisbury's postscript, by far the strongest part of his book, he argues that hard-liners, including Deng Xiaoping, wanted to stir up a riot to "justify" military suppression, thereby enabling them to launch a purge of liberals in government and academia.  Here, Mr. Salisbury is almost certainly on the mark.  But while the whole truth of the affair may forever elude us, there were telling, unforgettable vignettes etched in the minds of those of us who witnessed the events firsthand or followed them in newspapers or TV broadcasts.  For example, on the morning of the killings, dazed journalists who had witnessed much of the carnage staggered into the Beijing Hotel dining room for breakfast.  There they found a young cook, weeping uncontrollably, unable to work.  "I've been watching people die all night long," he said.  The foreigners consoled him, and he pulled himself together to prepare the morning's meal.  Mr. Salisbury missed the drama.  His diary entry: "Breakfast now being served . . . .  Orange juice, coffee, and fried eggs."  On other occasions, while Beijing is burning, Mr. Salisbury is fiddling around in a world of inconsequential detail.  "Rice was excellent.  I spiced it up with a little soy sauce," he informs us.  On another occasion, we learn that his wife has a nice new sweater: "I bought a lovely pink cardigan for Charlotte."  Worse, the book is full of misspelled English and Chinese names, and several incidents are misreported.  True, this is meant to be a diary.  But some writing is better off left buried in a desk drawer.  If the Tiananmen massacre was a tragedy for China's reforms, "Tiananmen Diary" is something of a tragedy for Mr. Salisbury.  The Pulitzer Prize winner, one of the giants of American journalism, has enjoyed special access to Chinese leaders over the years and has written more than a dozen solid books on China and the Soviet Union.  But somehow, in "Tiananmen Diary," he never finds his touch.  Once a loyal follower of China's leaders, Mr. Salisbury, we learn, now reviles them.  But even here, his self-absorption is distasteful.  "To think," he huffs, "I know the men who did this."  ---  Mr. Ignatius is the Journal's Beijing correspondent.  Toyota Motor Corp., Tokyo, announced plans under which its manufacturing facilities in Southeast Asia are to complement each other by specializing in production of different auto parts.  Japan's biggest auto maker also announced plans for new production facilities in Malaysia and the Philippines.  Officials said they weren't sure when the new companies would be set up.  The plans, aimed at strengthening Toyota's operations in the region, call for production of diesel engines in Thailand, gasoline engines in Indonesia, steering parts in Malaysia and transmissions in the Philippines.  Toyota already has production facilities in those countries.  The company said the total investment in existing and new plants in Southeast Asia is expected to reach about 30 billion yen ($205.3 million).  Burmah Oil PLC, a major independent British oil company, reported a 17% rise in net income during the six months ended June 30, thanks to strong growth in its core businesses.  Net income, or profit after taxes and minority interests and ahead of extraordinary items, rose to 43.5 million pounds ($67.5 million) from 37.1 million.  Burmah made an extraordinary profit of 14.5 million pounds, arising chiefly from the sale of 50% of the company's liquefied natural-gas transport operation.  Sales climbed 13% to 753.5 million pounds from 666 million.  N.V. Philips, the Dutch electronics giant, has joined a venture headed by General Electric Co. of Britain and Plessey Co. of Britain that is bidding for one of a limited number of licenses for a new British mobile-phone system.  The group, which also includes BellSouth of the U.S., intends to develop a personal communications network, a cheaper, more flexible mobile-phone system than the cellular telephones currently in use.  The British government has said it will award two or three licenses for the new system.  A group headed by Cable & Wireless PLC already has been guaranteed one of the licenses.  Kingston Communications PLC, a public telephone operator based in Hull, England, also is joining the consortium.  Kingston and Philips will share a 20% stake in the venture, while GEC and Plessey will each have 30% and BellSouth 20%.  Ranks Hovis McDougall PLC confirmed it has sold its 14.9% stake in Goodman Fielder Wattie Ltd. of Australia to Barclays de Zoete Wedd Australia Ltd. for $327 million Australian (US$249 million).  "The timing doesn't have anything in particular to do with {the sale}.  It was a clear and clean way to conclude" the company's involvement, said Richard Endacott, Ranks Hovis treasurer.  The U.K. foods company said sale proceeds would be used to pay debt.  In April, Ranks Hovis offered to buy Goodman Fielder, valuing the company at A$3.1 billion, and acquired 14.9% of the company through purchases in the stock market.  Ranks Hovis paid approximately A$385 million for the stake.  Western Mining Corp., an Australian mining company with U.S. interests, reported after-tax operating profit rose 67% to 455.6 million Australian dollars (US$346.9 million) in its fiscal year ended June 30 from A$273.5 million a year earlier.  Earnings per share rose 47% to 53.4 Australian cents from 36.4 cents.  The dividend was increased to 30 cents a share from 23 cents.  The year-earlier result is restated to comply with revised reporting requirements, the company said, and both years' results included Western Mining's share of profits from associated companies.  Sales revenue rose 39% to A$1.20 billion from A$867.3 million.  After accounting for extraordinary items, overall profit rose 48% to A$345 million from A$232.5 million.  Western Mining reported extraordinary losses of A$110.6 million, mainly from writing down the majority of investments in the Carson Hill and Hog Ranch mines in the U.S., offset in part by gains on commodity contracts.  From an editorial in the London Spectator last month:  Poland is a faraway land of which we now know quite a lot.  Are there lessons for us in its recent, tormented history?  Contrary to what is often asserted, Mrs. Thatcher's decade of government has not fundamentally changed the terms of British political debate.  There are important sectors of society that remain deeply hostile to the marketplace, that believe security is more important than prosperity.  They still see no connection between the two, and desire nothing more than petrified mediocrity.  With Mrs. Thatcher's government losing popularity -- an unsurprising phenomenon after ten years -- these dismal aspirations, that have been responsible for our steep relative decline, are once more becoming evident.  Of course, our problems have been minor, even trivial, by comparison with Poland's.  Yet it has taken ten years of grim determination to achieve in this country very limited, and possibly temporary, triumphs over the forces of dirigisme and state bureaucracy.  The lesson of Poland is that economic controls are like illicit drugs: They are profitable for those who peddle them, and are addictive for those who consume them, whom, however, they condemn to a miserable existence.  It is a lesson worth learning.  Reckitt & Colman PLC said strong European sales growth in household goods and toiletries helped boost 1989 first-half pretax profit 14%.  The U.K. food and household products concern said profit grew to #98.6 million ($152.9 million) from #86.1 million in the year-earlier period.  Sales gained 8% to #736.9 million from #682.5 million.  Profit after tax and minority interests jumped 19% to #62.3 million from #52.2 million; per-share earnings rose to 41.96 pence from 35.16 pence.  Profit attributable to holders, or net income, dropped 14% to #61.51 million from #71.28 million.  The company had a #780,000 extraordinary charge in the latest period, while it had a #19.1 million credit a year ago.  Reckitt & Colman said it will issue an interim dividend of 10.65 pence a share, up from 9.15 pence.  Most people think of stocks only as being bought or sold.  But an entire industry revolves around the lending of billions of dollars of stocks, bonds and other types of securities.  Stock-loan departments of big brokerage firms get hefty fees in exchange for lending securities, as well as for matching lenders and borrowers.  Big institutional investors such as corporate pension funds also make money by lending stock they own.  Now a wide-ranging federal criminal investigation of the stock-loan industry is focusing on this little-known and lucrative corner of Wall Street.  Here are some questions and answers about how this business works.  Why do the brokerage firms need stock loan departments?  To ensure that stock is readily available to the firm and its customers, and to profit from the fees charged for the service.  Who needs to borrow stock?  Short sellers, takeover-stock speculators and just about any type of investor.  Stocks are generally lent to firms and individuals who need stock quickly, and can't or don't want to purchase enough shares.  A major use of borrowed stock is to make so-called short sales, in which an investor who anticipates a stock-price decline borrows shares of that stock and sells them.  The investor profits if the stock falls, because he will pay less when buying shares to replace the stock he borrowed.  How does a stock loan work?  People who own stock can lend it for a fee.  More typically, because interest rates are relatively high, the lender of the stock pays a fee for the use of money he gets when lending securities.  For example, a big investor orders 10,000 shares of XYZ Corp. from a trader who doesn't have it on hand.  So, the trader arranges to borrow the stock from another firm, which lends stock that it is holding on behalf of its customers who bought stock on credit.  The trader completes the sale of the XYZ stock to the investor and receives money which he then delivers to the firm that lent him the stock.  In return for the use of the money, that firm pays the trader a so-called rebate, typically 75% of the interest cost that is paid by brokers for borrowing funds from a bank.  The firm that lent the stock issues a "call notice" when it needs the shares back.  The trader has five days to deliver the stock.  If the trader doesn't deliver, the firm "buys him in" by replacing its customers' stock on its own -- and eliminating the rebate to the trader.  Who else gets involved in stock loans?  Investors who have idle stock and firms that link borrowers and lenders.  For example, Yale University was one of the first big institutional investors to lend stock from its portfolio as a way of increasing its investment returns.  Today, dozens of money managers, insurers, banks, pension funds and other large investors participate in the stock-loan business.  There are also "broker-finders" that get fees merely for matching borrowers and lenders of stock.  Broker-finders can also include the brokerage firms themselves.  The government is investigating whether all the payments that fly to and from such broker-finders are legitimate.  How much money is made by all this?  Millions of dollars a year.  Stock-loan departments generate much of Wall Street's net interest income each year; indeed, interest income is sometimes the only item that makes a brokerage firm profitable.  While firms don't break down publicly the profits of individual departments, the value of securities lent by Merrill Lynch & Co. at the end of last year totaled more than $2.2 billion.  The securities lending by other big firms is comparable.  Why did the stock-loan business get so big?  Two reasons.  As the stock market exploded in the post-war period, the number of investors buying securities on margin, or credit, mushroomed.  Brokerage firms typically use stock sold on margin and held at the firm to make stock loans.  Meanwhile, the surge in futures-related program trading, corporate takeovers and takeover speculation, all of which require vast, rapid, purchases of securities, created a need for immediate lenders of securities.  Jailed stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky, among others, was a big customer of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s stock-loan department.  The former head of Shearson's stock-loan operations has agreed to plead guilty to criminal charges and cooperate in the government's investigation of the stock-loan business, people close to the case say.  Who regulates the stock-loan business?  Depending on the aspect of the business, the main regulators are the Federal Reserve Board, the New York Stock Exchange and the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The Fed determines the amount of credit that may be extended to investors by brokers and securities dealers.  Both the Big Board and the SEC are responsible for regulating the possession and control of securities and can bring civil enforcement actions.  When I was 21 and had just returned from World War II, I threw away all my campaign ribbons and medals in a moment of revulsion.  Why?  I'm not really sure anymore, but probably because I was put off by other veterans' war stories and by civilians' inability to comprehend what combat actually had been like.  Yet as the years go by, people change.  When I read that the army had an office that would send veterans free of charge whatever medals they were entitled to, I wrote them a letter.  My son and daughter both knew, of course, that I had been in the war but I felt some tangible evidence that I had served with reasonable faith would be a welcome addition to the family scrapbook.  The army quickly sent me a postcard acknowledging my request, but warning that it would be some time before it could get to it.  A year or so later I received a more formal communication listing all the decorations to which I was entitled, including the bronze star, something I did not know I had been awarded.  Reading further, I discovered that in 1961 all holders of the combat infantryman's badge had automatically become bronze star recipients.  The citation came a few days later, handsomely done in stiff paper.  The medal itself followed shortly.  It certainly is a pleasant thing to be awarded a medal for heroism.  But when the award goes automatically to thousands of people of varying heroic stature, hasn't it become essentially meaningless?  And if meaningless, isn't it therefore not worth having?  If one is 20 years old and therefore likely to believe in the existence of moral absolutes, the answer is probably yes, the award is meaningless.  If, however, one is nearly 60, one's eyesight blurs and all words, whether absolute or not, become fuzzy.  It is true that there were thousands of men who probably deserved the medal more than I.  There might even have been one or two who deserved it somewhat less.  In any case, I accepted the medal with gratitude and considered it yet another manifestation of the good will of a country that has always been exceptionally generous.  In looking back over my army years I find that I served a total of 33 months, about half of which were spent in training (including four months at Syracuse University), four months in combat, and the remainder in military government.  For those 33 months of sometimes perilous, sometimes comfortable, sometimes dreary service, I have been amply rewarded.  The war that was catastrophic to so many millions was for me an opportunity.  The Veteran's Administration underwrote five years of my university education, which resulted in two degrees.  Fortunately I had matured enough in the army to make my university years more productive than they might otherwise have been.  The government then offered me a good job based on what I had learned at its expense and offered me an attractive mortgage for my house.  All in all, it was pleasant to be a veteran and have certain privileges.  Now I begin to approach the date when I will be deemed a senior citizen, entitled to ride transit systems at reduced rates, attend movies at discounted prices, and have other financial favors done for me.  Like most people, I enjoy a bargain even though I have trouble figuring out why I am entitled to one.  To serve in the army involves some sacrifice.  To reach the age of 65, however, implies no particular sacrifice, nor for that matter any particular civic virtue.  Nevertheless it is nice to have survived that long.  When the time comes, I shall take my senior citizen perks just as I took the bronze star, with the understanding that there is nothing personal about them.  They are simply a gift from a generous community.  There are better, more reasoned ways of governance I'm sure, but few of greater good will.  ---  Mr. Schindler served in the 2nd Battalion, 273rd Infantry, and was among the first to meet the Russians at the Elbe.  I have learned from experience that if you want to talk to football fans about anything substantive regarding their game, you'd better do it between seasons.  Once the ol' pigskin is teed up for real, the only things those folks are interested in discussing are the hit Billy Joe put on Jimmy Clyde last Saturday or Sunday, how many Bloody Marys they downed at their tailgate picnics, or how the point spreads for the coming weekend's games will affect their eagerness to take a flyer.  Thus, I wish to take advantage of this last pre-football-season day by advancing what the late Dr. Swift, of literary fame, would call a modest proposal.  I would like to see what's left of the foot taken out of football.  I mean everything: no more kickoffs, punts, field goals or points after touchdowns.  Send the kickers to the so-called soccer fields where they belong, and leave the gridirons to the true combatants.  Now, you probably think that's radical, but viewed through the kaleidoscope of history, it isn't.  I have this from no less an authority than David Nelson, the foremost expert on football history and rules.  Nelson used to be football coach and athletics director at the University of Delaware; now he's dean of that institution's school of physical education.  He has been a member of the NCAA's football rules committee since 1958, and its secretary since 1961.  His book on football's evolution, entitled "Anatomy of a Game," will be published by the NCAA sometime early next year.  Nelson says that, for most intents and purposes, American football gave the boot to the foot a long time ago.  He points out that the contest from which football traces its origin, between Rutgers and Princeton in 1869, really was mostly soccer, and that its score, 6-4, counted the number of times each team kicked the ball between the goalposts and under the crossbar.  Fifteen years later, football rules still emphasized kicking: A field goal counted five points, the kick-after-touchdown four, the touchdown two and the safety one.  The kick ceased being a method of advancing the ball offensively in 1923, when punts were declared no longer to be "free" kicks that either team could recover.  Statutes covering kicking have hardened since, but not calcified; goal posts have been widened and narrowed and moved forward and back, kicking tees have been approved and disallowed, points of kickoff origin have been changed.  "Football people act like they're 30 degrees to the right of Genghis Khan, but they've been flexible on occasion," Nelson notes.  I asked him if he liked my idea.  He laughed heartily and remarked that he's had similar notions from time to time.  "I've kept them to myself because they'd call out the boys in the white jackets for anyone in my position who proposed them," he confesses.  "But maybe after I retire . . ."  The boys in white jackets don't bother with calls about newspaper columnists, so I have no hesitancy about proceeding.  In fact, I'm confident the rationale for my position would win over even the boobyhatch reps, should they drop by to discuss it with me.  The reason to abolish the field goal is, I think, clear: It's wholly uncharacteristic of the game as it's now played.  Eleven sweaty guys heave and haul the ball into scoring range, but when they're stymied out trots a fella wearing a clean uniform to perform an altogether different sort of act, and sometimes with an altogether different accent.  "I go keek a touchdown," says sport's ultimate specialist, in Alex Karras's memorable words.  One needn't be a xenophobe to see the situation's ridiculous side.  The same goes for the point after touchdown.  This vestige of football's past is not only uncharacteristic of the game, but also dully predictable.  Extra-point kicks succeeded 95.6% of the time last year in both (]) the National Football League and NCAA Division I games. 'Nuf said.  I suppose the "t" in touchdown needs to be crossed to prevent wholesale ties, so I suggest a play from scrimmage from far enough out to make it a good deal less than a sure thing; say, eight or 10 yards.  Getting rid of kickoffs would be no big deal; they're a way to get the ball into play at the start of halves and after scores, and simply giving the offensive team the ball at its own 30 or 35 yard line would accomplish the same purpose without kicking up a fuss, so to speak.  My objection to the punt is a bit more complex.  Modern football's character -- and, I think, main appeal -- lies in its analogy to territorial combat; whoever called it the "100-Yard War" was on target.  There's no equivalent of the punt in war, so eliminate the thing and let 'em fight it out.  A team that fails to score a touchdown or get a first down would surrender the ball where it stands.  If a team's defense pushes a foe's offense into its own end zone, call it a "touchback" and award six points, just like for a touchdown.  Fair is fair.  Taking the foot out of football would permit a name change that would better describe the sport.  "Battleball" is my candidate, but I'm open to suggestion.  We could then join the rest of the world and get rid of the silly term "soccer" for the game where the foot really is supreme.  It also would junk those big slingshots at the ends of the fields, giving people sitting in the end zones an unobstructed view of the proceedings.  Why should we do all this?  For a better, more entertaining game, of course.  Denied the outlet of the punt, teams would have no choice but to go all out offensively and, probably, employ a more "open" style as well.  The most exciting part of present-day football, the fourth-down play, would occur again and again.  Eliminating the field goal and kicked extra-point, and granting defenses the opportunity for scoreboard parity, would put the glory where it belongs -- where the sweat is.  If you like my idea, write and say so.  Don't write to me; I want to stay on good terms with my postman.  Write to Pete Rozelle at the NFL, 410 Park Avenue, New York, N.Y. 10022, or Dick Schultz at the NCAA in Mission, Kan., 66222 (no street address necessary).  For ease of handling, mark your envelope "NO KICKS."  Congress is back at work and it's a good time to contemplate both past legislative sins and those about to be committed.  Just before recess, the legislators passed the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act, better known as the Thrift Bailout Bill.  The bill doesn't expiate past sins.  Taxpayers will continue to underwrite thrift borrowing, removing any necessity to invest wisely.  Nor does it protect against future sins.  The seeds for those can be found in the bill's central creation, Resolution Trust Corp.  When RTC reaches full manhood it will be a wonder to behold.  Assigned to take over and dispose of the assets of seized S&Ls, it will become the world's largest "bank," very loosely defined.  Assets could reach a nominal value of $300 billion to $400 billion.  It will employ some 4,000 people, most of whom will manage contracts with private specialists in asset management and disposal.  Lawyers and accountants will love it.  RTC also will have more putative watchdogs than any agency in federal history.  But they are not all there to look after the interests of the taxpayers footing the huge bill.  Rather, they will make sure that the RTC, as it disposes of assets, does no harm to those special friends every Congressperson has in his or her district, the local developers, real-estate firms and owners of surviving thrifts.  Congress will continue to do what it has done all along at so much public expense, look after special interests first.  This has given RTC a contradictory and essentially phony mandate.  It is supposed to "maximize" the return to the taxpayers when it disposes of the land, houses and commercial buildings it acquires from insolvent thrifts.  Usually, that would mean getting rid of the property as soon as possible to cut financing and maintenance expenses.  But the RTC also is instructed to take into account "local conditions" before selling property.  That means it must not unduly depress property values and thus damage local real-estate interests.  The word "maximize" is waived entirely if the property goes to low-income buyers.  To see to all this, a special congressional task force headed by Rep. Bruce Vento (D., Minn.) will be looking over the RTC's shoulder.  The new law also creates six advisory boards for "economically distressed" areas to help RTC protect local interests.  Direct responsibility for running RTC will fall on the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which now will take over the underwriting of thrift as well as bank borrowing.  Atop the FDIC will be a board composed of the Secretaries of Treasury and HUD, the Federal Reserve chairman and two industry representatives appointed by the President subject to Senate confirmation.  The administration also has reassured local interests in depressed areas.  We are skeptical of RTC's chances of "maximizing" returns because we have looked at past similar efforts by government agencies.  The Federal Asset Disposition Association (FADA), subsumed by RTC, was constantly in hot water with local political interests, who saw to it that Congress heard and responded to their complaints.  So have been the Federal Housing Administration, Veteran's Administration and Farm Credit Administration as they have tried to dispose of huge running inventories of foreclosed federally insured real estate.  At least one thing has been learned.  Competing with local property interests may incur political wrath, but letting houses sit empty to decay and run down neighborhoods isn't so great either.  The poverty lobby thinks it has an answer to that, however.  For years, it has demanded that Congress simply turn over foreclosed housing to the homeless.  That kills two birds, so the theory goes.  Local real-estate values aren't hurt and the government gets credit for meeting a social need.  RTC will get to carry out a limited test of this theory.  It can sell single-family homes at below market value to "low-income" families, those with incomes less than 115% of the local median.  The Federal Home Loan Bank is required to subsidize low-income mortgages.  But what if the buyers can't keep up payments, and the houses, much devalued, go back to the government?  Is it certain that these sales will have no market impact?  The thrift bailout bill solves none of the old problems, such as those caused by expansive federal deposit insurance, and it will most likely create some new ones.  So long as neither the sins of the past nor those of the future are addressed, taxpayers can look for more and more waste of their money.  Kasler Corp. President E. Robert Ferguson remembers the good ol' days, when a construction company like his could get a state contract just by submitting the lowest bid.  Times have changed, and now a contractor can be aced out of the competition by any number of "procedural errors," explains Mr. Ferguson.  Kasler found that out the hard way, as it was passed over recently for a project by the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California to increase the capacity of a canal that carries water to San Diego.  As it does with every big contract, Kasler in June told Wall Street that it was low bidder on the canal project, with a $29.9 million bid.  Usually, it's assumed by the investment community that the company was awarded the contract, and that's the last that's heard about it.  But yesterday, Kasler said that despite its bid, the company and its joint venture partner "will not be awarded the contract due to the disqualification of a subcontractor."  It seems the subcontractor, Ball Ball & Brosamer Inc. of Danville, Calif., just couldn't get its math straight.  That's right, math.  In the first round of bidding in April, Ball Ball & Brosamer submitted its own bid of $19 million, well below the other bids, which ranged upward of $30 million.  The big difference had little to do with Ball Ball & Brosamer's efficiency.  Rather, it seems the firm forgot to make a required conversion from tons to cubic yards in calculating costs for the excavation segments of the project, says an attorney for the Metropolitan Water District.  The company realized the error and withdrew its bid, and a second round of bidding began.  This time, Kasler and its joint venture partner, Rados Cos.' Steve P. Rados Inc. unit, Santa Ana, won with the $29.9 million bid that included Ball Ball & Brosamer as a subcontractor.  That's when things got nasty.  Kiewit Pacific Co. of Santa Fe Springs, which had submitted the second-lowest bid of $30.8 million, filed suit in state court in Los Angeles to disqualify the Kasler-Rados team.  California's Public Contract Code states that a bidder who withdraws its bid because it had made certain errors "shall be prohibited from participating in further bidding on the project."  The judge ruled in Kiewit's favor, and Kiewit was awarded the contract.  "Kasler & Rados knew what they were doing going into it.  They were trying to do an end-run around the statute, said Bernard Kamine, an attorney for Kiewit.  Although Kasler has appealed the ruling to the state Supreme Court, Mr. Ferguson concedes that "realistically, the job won't be awarded to us."  Kasler's portion of the contract would have been about $18 million, but the company said it never added that amount into its backlog, which stood at $188 million on July 31.  "It used to be that if you were the low bidder, and if you added the numbers correctly, you got the job.  But that's no longer the case," laments Mr. Ferguson.  Speculative interest boosted Tiffany & Co.'s shares yesterday on news that investor Donald Trump received clearance to buy more than $15 million of the company's stock.  Shares of the jewelry-store chain spurted $6.125, to close at $60.375 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, on volume of 482,200 shares.  "Mr.  Trump thinks Tiffany provides an exciting investment opportunity," said his attorney, Susan Heilbron.  She declined to say how much Tiffany stock Mr. Trump owned, if any, or what he might purchase in the future.  A $15 million stake would equal about 250,000 shares; Tiffany has about 15.2 million shares outstanding.  William Chaney, Tiffany's chairman, said that Mr. Trump has advised him that he filed documents under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act to purchase the stock as an investment, not as part of a takeover effort.  But analysts say a takeover attempt is plausible.  "It's odd to think of why he would go through all this for investment purposes only," said Edward Johnson, a director of the Johnson Redbook Service, a division of Prescott, Ball & Turben Inc.  "I think he's more interested in it as a takeover because Tiffany has a high profile.  It's doing well in Europe and the U.S. and it might tie in well with the other properties he owns like Trump Tower, his casinos, and the shuttle," he added.  Janet Joseph Kloppenburg, a principal at Robertson & Stephens & Co., agrees."I think it's possible, {a takeover bid} given his investment activity in the past.  He's attracted to the retailing and service businesses to high-end customers; Tiffany's certainly a play on that."  Expressions of investment interest by Mr. Trump in the past have caused stock prices to run up, but he has rarely followed through with a takeover offer.  In late 1988, for instance, Mr. Trump filed for clearance to buy 15% or more of Caesars World Inc., the hotel and casino company, but since then he hasn't given any subsequent indications of interest.  On several occasions Mr. Trump has profited by selling his holdings to other investors who have launched offers or proxy fights for companies.  Just a month ago, Tiffany's stock spurted on speculation that the company's shares were being accumulated and that it might become a takeover target.  At the time, Tiffany officials declined to comment on the market activity or the rumors, and no suitor emerged.  In the past 52 weeks, Tiffany's shares have traded as high as $61 and as low as $22; the stock split 3-for-2 in July.  The company operates nine stores in the U.S. and a total of five in Asia and Europe; it went public in May 1987.  A management-led group acquired Tiffany in 1984 from Avon Products Inc.  Tiffany's sales for the fiscal year ended Jan. 31 rose 26% to $290.3 million from $230.5 million the year earlier.  Net income soared 54% to $24.9 million, or $2.43 a share, from $16.2 million, or $1.70 a share.  If we can get along so well with the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, why do we have so much trouble living with the nations of Western Europe?  Seldom has there been so much to be gained from peaceful relations with Europe's West.  To begin with, Western Europe is in the process of trying to shape itself into Europe 1992, something much closer to a united Europe than the current community.  It would seem to be wise to step up efforts to convince these Europeans that we have mutual interests.  There surely is a fine opportunity to do just that in the current talks on the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.  Part of the negotiation concerns agricultural trade, and even getting the subject on the table was a triumph of sorts.  In previous years the topic has been swept under the rug.  A key problem is wheat.  Between 1977 and 1985, the U.S. share of the world's net wheat exports fell to 29% from 42%.  In 1977, the European Community was a net wheat importer, while in 1985 it accounted for 15% of net exports.  The sharp change in Europe's position was brought about by official subsidies, which let European producers cut their prices in world markets.  This marvelous export gain was purchased largely at the expense of European consumers; internal EC wheat prices are far above U.S. market prices.  In 1985 the U.S. Agriculture Department decided to fight back with subsidies of its own.  The department introduced something euphemistically called the Export Enhancement Program.  One aim was to increase U.S. wheat exports, but another was to blackjack the EC into cutting its subsidies during the GATT talks.  The first aim would seem to have been achieved.  In the St. Louis Federal Reserve Bank Review, Cletus C. Coughlin and Kenneth C. Carraro note that U.S. wheat exports have risen sharply since 1985.  The U.S. now has about the same share of world exports that it had in 1977.  This success, however, was purchased at a substantial cost.  The Export Enhancement Program gets rid of wheat that otherwise would be held by the government under domestic support programs.  The St. Louis Fed economists note that a cheaper way to dispose of the government's surplus wheat simply would have been to destroy it.  When it comes to the program's second goal, persuading the EC to liberalize agricultural trade, the gains have been zilch or, in fact, less than zilch.  The EC hangs on to its subsidy programs and seems more likely to escalate the trade war than to end it.  Even before the era of the Export Enhancement Program, both the U.S. and the EC had increased subsidies.  In January 1983, the U.S. subsidized the sale of one million tons of wheat flour to Egypt to undercut subsidized offerings by the EC.  To keep the EC from buying back the market, the U.S. forced Egypt to agree not to import wheat flour from any non-U.S. supplier until June 1984.  In the short run the U.S. displaced the EC sales of wheat flour to Egypt.  But don't count the Europeans out.  The EC subsidized the sale of 320,000 tons of unmilled wheat to Egypt in the spring of 1983 and later subsidized the sale of wheat to Iran, Syria, Libya and Algeria.  The EC also began competing in China and Latin America.  It's easy to say that the current U.S. policy is a mistake.  "One of the major problems of the EEP is that mixed signals are being sent to the EC and other agricultural nations," the St. Louis Fed economists say.  "The U.S. proposals are a highly publicized initiative to stimulate a cooperative search to reform agriculture through GATT.  At the same time, the retaliatory challenges to European-subsidized export sales can be termed 'noncooperative activism.'"  America's hard-nosed approach isn't likely to achieve the results it seeks.  The EC's cost of beating U.S. subsidies is relatively small, aside from the higher costs that the subsidies inflict on consumers.  The warfare, moreover, allows the EC to portray the U.S. as an enemy, increasing support for any budget boosts needed to support the subsidies.  Since the U.S. has a much larger foreign market to defend, it is estimated that the U.S. would have to outspend the EC by 50% merely to maintain its market share.  The U.S. shoot-while-talking approach to GATT negotiations certainly weakens the position of U.S. representatives at the talks.  The U.S., after all, is doing exactly what it objects to the EC doing.  Other nations can be excused if they wonder, occasionally, what the U.S. position really is.  The U.S.-EC warfare, incidentally, is winning no friends for either side among other wheat producers.  The warfare has caused the world price to fall, imposing substantial losses on such grain exporters as Canada, Australia and Argentina.  There must be some frustration among U.S. officials.  The subsidies aside, the U.S. is a lower-cost producer than the EC. Europe is still trying to grow grain on postage-stamp farms ill-fitted to new, efficient farm machinery.  Some move toward freer farm trade surely would benefit Europe's consumers, whatever the short-term losses to its farmers.  It's hard to say how this crazy mess will eventually work out.  Surely U.S. negotiators should be able to approach the GATT talks with sympathy for the EC's farm-politics problems; the U.S. has plenty of those at home.  The U.S. government has been supporting domestic farm prices since the 1930s, and it's hard to believe that Congress would agree to full liberalization of farm trade.  Both sides, however, have so much to gain from liberalization that it would be tragic if there were no movement in that direction at all.  Even a small movement, with an agreement to continue talking, would be welcome.  It's nice to have all those new friends on the far side of the Berlin Wall, but it would be a shame to lose our old friends -- especially now, with 1992 coming closer every day. 